CHAPTER I.
INTRODUCTIONTHE STRANGERTHE ATTACKTHE RESCUETHE OLD HUNTER.
That portion of territory known throughout Christendom as Kentucky,
was, at an early period, the theatre of some of the wildest tragedies, most
hardy contested and bloody scenes ever placed on record. In fact its very
name, derived from the Indian word Kan-tuck-kee, and which was applied
to it long before its discovery by the whites, is peculiarly significant in
meaningbeing no less than the dark and bloody ground. History makes
no mention of its being inhabited prior to its settlement by the present race,
but rather serves to aid us in the inference, that from time immemorial it
was used as a neutral ground, whereon the different savage tribes were
wont to meet in deadly strife; and hence the portentious name by which it
was known among them. But notwithstanding its ominous title, Kentucky,
when first beheld by the white hunter, presented all the attractions he would
have envied in Paradise itself. The climate was congenial to his feelings
the country was devoid of savageswhile its thick tangles of green cane
abounding with deer, elk, bears, buffaloes, panthers, wolves and wild cats,
and its more open woods with pheasant, turkey and partridgesmade it the
full realization of his hopeshis longings. What more could he ask? And
when he again stood among his friends, beyond the Alleghanies, is it to be
wondered at that his excited feelings, aided by distance, should lead him to
describe it as the El Dorado of the world? Such indeed he did describe it;
and to such glowing descriptions, Kentucky is doubtless partially indebted
for her settlement so much in advance of the surrounding territory.
As it is not our purpose in the present instance, to enter into a history of
the country, further than is necessary to the development of our story, the
reader will pardon us for omitting that account of its early settlement which
can readily be gleaned from numerous works already familiar to the reading
public. It may not be amiss, however, to remark here, what almost every
reader knows, that first and foremost in the dangerous struggles of pioneer
life, was the celebrated Daniel Boone, whose name in the west, and
particularly
in Kentucky, is a household word; and whose fame, as a fearless
hunter, has extended not only over this continent, but throughout Europe.
The birth place of this renowned individual has been credited to several
states, by as many writers; but one, more than the rest, is positive in
asserting it to have been Bucks county, Pennsylvania, and the year of his
birth 1732, which is sufficient for our purpose, whether strictly correct or
not. At an early period of his life, all agree that he removed with his
father to a very thinly settled section of North Carolina, where he spent
his time in hunting, thereby supplying the family with meat, and destroying
the wild beasts, while his brothers assisted the father in tilling the farm, and
where he afterwards, in a romantic manner, became acquainted with a
settler's
daughter, whem he married, and whence, in the spring of 1769, in
company with five others, he set out on an expedition of danger across the
mountains, to explore the western wilds; and after undergoing hardships
innumerable, and loosing all his companions in various ways, he at last
succeeded in erecting the first log cabin, and being the first white settler on
the borders of Kentucky. To follow up, even from this time, a detail of
his trials, adventures, captures by the Indians, and hair-breadth escapes, to
the close of his eventful career, would be sufficient to fill a volume;
therefore
we shall drop him for the time, merely remarking, by the way, that he
will be found to figure occasionally in the following pages.
From the first appearance of Boone in the wilds of Kentucky, we shall
pass over a space of some ten or twelve years, and open our story in the
fall of 1781. During this period, the aspect of the country for a
considerable
distance around the present site of Lexington, had become materially
changed, and the smoke from the cabin of the white settler arose in an
hundred
places, where, a dozen years before, prowled the wolf, the bear and the
panther, in perfect security. In sooth, the year in question had been very
propitious to the immigrants, who, flocking in from eastern settlements in
goodly numbers, were allowed to domiciliate themselves in their new homes,
with but few exceptions, entirely unmolested by the savage foe. So much
in fact was this the case, that instead of taking up their residence in a fort
or station, as they were more generally calledthe new comers erected
cabins for themselves, at such points as they considered most agreeable,
gradually venturing farther and farther from the strongholds, until some of
them became too distant to look hopefully for succor, even in cases of extreme
necessity.
Among the stations most prominent at this period, as being most secure,
and against which the attacks of the Indians were most frequent and
unsuccessful
,
may be mentioned Harrod's, Boone's, Logan's, and Bryan's, so called
in honor of their founders. The two first named, probably from being the
two earliest founded, were particularly unfortunate in drawing down upon
themselves the concentrated fury of the savages, who at various times
surrounded
them in great numbers and attempted to take them by storm. These
attacks not unfrequently lasted several days, in which a brisk fire was
maintained
on both sides, whenever a foe could be seen, until wearied out with
fruitless endeavors, or surprised by a reinforcement of the whites, the Indians
would raise the siege, with a howl of rage, and depart. One of the longest
and most remarkable of these on record, we believe, was that of
Boonesborough
,
which was attacked in June, 1778, by five hundred Indians, led on
by Duquesne, a Frenchman, and which, with only a small garrison,
commanded
by Boone himself, nobly held out for eight days, when the enemy
withdrew in despair. But, as we before remarked, it not being our purpose
to enter into a general history of the time, we shall proceed forthwith to our
story.
It was near the close of a mild, beautiful day, in the autumn of 1781, that
a young man, some twenty-two years of age, emerged from a wood into an
open space or clearing, at a distance of perhaps fifteen miles eastward of
Lexington. The general appearance of this individual betokened the hunter,
but at the same time one who followed it for pleasure, rather than as a means
of support. This was evident by his dress, which, although somewhat
characteristic
of the time, was much superior to that generally worn by the
woodsman. It consisted of a woolen hunting frock, of fine texture, of a dark
green color, that came a few inches below the hips. Beneath this, and fitting
closely around his shoulders, neck and breast, was a scarlet jacket, tastefully
adorned with two rows of round, white, metal buttons. A large capewith
a deep red fringe, of about an inch in widthwas attached to the frock, and
extended from the shoulders nearly to the elbow. Around the waist, outside
the frock, passed a dark leather belt, in which were confined a brace of
handsome
pistols, and a long silver-handled hunting knife. Breeches of cloth,
like the frock, connected with leggins of tanned deer skin, which in turn
extended over, and partly concealed, heavy cow hide boots. A neatly made
cap of deer skin, with the hair outside, surmounted a finely shaped head,
whereon was a countenance both striking and pleasing. His features, though
somewhat pale and haggard, as if from recent grief or trouble, were mostly
of the Grecian cast, with a high, noble foreheada large, clear, fascinating
gray eyea well formed mouth, and a prominent chin, indicative of manly
courage and strength of character. In height he was about five feet and ten
inchesbroad shoulderedstraightheavy setwith handsome
proportions
,every
limb plump and tapering with that beauty of outline which
may ever be set down as combining great strength and suppleness.
Upon the shoulder of the young man, as he emerged from the wood,
rested an elegant rifle, which, after advancing a short distance, he brought
into a trailing position, and then pausing, he dropped the breech upon the
ground, placed his hands over the muzzle, and, carelessly leaning his chin
upon them, swept with his eye the surrounding country, to which he was
evidently a stranger.
The day had been one of those mild and smoky ones, peculiar to the
climate
and season, and the sun, large and red, was near to sinking behind the
far western ridge, giving a beautiful crimson, mellow tinge to each object
which came beneath his rays. The landscape, over which the stranger
gazed, was by no means unpleassing. His position was on an eminence,
overlooking
a fertile valley, partly cleared, and partly shaded by woods, through
which wound a chrystal stream, whose gentle murmurs could be heard even
where he stood. Beyond this stream, the ground, in pleasing undulations,
took a gentle rise, to a goodly height, and was covered by what is termed an
open wooda wood peculiar to Kentucky at this period, consisting of trees
in the regularity of an orchard, at some distance apart, devoid of
underbrush
,
beneath which the earth was beautifully carpeted with a rank growth
of clover, high grass, and wild flowers innumerable. In the rear of the
young hunter, as if to form a background to the picture, was the wood he
had just quitted, which, continuing the elevation spoken of, but more
abruptly
,
rose high above him, and was crowned by a ledge of rocks. Far in the
distance, to his right, could be seen another high ridge, while to his left,
spreading far away from the mouth of the valley, if we may so term it,
like the prairies of Missouri, was a beautiful tangle, or cane-brake,
containing
,
like the former, its thousands of wild animals. The open space
wherein the hunter stood, was not largecovering an area of not more than
half a dozen acreswas of an oblong form, and sloped off from his position
to the right, left, and front,had been tilled for a couple of seasons, and
reached from the wood down to the stream in the valley, where stood a
rather neat log cabin, from which a light blue smoke ascended in graceful
wreaths. The eye of the stranger, glancing over the scene, fell upon this
latter with that gleam of satisfaction which is felt by a person after
performing
a long fatiguing journey, when he sees before him a comfortable inn,
where he is to repose for the night; and pausing for a couple of minutes,
he replaced his rifle upon his shoulder, and started forward down the hill
towards it, at a leisure pace.
Scarcely had the stranger advanced twenty paces, when he was startled
by a fierce yell, accompanied by the report of a rifle, the ball of which
whizzed past him, within an inch of his head. Ere he could recover from
his surprise, a sharp pain in the side, followed by another report, caused
him to reel like one intoxicated, and finally sink to the earth. As the young
man fell, two Indians sprang from behind a cluster of bushes, which skirted
the clearing some seventy-five yards to the right, and with a whoop of
triumph
,
tomahawk in hand, rushed toward him. Believing that his life now
depended upon his own speedy exertions, the young hunter, by a great effort,
succeeded in raising himself upon his knees; and drawing up his rifle with
a hasty aim, he fired, but with no other success than that of causing one of
the savages to jerk his head suddenly aside without slackening his speed.
There was still a chance left him, and setting his teeth hard, the wounded
man drew his pistols from his belt, and awaited the approach of his
enemies
,
who, when within thirty paces, discovering the weapons of death,
suddenly came to a halt, and commenced loading their rifles with great
rapidity
.
The young hunter now perceived, with painful regret, that only an
interposition
of Providence could save him, for his life was hanging on a thread
that might snap at any moment. It was an awful moment of suspense, as
there on his knees, far, far away from the land of his birth, in a strange
country, he, in the prime of life, without a friend near, wounded and weak,
was waiting to die, like a wild beast, by the hands of savages, with his scalp
to be borne hence as a trophy, his flesh to be devoured by wolves, and his
bones left to bleach in the open air. It was an awful moment of suspense!
and a thousand thoughts (for in extreme peril, as in a dream, we think with
a hundred-fold ratio,) came rushing through his mind, and he felt he would
have given worlds, were they his, for the existence of even half an hour,
with a friend by, to receive his dying requests. To add to his despair, he
felt himself fast growing weaker and weaker; and with an unsteady vision
as his last hope, he turned his eye in the direction of the cottage, to note if
any assistance were at handhe saw none, and nature failing to support him
longer in his position, he sunk back upon the ground, believing the last sands
of his existence were run.
Meantime the Indians had loaded their rifles, and one of them stepping a
pace in front of his companion, was already in the act of aiming, when,
perceiving
the young man falter and sink back, he lowered the muzzle of his
gun, and, grasping his tomahawk, darted forward to despatch him without
further loss of amunition. Already had he reached within five or six
paces
of his victim, who now unable to exert himself in his own defence, could
only look upon his savage enemy and the weapon uplifted for his destruction,
when, crack went another rifle, in an opposite direction whence the Indians
approached, and bounding into the air, with a terrific yell, the foremost fell
dead by the young man's side. On seeing his companion fall, the other
Indian, who was only a few paces behind, stopped suddenly, and, with a yell
of fear and disappointment, turned and fled.
Those only who have been placed in peril sufficient to extinguish the
last gleam of hope, and have suddenly been relieved by a mysterious
interposition
of Providence, can fully realize the feelings with which the
wounded
hunter saw himself rescued from an ignominious death. True, he was
weak and faint from a wound which was, perhaps, mortal; still it was a great
consolation to feel that he should die among those who would bury him, and
perhaps bear a message to friends in a far-off land. With such thoughts
uppermost in his mind, the young man, by great exertion, raised himself
upon
his elbow, and turned his head in the direction whence his deliverer might
be expected; but to his surprise and disappointment no one appeared; and
after vainly attempting to regain his feet, he sunk back completely
exhausted
.
The wound in his side had now grown very painful and was bleeding
profusely; while he became conscious, that unless the hemorrhage could be
stanched immediately, the only good service a friend could render him,
would be to inter his remains. In this helpless state, something like a
minute
elapsed, when he felt a strange sensation about his hearthis head
grew dizzyhis thoughts seemed confusedthe sky appeared suddenly to
grow dark, and he believed the icy grasp of death was already settling upon
him. At this moment a formbut whether of friend or foe he could not
tellflitted before his uncertain vision; and then all became darkness and
nonentity. He had swooned.
When the young stranger recovered his senses, after a lapse of some ten
minutes, his glance rested on the form of a white hunter, of noble aspect,
who was bending over him with a compassionate look, and who, meantime,
had opened his dress to the wound and stanched the blood, by covering it with
a few pieces of coarse linen which he had torn into shreds for the purpose
and secured there by means of his belt.
As this latter personage is designed to figure somewhat in the following
pages, we shall take this opportunity of describing him as he appeared to our
wounded friend.
In height and proportionbut not in agethese two individuals were
somewhat
alike;the new comer being full five feet ten inches, with a robust
athletic frame, well rounded, plump and tapering limbs, together with all the
concomitants of a powerful man. At the moment when first beheld by the
young man, after regaining his senses, his deliverer was kneeling by his side,
his cap of the wild-cat skin was lying on the ground, and the last mellow rays
of the setting sun were streaming upon an intelligent and manly countenance,
which, now rendered more deeply interesting by the earnest compassionate
look whereby he regarded the other, made him appear to that other, in his
peculiar situation, the most noble being he had ever seen. Of years he had
seen some fifty, though there was a freshness about his face, owing probably
to his hardy, healthy mode of life, that bid fair to dispute this point by at
least half a dozen. His countenance was open and pleasing, with good,
regular
,
though not, strictly speaking, handsome features. His forehead was
high, full and noble, beneath which beamed a mild, clear blue eye. His nose
was rather long and angular, his cheek-bones high and bold, his lips thin and
compressed, covering a goodly sett of teeth, his chin round and prominent,
the whole together conveying an expression of energy, decision, hardy
recklesness
and manly courage, rarely seen combined in one individual. His
dress was fashioned much like the other's, already described, but of coarser
materialsthe frock being of linsey, the breeches and leggings of deerskin,
and the moccasins, in place of boots, of the same material. Around his waist
passed a belt, wherein, instead of pistols, were confined a tomahawk and
scalping
knife, two weapons which were considered as indispensable to the
regular
white hunter of that day as to the Indian warrior himself.
So soon as the elder of the two became aware of consciousness on the part
of the younger, a friendly smile succeeded to the look of anxiety with which
he had been regarding him, and in the frank, cordial, familiar tone of that
period, when every man's cabin was the traveller's home and every strange
guest was treated with the hospitality of an old acquaintance, he said: Well
stranger, I'm right glad to welcome you back to life agin; for I war
begining
to fear your account with earthly matters had closed. By the Power
that made me! but you've had a narrow escape on't; and ef Betsey (putting his
hand on his rifle, which was lying by his side,) hadn't spoke out when she did,
that thar red skin varmint (pointing to the dead Indian) would have been
skulking now like a thief through yonder woods, with your crown piece
hanging
to his girdle.
A thousand thanks, returned the wounded man, pressing the hand of the
other as much as his strength would permit and accompanying it with a look
of gratitude more eloquent than words: A thousand thanks, sir, for your
timely shot, and subsequent kindness and interest in behalf of one you know
not, but one who will ever remember you with gratitude.
See here, stranger, I reckon you've not been long in these parts?
But a few days sir.
And you've come from a good ways east o' the Alleghanies?
I have.
I knew it. I'd have bet Betsey agin a bushel of corn, and that's large
odd's you know, that such war the fact, from the perticular trouble you've
taken to thank me for doing the duty of a man. Let me assure you,
stranger
,
that you're in a country now whar equality exists, and whar one man's
just as good as another, provided he is no coward, and behaves himself as he
should do; and whether stranger or not, is equally entitled to the assistance
of his fellows; perticularly when about being treed by such a sneaking
varmint
as that lying yonder. Besides, I don't want any body to thank me for
shooting Indians, for I always do it, whensomever I get a chance, as Betsey
would tell you, ef she could speak English; for somehow thar's no
perticular
agreement atween us, unless it's for each to make the most he can off
the other; and so far I reckon thar's a ballance in my favor, though the
wretches are ever trying desperate hard to get even. But come, stranger,
it won't do for you to be lying thar with that hole in your side, and so just
have patience a minute, till I've secured the top-knot of this beauty here,
and then I'll assist you down to yonder cabin, whar I doubt not you'll be
well cared for.
As he spoke, the old woodsman rose to his feet, drew his knife, and turning
to the dead Indian, to the surprise of the other, who was but little familiar
with Kentucky customs of that day, deliberately took off the scalp, which
he attached to his belt;
[1]
[1]
However barbarous such a proceeding may appear to thousands in the present day of
civilization and refinement, we can assure them, on the authority of numerous historians
of that period, that it was a general custom with the early settlers of the west, to take the
scalp of an Indian slain by their hand, whenever opportunity presented.
and then spurning the body with his foot, he
muttered
,
Go worthless dog and fill the belly of some wolf, and may your
cowardly
companion be soon keeping you company. Then as he turned to
the other, and noticed his look of surprise, he added: Well, stranger, I
reckon this business looks a little odd to you, coming from away beyond the
mountains as you do.
Why, if truth must be told, I confess it does, answered the other.
Don't doubt it, stranger; but you'll do it yourself afore you've wintered
here two seasons.
I must beg leave to differ with you on that point.
Well, well, we'll not quarrel about itit arn't worth while; but ef you
stay here two year, without scalping a red-skin and prehaps skinning one, I'll
agree to pay you for your time in bar-skins, at your own valuation.
I am much obliged to you for the offer, answered the young mana
faint smile illuminating his pale features; but I think it hardly probable I
shall remain in the country that length of time.
Not unless you have good care, I reckon, returned the other; for that
thar wound o' yourn arn't none o' the slightest; though I don't want you
to be skeered, for I've seen many a worse one cured;but come, I'll assist
you down to you cabin, and then I must be off, for I've got a good distance
to travel afore daylight to morrow; and bending down as he spoke, the
veteran
hunter placed his arm under the armpits of the wounded man, and
gently
raised him upon his feet.
Although extremely weak from loss of blood, the latter, by this means of
support, was enabled to walk at a slow pace, and the two descended the hill
the elder, the while, talking much, and endeavoring by his discourse to
amuse and cheer the spirits of the other.
Why, he continued, you think your case a hard one, no doubt,
stranger
,
but it's nothing compared to what some of us old settlers have seen and
been through with, without even winking as one may say. Within the last
few year, I've seen a brother and a son shot by the infernal red-skinshave
lost I don't know how many companions in the same waybeen shot at fifty
times myself, and captured several; and yet you see here I am, hale and
hearty, and just as eager, with Betsey's permission, to talk to the varmints
now as I war ten year ago.
But do you not weary of this fatiguing and dangerous mode of life?
inquired the other.
Weary, stranger? Lord bless ye! you're but a young hunter to ax such
a question as that. Weary, friend? Why I war born to itnursed to it
had a rifle for a play-thing, and the first thing I can remember perticularly,
war shooting a painter,
[2]
[2]
Backwoods name for panther.
and it's became as nateral and necessary as breathing;
and when I get so I can't follow the one, I want to quit the other. Weary
on't, indeed! Why, thar's more rale satisfaction in sarcumventing and
scalping
one o' them red heathen, than in all the amusement you could scare up
in a thick peopled, peaceable settlement in a life time.
By the way, said the other, pray tell me how you chanced to be so
opportune
in saving my life?
Why, you must know, I war just crossing through the wood back here
about a mile, on my way home from the Licks, when I came across the trail
of two Indians, whom I 'spected war arter no good; and as Betsey war itching
for something to do, I kind o' kept on the same way, and happened round on
the other side o' this ridge, just as the red varmints fired. I saw you fall,
but could'nt see them, on account o' the hill; but as I knowed they'd be for
showing themselves soon, I got Betsey into a comfortable position, and waited
as patiently as I could, until the ugly face of that rascal yonder showed clar,
when I told her to speak to him, which she did in rale backwood's dialect,
and he died a answering her. I then hurried round on the skirt of the wood,
loading Betsey as I went; but finding the other varmint had got off, I
hastened
to you and found you senseless: the rest you know.
By this time the two had reached nearly to the foot of the hill, and within
a hundred yards of the cabin, when they were joined by a tall, lank,
lanternjawed
,
awkward young man, some twenty years of age, with small, dark eyes,
a long, peaked nose, and flaxen hair that floated down over his ungainly
shoulders like weeping willows over a serub oak, and who carried in his
hand a rifle nearly as long and ugly as himself.
Why colonel, how are ye? good even' to ye, stranger, was his
salutation
,
as he came up. I war down by the tangle yonder, when I heerd
some firing, and some yelling, and I legged it home, ahead o' the old man, just
to keep the women folks in sperets, in case they war attacked, and get a pop
or so at an injen myself; but thank the Lord, they warn't thar; and so I
ventered on with long Nance here, to see whar they mought be.
Well, Isaac, returned the one addressed as colonel, I don't doubt your
being a brave lad, and I've had some opportunity o' seeing you tried; but
being as how thar's no Indians to shoot just now, I'll ax you to show your
good qualities in another way. This young man's been badly wounded, and
of you'll give him a little extra care, you'll put me under obligations which
I'll be happy to repay whensomever needed.
It don't need them thar inducements you've just mentioned, colonel, to
rouse all my sympathies for a wounded stranger. Rely on't he shan't suffer
for want o' attention, I assure you.
Rightly said, lad, rightly said; and so I leave him in your care.
Tender
my regard to your family, for I must be off, and can't stay to see them.
Then turning to the wounded man, he grasped his hand and said:
Stranger
,
thar's something about you I like; I don't say it of every man I meet;
and so you may put it down for a compliment or not, just as you please.
Give me your name?
Algernon Reynolds.
Algernon Reynolds, I hope we shall meet agin, though in a different
manner from our introduction; but whether or no, ef you ever need the
assistance
of either Betsey or myself, just make it known, and we'll do our
best for you. Good bye, sirgood bye, Isaac! and without waiting a
reply
,
the speaker sprang suddenly behind a cluster of bushes near which
the party stood, and the next moment he was lost to view in the
approaching
darkness.
A great man, that thar, sir!a might greaty man, observed Isaac,
gazing
with admiration after the retreating form of the hunter. Always
doing
good deeds, and never looking for pay nor thanks; may God give him
four-score and ten.
Amen to that! returned Reynolds. But pray tell me his name.
And you don't know him?
I do not.
And you didn't inquire his name?
I did not.
And ef you had, sir, ten to one but he'd a given you a fictitious one, to
keep clar o' your surprise and extra thanks. Why that, sir, war the great
white hunter, Colonel Daniel Boone.
Indeed! exclaimed Reynolds, in no feigned surprisethe very man I
have so longed to behold, for his fame has already extended far beyond the
Alleghanies. But come, friend Isaac, my wound grows painful; my exertions
thus far have weakened me exceedingly; and with your permission, I will
proceed to the cottage. Ah! I feel myself growing faintfainterfaint
and he sunk senseless into the other's arms, who, raising him apparently
without an effort, bore him into the house.
CHAPTER II.
THE INVALIDTHE QUANDARYNEW CHARACTERSTHE CONVERSATION
RETROSPECTION
.
When young Reynolds again regained his senses, it was some minutes
before he could sufficiently recover from the confusion of ideas consequent
upon his mishap, to follow up the train of events that had occured to place
him in his present position. His first recollection was of the attack made
upon him by the Indians; and it required considerable argument with himself,
to prove conclusively, in his own mind, that he was not even now a captive
to the savage foe. Gradually, one by one, each event recured to his mind,
until he had traced himself to the moment of his swooning in the arms of a
tall, ungainly young man, called Isaac; but of what had taken place since
where he now wasor what length of time had intervenedhe had not
the remotest idea. He was lying on his back, upon a rude, though by no
means uncomfortable bed, and, to the best of his judgement, within the four
walls of some cabin,though to him but two of the walls were visible, owing
to the quantity of skins of the buffaloe, bear and deer, which were
suspended
around the foot and front of his pallet. He was undressed, and, as he
judged upon applying his hand to the wounded part, had been treated with
care, for it came in contact with a nicely arranged bandage of cloth, which
was even now moist with some spirituous liquid. But what perplexed him
most, was the peculiar light, with the aid of which, though dim, he could
discern
every object so distinctly. It could not proceed from a candleit was
too strong and generally diffused; nor from the fireit was too gray, and
did not flicker; nor from the moonit was not silvery enough: from what
then did it proceed? It appeared the most like daylight; but this it could
not be, he reasoned, from the fact that he was wounded just before nightfall
unlessand the idea seemed to startle himunless he had lain in a
senseless
state for many hours, and it was indeed again morning. Determined,
however, to satisfy himself on this point, he attempted to rise for the
purpose
,
but found, to his no small surprise and regret, that he had not even
strength sufficient to lift his body from the bed; and, therefore, no
alternative
was left him, but to surmise whatever he chose, until some one should
appear to dissolve the riddle, which, he doubted not, would be ere long.
While these thoughts and surmises were rapidly passing through the mind
of our herofor such we must acknowledge him to behe had heard no
sound indicating the immediate vicinity of any other human being; and
turning his thoughts upon this latter, he was begining to doubt whether, at
the moment, he was not the only individual beneath the roof, when he heard
a step, as of some one entering another apartment, and directly following, a
female voice addressed to some person within.
Have ye looked to the stranger agin, Ella, and moisted his bandage?
I have, mother, was the answer, in a sweet and silvery voice, which
caused our wounded hero to start with a thrill of pleasing astonishment.
And how appeared he, Ella? continued the first speaker.
Why, I thought a little better, answered the same soft musical voice;
he seemed asleep, and entirely tranquil.
God send it, gal, for he's had a tougher, sartin. Three days, now,
nater's
bin tugging away for him, and I'd hate to see him die now, arter all,
and being the colonel's recommend, too; for Isaac says the colonel
injuncted
him strongly to take car o' him, and I'd do any thing to oblige sech a
man as him. He didn't appear to have his senses, I reckon?
I judged not, answered Ella; though from his tranquil sleep, I argued
favorably of his case.
Well, rejoined the other, it's my opine the crisis is at hand; and that
he'll ayther come out o' this
lethargick
as they calls ita rational, or
die straight off. 'Spose you look at him agin, Ella; or, stay, I'll look
myself
.
Poor feller! how he did rave and run on 'bout his troubles at home,
that's away off, until I all but cried, in reckoning how I'd feel ef it war Isaac
as war going on so. As the speaker concluded, she advanced to where the
object of her remarks was lying, and drawing aside, in a gentle manner, some
of the skins near his head, gazed upon him.
As will be surmised by the reader, not a syllable of the foregoing
colloquy
had been lost upon Reynolds, who heard with unbounded astonishment.
of his narrow escape from that dark valley whence none who enter again
return, and that three days had clapsed since he had fallen in to an
unconscious
state. He learned, too, with regret, that he had been communicating
mattersto what extent he knew notto others, which he wished safely
locked in his own breast; and judging it best, in the present instance, to
disemble
a little, that his informant might not be aware of his having
overheard
her, he feigned to be asleep on her approach.
He's sleeping yit, poor creater, continued the hostess, as she bent over
the bed of our hero, until he felt her breath upon his face. I hope it arn't
a going to be his final sleepso young, and so handsome too! but, O dear,
thar's no telling what them Injen bullets will do, for folks does say as how
they have a knack o' pizening them, that's orful to tell on! O Lord o'
marey
,
Ella, child, do come here! cried the dame suddenly. I do believe
he's coming to, for sartin.
This latter speech was occasioned by a movement of the pretended sleeper,
and the gradual opening of his eyes, with the rude stare of bewildered
surprise
natural to one in his supposed situation, and such as he would have
exhibited without feigning, had the hostess been present some ten minutes
sooner. Discovering, as already intimated, a returning consciousness on
the part of her guest, the good woman drew back her head, but still kept
her position by the bed, and her eyes fixed upon him, with an expression
which betrayed a fear lest her hopes of this important event should prove
entirely fallacious. Behind her, with a timid step, stole up Ella, and,
peeping
over her shoulders, encountered the eyes of the young man beaming upon
her, with a look which her acute perception advised her was any thing but
insane; and instantly starting back, the blood rushed upward, crimsoning
her neck and face with a beautiful glow. As for Reynolds, in whom, as
already
stated, the voice of Ella alone was sufficient to awaken a thrill of
pleasure, no sooner did he behold her, though but for an instant, than he
felt that thrill revived with a sensation, which, in spite of himself, he knew
was expressed in his own countenance; and he hastoned to speak, in order
as much as possible to conceal it.
Will you have the goodness, madam, to inform me where I am?
Thar, thar, Ella, child! exclaimed the matron, joyously; I told ye
soI know'd ithe's come to, for sartinthe Lord be praised! Then
addressing herself to Reynolds, she continued: Whar are you, stranger,
do you ax? Why you're in the cabin o' Ben Younkeras honest a man as
ever shot a painterwhose my husband, and father of Isaac Younker, what
brought ye here, according to the directions of Colonel Boone, arter you
war shot by the Injensthe varmintsthree days ago; and uncle of Ella
Barnwell here, as I calls daughter, 'cause her parents is dead, poor creaters,
and she hadn't a home to go to, but come'd to live with us, that are
fetching
her up in a dutiful way; and the good woman concluded her lucid
account of family matters with a sound that much resembled a person taking
breath after some laborious exertion.
And is it possible, answered Reynolds, who hastened to reply, in order
to conceal a strong inclination he felt for laughing, that I have lain here
three whole days?
Three days, and four nights, and part o' another day, jest as true as
buffaloes run in cane-brakes, and Injen varmints shoot white folks
whensomever
they git a chance, replied Mrs. Younker, with great volubility.
And Ella, the darling, has tended on ye like you war her own nateral
born brother; and Isaac, and Ben, and, myself ha' tended on ye too, while
you war raving and running on at an orful ratethough you've had the
best bed, and best o' every thing we've got in the house.
For all of which I am at a loss for terms to express my gratitude,
returned Reynolds, coloring slightly as he thought of the assiduous
attentions
he had unconsciously received from Ella Barnwell, who already began
to be an object in his eyes of no little importance.
Don't mention about gratitude, rejoined the kind hearted Mrs. Younker;
don't talk about gratitude, for a lettle favor, sech as every body's got a
right to, what comes into this country and gits shot by savages. We havn't
done no more for you than we'd a done for any body else in like
carcumstance
;
and, Lord, sir, the pleasure o' knowing you're a going to git
well agin, arter being shot by Injen's pizen bullets,
[3]
[3]
Mrs. Younker is the only authority we have for supposing Indians poison their bullets,
although we have read of poisoned arrows, and hence infer such a proceeding rather a
supposition
with her than a certainty.
is enough to pay us
twenty times overEh! Ella, child,don't you say so?
No one, save the gentleman himself, or his dearest friends, can be more
rejoiced at his favorable symptoms than myself, responded Ella, timidly, in
a voice so low, sweet and touching, that Reynolds, who heard without seeing
herfor she kept the rude curtain of skins between themfelt his heart
beat strangely, while his eyes involuntarily grew moist.
That's truly said, gat,truly said, I do believe, rejoined Mrs. Younker;
for she's hung over you, sir, (turning to the wounded man) night and day,
like a mother over her child, until we've had to use right smart authority
to make her go to bed, for fear as how she'd be sick too.
And if I live, answered Reynolds, in a voice that trembled with emotion,
and it is ever in my power to repay such disinterested attention and
kindness
,
I will do it, even to the sacrificing that life which she, together with
you and your family, good woman, has been the means, under God, of
preserving.
Under God, repeated the matron, that's true; I like the way you said
that, stranger; it sounds reverentialit's justand it raises my respect for
you a good deal; for all our doings is under God's permit; and she turned
her eyes upward, with a devout look, in which position she remained several
seconds, while Ella, with her fair hands clasped, followed her example, and
seemed, with her moving lips, engaged in prayer.
But come, resumed the dame, it won't do for you, stranger, to be
disturbed too much jest now; for you arn't any too strong, I reckon; and
so you'll jest take my advice, and go to sleep awhile, and you'll feel all the
better for't agin Ben and Isaac come home, which 'll be in two or three
hours.
Saying thus, Mrs. Younker again disposed the curtains so as to conceal
from Reynolds all external objects, and, together with Ella, withdrew,
leaving
him to repose. Whether he profited by her advice immediately, or
whether he meditated for some time on other matters, not excluding Ella,
we shall leave to the imagination of the reader, while we proceed, by way
of episode, to give a general, though brief account, of the Younker family.
Benjamin Younker was a man about fifty-five years of agetall
rawboned
very
muscularand although now passed the prime, even the
meridian
of life, was still possessed of uncommon strength. His form, never
handsome, even in youth, was how disfigured by a stoop in the shoulders,
caused by hard labor and rheumatism. His face corresponded to his body
being long and thin, with hollow cheeks, and high cheek bones,his eyes
were small and gray, with heavy eye-browshis nose long and pointed
his mouth large and homely, though expressive,and his forehead medium.
surmounted by a sprinkling of brown-gray hair. In speech he was
deliberate
,
generally pointed, and seldom spoke when not absolutely necessary.
He was a good farmersuch being his occupation; a keen hunter, whenever
he chose to amuse himself in that way; a sure marksman; and, although
ignorant in book learning, possessed a sound judgment, and a common sense
understanding on all subjects of general utility. He was a native of Eastern
Virginia, where the greater portion of his life had been spent in hunting
and agricultural pursuitswhere he was married and had been blessed with
two childrena son and a daughterof whom the former only was now living,
and has already been introduced to the reader as Isaacand whence, at the
instance of his wife and son, he removed, in the spring of 1779, into the
borders of Kentuckyfinally purchased and settled where he now resided,
and where, although somewhat exposed, he and his family had thus far
remained unmolested.
The dame, Mrs. Younker, was a large, corpulent woman of forty-five,
with features rather coarse and masculine, yet expressive of shrewdness and
courage, and, withal, a goodly share of benevolence. She was one of that
peculiar class of females, who, if there is any thing to be said, always claim
the privilege of saying it; in other words, an inveterate talker; and who,
if we may be allowed the phrase; managed her husband, and all around her,
with the length of her tongue. In the country where she was brought up
and known, to say of another, that he or she could compete with Ben
Younker's
wife in talking, was considered the extreme of comparison; and it is
not recorded that any individual ever presumed on the credulity of the
public sufficient to assert that the vocal powers of the said Mrs. Younker
were ever surpassed. Unlike most great talkers, she was rarely heard to
speak ill of any, and then only such as were really deserving of consure;
while her rough kind of pietyif we may so term itand her genuine
goodness
of heart, known to all with whom she came in contact, served to
procure
her a long list of friends. She possessed, as the reader has doubtless
judged from the specimen we have given, little or no education; but this
deficiency, in her eyes, as well as in most of those who lived on the frontiers,
was of minor consequencethe knowledge of hunting, farming, spinning
and weaving, being considered by far the more necessary, and, at the same
time, fully sufficient qualifications for discharging the social duties of life.
Of Isaac, with whom the reader is already slightly acquainted, we shall
not now speakother than to say, he could barely read and writerather
prefering that he develop his character in his own peculiar way. But there
is another, and though last, we trust will not prove least in point of interest
to the reader, with whom we shall close this episodical historynamely
Ella Barnwell.
The mother of Ellaa half sister to the elder Younkerdied when she
was very young, leaving her to the care of a kind and indulgent father, who,
having no other child, lavished on her his whole affections. At the
demise of his wife, Barnwell was a prosperous, if not wealthy merchant, in
one of the eastern cities of Virginia; and knowing the instability of wealth,
together with his desire to fit his daughter for any station in society, he
spared no expense necessary to educate her in all the different branches of
English usually studied by a female. To this was added drawing, needle
work, music and dancing; and as Ella proved by no means a backward
scholar in whatever she undertook, she was, at the age of fifteen, to use a
familiar phrase, turned out an accomplished young lady. But alas! she had
been qualified for a station which fate seemed determined not to let her
occupy; for just at this important period of her life, her father became
involved in an unfortunate speculation, that ended in ruin, dishonor, and his
own bodily confinement in prison for debts he could never discharge.
Naturally
high spirited and proud, this misfortune and persecution proved too
much for his philosophyand what was more, his reasonand in a state of
mental derangement, he one night hung himself to the bars of his prison
windowleaving his daughter at the age we have named, a poor,
unprotected
,
we might almost add friendless, orphan; for moneyless and friendless
are too often synonymous terms, as poor Ella soon learned to her
mortification
and sorrow.
Ella Barnwell the young, the beautiful and accomplished heiress, was a
very different personage from poor Ella Barnwell the bankrupt's daughter;
and those who had fawned around and flattered and courted the one, now
saw proper to pass the other by in silent contempt. It was a hard, a very
hard lesson for one at the tender age of Ella, who had been petted and
pampered all her life, and taught by her own simplicity of heart to look
upon all pretenders as real friendsit was a hard lesson, we say, for one of
her years, to be forced at one bold stroke to learn the world, and see her
happy artless dreams vanish like froth from the foaming cup; but if hard,
it was salutaryat least with herand instead of blasting in the bud, as it
might have done a frailer flower, it set her reason to work, destroyed the
romantic sentimentalism usually attached to females of that excitable age,
taught her to rely more upon herself and less upon others, more upon
actions and less upon words, and, in short, made a strong minded woman of
her at once. Yet this was not accomplished without many a heart rending
pang, as the briny tears of chagrin, disappointment, and almost hopeless
destitution, that nightly chased each other down the pale cheeks of Ella
Barnwell to the pillow which supported her feverish head, for weeks, and
even months, after the death of her father, could well attest.
The father of Ella was an Englishman, who had emigrated to this
country
a few years previous to his marriage; and as noue of his near relations
had seen proper to follow his example, Ella, on his side, was left entirely
destitute of any to whom she could apply for assistance and protection. On
her mother's side, she knew of none who would be likely to assist her so
readily as her half uncle, Benjamin Younker, whom she remembered as
having seen at the funeral of her mother, and who then, taking her in his
brawny arms, while the tears dimmed his eyes, in a solemn, impressive
manner told her, that in the ups and downs of life, should she ever stand in
need of another's strong arm or purse, to call on him, and that while blest
with either himself, she should not want. This at the time had made a
deep impression on her youthful mind, but latterly had been nearly or quite
obliterated, until retouched by feeling the want of that aid then so solemly
and generously tendered. Accordingly, after trying some of her supposed
true-hearted friends,who had more than once been sharers in her
generosity
,
and who, in return, had professed the most devoted attachmentbut
who now, in her distress, unkindly treated her urgent requests with cold
neglect,Ella hastened to make her situation known to her uncle; the
result of which had been her adoption into a family, who, if not graced with
that refinement and education to which she had been accustomed, at least
possessed virtues that many of the refined and learned were strangers to
namelytruth, honesty, benevolence and fidelity.
Ella, in her new situation, with her altered views of society in general,
soon grew to love her benefactor and his family, and take that sincere
pleasure in their rude ways, which, at one time, she would have considered
as next to impossible. With a happy faculty belonging only to the few, she
managed to work herself into their affections, by little and little, almost
imperceptibly, until ere they were aware of the fact themselves, she was
looked upon rather as a daughter and sister, than a more distant relation.
In sooth, the former appellation the reader has already seen applied to her,
during the recorded conversation of the voluble Mrs. Younkeran
appellation
which Ella ever took good care to acknowledge by the corresponding
title of mother.
About a year from the period of Ella's becoming a member of the family,
the Younkers had removed, as already stated, to what was then considered
the Far West, and had finally purchased and settled where we find them
in the opening of our story. In this expedition, Ellathough somewhat
reluctantlyhad accompanied themhad remained with them ever since
and was nownotwithstanding her former lady-like mode of lifeby the
prime tuition of Mrs. Younkerregularly installed into all the mysteries
of milking, churning, sewing, baking, spinning and weaving. With this
brief outline of her past history, we shall proceed to describe her personal
appearance, at the time of her introduction to the reader, and then leave
her to speak and act for herself, during the progress of this drama of life.
Eighteen years of sunshine and cloud, had served to mould the form of
Ella Barnwell into one of peculiar beauty and grace. In height she was
a little above five feet, had a full round bust, and limbs of that beautiful and
airy symetry, which ever give to their possessor an appearance of etherial
lightness. Her complexion was sufficiently dark to entitle her to the
appellation
of brunette, though by many it would have been thought too light,
perhaps, owing to the soft rich transparency of her skin, through which,
by a crimson tint, could be traced the tell-tale-blood, on the slightest
provocation
tending to excitement. Her features, if examined closely, could
not be put down as entirely regular, owing to a very slight defect in the
mouth, which otherwise was very handsome, and graced with two plump,
pretty, half pouting lips. This defect, however, was only apparent when
the countenance was in stern repose; and, as this was but seldom, when in
company with others, it was of course but seldom observed. The
remainder
of her features were decidedly good, and, seen in profile, really
beautiful
.
Her eye was a full, soft, animated hazel, that could beam tenderly
with love, sparkle brilliantly with wit, or flash scornfully with anger; but
inclining more to the first and second qualities than the last. Her
eye-brows
were well defined, and just sufficiently arched to correspond with the
eyes themselves. Her forehead was prominent, of a noble cast, and added
dignity to her whole appearance. Her hair was a rich, dark brownfine
and glossyand although neatly arranged about the head, evidently
required
but little training to enable it to fall gracefully about her neck in
beautiful
ringlets. The general expression of her face, was a soft bewitching
playfulness, that, combined with the half timid, benevolent look, beaming
from her large, mild, hazel eye, invariably won upon the beholder at the
first glance, and increased upon acquaintance. Her voice we have already
spoken of as possessing a silvery sweetness; and if one could be moved at
merely seeing her, it only required this addition to complete the charm.
To all of the foregoing, let us add an ardent temperamentcapable of the
most tender, lasting and devoted attachment, when once the affections were
placed on an objecta sweet disposition, modest deportment, and graceful
manners, and you have the portrait in full of Ella Barnwell, the orphan, the
model of her sex, and the admiration of all who knew her.
CHAPTER III.
YOUNKER'S CABINTHE INTERVIEWTHE TALE AND FATAL SECRET.
The dwelling of Benjamin Younker, as already mentioned, stood at the
base of a hill, on the margin of a beautiful valley, and within a hundred feet
of a lucid stream, whose waters finding their source in the neighbouring hills,
rushed down, all gleesome and sparkling, over a limestone bed, and
From morn till night, from night till morn,
sung gentle melodies for all who chose to listen.
The building itself though rough, both externally and internally, was
what at that period was termed a double cabin; and in this respect, entitled
to a superiority over most of its neighbors, which could only be defined in
the singular number. As this may serve for a representative of the houses
or cabins of the early settlers of Kentucky, we shall proceed to describe its
stucture and general appearance somewhat more minutely than might
otherwise
be deemed necessary.
The sides of the cottage in question, were composed of logsrough from
the woods where they had been felledwith the bark still clinging to them,
and without having undergone other transformation than being cut to a
certain
length, and knotched at either end, so as to sink into each other, when
crossed at right angles, until their bodies met, thereby forming a structure
of compactness, strength and solidity. Some ten or twelve feet from the
ground, the two upper end logs of the cabin projected a foot or eighten
inches
beyond the lower, and supported what were called
butting poles
poles
which crossed these projections at right angles, and, extending along the
front and back of the building, formed the eves or basis of the roof. This
latter was constructed by gradually shortening the logs at either end, until
those which crossed them, as we said before, at right angles, came together at
an angle of forty-five degrees, and the last one formed the ridge-pole or
comb of the whole. On these logs, lapping one over the other, and the lower
tier resting against the butting poles, were laid slabs or clapboarda species
of plank split from some stright-grained treeabout four feet long, and from
three to four wide. These were secured in their places by logs in turn
resting on them, at certain intervals, and answering the purpose of nails;
necessity requiring these latter articles of convenience to be dispensed with
in the early settlements of the West. As the cabin was double, two doors
gave enterance from without, one into either apartment. These entrances
were formed by cuting away the logs for the space of three feet by six, and
were closed by rude doors, made of rough slabs, pinned strongly to heavy
cross bars, and hung on hinges of the same material. These, like the rest
of the building, were rendered, by their thickness, bullet proofso that when
closed and bolted, the house was capable of withstanding an ordinary attack
of the Indians. With the exception of one window, opening into the
apartment
generally occupied by the family, and flanked by a heavy shutter, the
doors and chimney were the only means through which light and air were
admitted. These were all firmly secured at nightthe unsettled and
exposed
state of the country, and the dangerous proximity of the pioneers to
the ruthless savage, particularly those without the forts, rendering necessary,
on their part, the most vigilant caution.
The internal appearance of the cabin corresponded well with the
external
.
The apartment occupied by the family during the day, where the
meals where cooked and served, and the general household affairs attended
to, was very homely, and might, if contrasted with some of the present time,
be termed almost wretched; though considered at the period of which we
write, rather above than below the ordinary. The floor was composed of
what by the settlers were termed puncheons; which were made by splitting
in half trees of some eighten inches in diameter, and hewing the faces of
them as regular as possible with the broad-axe. These were laid, bark side
downward upon sleepers running crosswise for the purpose, and formed at
least a dry, solid and durable, if not polished, floor. At one end of the cabin
was the chimney, built of logs, outside the apartment, but connecting with
it by a space cut away for the purpose. The back, jambs, and hearth of
this chimney were of stone, and put together in a manner not likely to be
imitated by masons of the present day. A coarse kind of plaster filled up
the surrounding crevices, and served to keep out the air and give a rude
finish to the whole.
The furniture of the Younkers, if the title be not too ambiguous, would
scarcely have been coveted by any of our modern exquisities, even had they
been living in that ago of straight-forward common sense. A large rough
slab, split from some tree, and supported by round legs set in auger holes,
had the honor of standing for a tablearound which, like a brood of
chickens
around their mother, were promiscuously collected several
three-legged
stools of similar workmanship. In one corner of the room were a few
shelves, on which were ranged some wooden trenchers, pewter plates, knives
and forks, and the like necessary articles, while a not very costly collection of
pots and kettles took a less dignified and prominent position beneath.
Another
corner was occupied by a bed, the covering of which was composed of
skins of different animals, with sheetings of home-made linen. In the
vicinity
of the bed, along the wall, was a row of pegs, suspending various
garments
of the occupants, all of whichwith the exception of a few articles,
beloging to Ella, procured for her before the death of her fatherwere of
the plainest and coarsest description. A churna clockthe latter a very
rare thing among the pioneers of Kentuckya footwheel for spinning flax
a small mirrortogether with several minor articles of which it is needless
to speakcompleted the inventory of the apartment. From this room were
two exits, beside the outer doorone by a ladder leading above to a sort of
attic chamber, where were two beds; and the other through the wall into
the adjoining cabin, whither our hero had been borne in a state of
insensibility
on the night of his mishap, and where he was for the second time
presented
to the reader. This latter place was graced with a beda loom for
weavinga spinning-wheela large oaken chest, and a few rough benches.
Such, reader, as our description has set forth, was the general appearance
of Younker's dwelling, both without and within, in the year of our Lord 1781;
and, moreover, a facsimile of an hundred others of the period in question
so arbitrary was necessity in making one imitate the other. But to resume
our story.
In the after part of a day as mild and beautiful as the one with which we
opened our narrative, but some four weeks later, Ella Barnwell, needle,
work in hand, was seated near the open door leading from the apartment
first described to the reader. Her head was bent forward, and her eyes
3
were apparently fixed upon her occupation with great intentnessthough
a close observer might have detected furtive glances occasionally thrown
upon a young man, with a pale and somewhat agitated countenance, who
was pacing to fro on the ground without. With the exception of these two,
no person was within sightthough the rattling of aloom in the other
apartment
or cabin, betokened the vicinity of the industrious hostess.
For some moments the young man,a no less personage than our
heropaced back and forth like one whose mind is harrowed by some
disagreeable
thought; then suddenly halting in front of the doorway, and in a
voice which, though not intended to be so, was slightly tremulous, he addressed
himself to the young lady, in words denoting a previous conversation.
Then I must have said some strange things EllaI beg pardonMiss
Barnwell.
Have I not requested you, Mr. Reynolds, on more than one occasion,
to callme Ella, instead of using the formality of miss, which rather belongs to
strangers in fashionable society, than to those dwelling beneath the same
roof, in the wilds of Kentucky? responded the person addressed, in a tone
of pique, while she raised her head and let her soft, dark eyes rest
reproachfully
on the other.
Well, well, Ella, rejoined Reynolds, I crave pardon for my
heedlessness
,
and promise you, on that score at least, no more cause for offence in
future.
Offence! said Ella quickly, catching at the word: O nononot
offence
,
Mr. Reynolds! I should be sorry to take offence at what was meant in
all kindness, and with true respect; but somehow Ithat isperhaps it may
not appear so to othersbut Ito me it appears studiedandandcold;
and as she concluded, in a hesitating manner, she quickly bent her head
forward
,
while her cheek crimsoned at the thought, that she might, perhaps, have
ventured too far, and laid herself liable to misconstruction.
And yet, Ella, returned Reynolds, somewhat playfully, you resemble
many others I have known, in preaching what you do not practice. You
request me to lay aside all formality, and address you by your name only;
while you, in that very request, apply to me the title you consider as studied,
formal and cold.
You have reference to my saying
Mr.
Reynolds, I presume, answered
Ella; but I see no analogy between the two; as in addressing you thus, I do
but what, under the circumstances, is proper; and what, doubtless, habit has
rendered familiar to your ear; while, on the other hand, no one ever thinks
of calling me any thing but Ella,or at the extreme, Ella Barnwelland
hence all superfluities grate harshly.
Even complimentary adjectives, eh? asked Reynolds, with an arch look.
Even those, Mr. Reynolds; and those most of all are offensive I assure
you.
I thought all of your sex were fond of flattery.
Then have you greatly erred in thinking.
But thus says general report.
Then, sir, general report is a slanderer, and should not be credited.
Those who court flattery, are weak-minded and vain; and I trust you do
not so consider all our sex.
God forbid, answered Reynolds, with energy, that I should think thus
of all, or judge any too harshly!but there may be causes to force one into
the conviction, that the exceptions are too few to spoil the rule.
I trust such is not your case, responded, Ella, quickly, while her eyes
rested on the other with a searching glance.
No one is required to criminate himself in law, replied Reynolds,
evasively
,
with a sigh; and then immediately added, as if anxious to change the
topic: But I am eager for you to inform me what I said during my
delirium
.
O many things, returned Ella, the half of which I could not repeat;
but more particularly you spoke of troubles at home, and often repeated the
name Elvira, with great bitterness. Then you would run on incoherently,
for some time, about pistols, and swords, and end by saying that the quarrel
was justthat you were provoked to it, until it became almost self defence
and that if he died, his blood would be on his own head.
Good heavens, Ella! did I indeed say this? exclaimed Reynolds, with
a start, while his features became deadly pale. Did I say more? did I
mention
farther particulars?speak! tell metell me truely!
Not in my hearing, answered Ella, while her own face blanched at the
sudden vehemence of the other.
Well, well, do not be alarmed! said Reynolds, evidently somewhat
relieved
,
and softening his voice, as he noticed the change in her countenance;
people sometimes say strange things, when reason, the great regulator of
the tongue, is absent. What construction did you put upon my words, Ella?
Why in sooth, replied Ella, watching his features closely as she spoke,
I thought nothing of them, other than to suppose you might formerly have
had some trouble; and that in the chaos of wild images crowding your brain.
after being attacked and wounded by savages, it was natural some of these
images should be of a bloody nature.
Then you did not look upon the words as having reference to a reality.
No! at the time I did not.
At the time? repeated Reynolds, with a slight fall of countenance; have
you then seen or heard any thing since to make you suspicious?
Nothinguntil
Well, well, said Reynolds, quickly, as she hesitated, speak out and
fear nothing!
Until but now, when you became so agitated, and spoke so vehemently
on my repeating your delirious language, added Ella, concluding the
sentence
.
Ha! ejaculated Reynolds, as if to himself, sanity has done more to
betray me than delirium. Well, Ella, continued he, addressing her more
direct, you have heard enough to make you doubtful of my character;
therefore you must needs hear the whole, that you may not judge me worse
than I am; but remember, withal, the tale is for your ear alone.
Nay, Mr. Reynolds, if it be a secret I would rather not have it in
keeping, answered Ella.
It is a secret, returned Reynolds, solemnly, with his eyes cast down in
a dejected manner; a secret, I would to God I had not myself in keeping!
but hear it you must, Ella, for various reasons, from my lips, and then we
part(his voice slightly faltered) we partforever!
Forever! gasped Ella, quickly, with a choking sensation, while her
features grew pale, and then suddenly flushed, and her work unconsciously
dropped from her hand. Then, as if ashamed of having betrayed her
feelings
,
she became confused and endeavored to cover the exposure by adding
with a forced laugh: But realy, Mr. Reynolds, I must crave pardon for
my silly behaviorbut your manner of speaking, somehow, startled me
andand Ibefore I was awarereally, it was very sillyindeed it was,
and I pray you overlook it!
Were circumstances not as I have too much reason to fear they are,
ceturned Reynolds, slowly, sadly and impressively, with his eyes fixed
earnestly
and even tenderly upon the other, I would not exchange that simple
expression of yours, Ella, for a mine of gold. By that alone you have
spoken
volumes, and told me what I already feared was true, but hoped was
otherwise. Nay, turn not your head away, Ella,dear Ella, if you will
allow me so to address youit is better, under the circumstances, that we
speak plain and understandingly, as the time of our final separation draweth
near. I fear that my manner and language have hitherto too much
expressed
my feelings, and encouraged hopes in you that can never be
realized
.
Oh! Ella, if such be the case, I would to God, for your dear sake, we
had never met!and the thought hereafter, that I have caused you a pang,
will add its weight of anguish to my already bitter lot. The days that I
have spent beneath this hospitable roof, and in your sweet presence, are so
many of bright sunshine, in a life of cloud and storm; but will only serve, as
I recal them, to make the remainder, by contrast, seem more dark and
dreary. From the first I learned you were an orphan, and my sympathy
was aroused in your behalf; subsequently, I listened to your recital of grief
and trouble and cold treatment by the world,told in an artless manner
and in spite of me, in spite of my struggles to the contrary, I discovered
awakening in my breast a feeling of a stronger nature. Had my wound
permitted
,
I should have torn myself from your presence then, with the
endeavor
,
if such a thing were possible, to forget you; but, alas! fate ordered
otherwise, and the consequence I fear will be to add sorrow to both. But one
thing, dear Ella, before I go farther, let me ask: Can you, and will you forgive
me, for the manner in which I have conducted myself in your company?
I have nothing to forgive; and had I, it should be forgiven, answered
Ella, sweetly, in a timid voice, her hands unconsciously toying with her
needle-work, and her face half averted, whereon could be traced the
suppressed
workings of internal emotion.
Thank you, Ellathank you, for taking a weight from my heart. And
now, ere I proceed with what to both of us will prove a painful revelation,
let me make one request morea foolish one I knowbut one I trust you
will grant nevertheless.
Name it, said Ella, timidly, as the other paused.
It is, simply, that in judging me by the evidence I shall give against
myself
,
you will lean strongly to the side of mercy, and, when I am gone, think
of me rather as an unfortunate than criminal being.
You alarm me, Mr. Reynolds, with such a request! answered Ella,
looking up to the other with a pale, anxious countenance. I know not the
meaning of it! and, as I said before, I would rather not have your secret in
keepingthe more so as you say the revelation will be a painful one to both.
For a moment the young man paused, as though undecided as to his reply,
while his countenance expressed a look of mortified regret really painful to
beholdso much so, that Ella, moved by this to a feeling of compassion,
said:
I perceive my answer wounds your feelingsI meant no harm; go on
with your storyI will listen, and endeavor to concede all you desire.
Thank youagain thank you!returned the other energetically, with
emotion. I will make my narative brief as possible. Saying which, he
entered the apartment where the other was sitting, and seating himself
a few feet distant from her, after some little hesitation, as if to bring his
resolution
to the point, thus began.
I shall pass over all miner affairs of my life, and come at once to the
period and event which changed me from a happy youth, blessed with home
and friends, to a wandererI know not but an outlawon the face of the
earth. I was born in the state of Connecticut, A. D. 1759; and my father
being a man of property, determined on giving his childern (of whom there
were two, one older than myself) a liberal education, I was at an early
agesent
to a neighboring school, where I remained until turned of eighteen, and
then returned to my parents.
About this period, an old, eccentric ladya maiden aunt of my father
died, bequeathing to me, or rather to the second born of her nephew, Albert
Reynolds, which chaneed to be myselfthe bulk of her propertyin
value
some fifty thousand dollars; on condition, that between the ages of
eighteen
and twenty-two, I should marry a certain Elvira Longwortha lady some
three years my junior, for whom my great aunt had formed a strong
attachment
.
And the will further provided. That in case the said second born of
Albert Reynolds, either through the intervention of Providence, in removing
him from off the face of the earth, (so it was worded) and from among the
living, or through a mutual dislike of the parties concerned, did not between
the specified ages, celebrate, with due rejoicing, the said nuptials with the
said Elvira Longworth, the sum of twenty thousand dollars should be paid
over to the said Elvira, if living, and the remainder of the property (or in
case she was deceased) the whole should revert to the regular heirs at law.
Such was the willone of the most singular perhaps on recordwhich,
whatever the design of its author, was destined, by a train of circumstances
no one could forsee, to result in the most terrible consequences to those it
should have benefited. On the reading thereof, no little dissatisfaction was
expressed in regard to it, by numerous relatives of the deceased, each of
whom, as a matter of course, was expecting a considerable share of the old
lady's property, and all of whom, with but few exceptions, were nearer
akin than myself, and therefore, in that respect, more properly entitled to
it. As a consequence of the will, I, though innocent of its constructionfor
none could be more surprised at it than myselfbecame a regular target
for the ridicule, envy and hate of those who chanced to be disappointed
thereby. At the outset, I had no intention of seeking a title to the
property
,
by complying with the specification set forth at the instance of its late
owner, and only looked upon it as a piece of crack-brained folly, that would
serve for a nine days' comment and jest, and then be forgotten; but when I
saw, that instead of being treated with the courtesy and respect no conscious
act of mine had ever forfeited, I was ridiculed, sneered at, and looked upon
with jealousy and hate by those whose souls were too narrow to believe in
a noble actionand who, measuring and judging me by their own sordid
standards of avaricious justice, deemed I would spare no pains to legally rob
them, as they termed it,when I saw this, I say, my blood became heated,
my fiercer passions were roused, and I inwardly swore, that if it were now
in my power to accomplish what they feared, I would do it, though the lady
in question were a fright to look upon. In this decision I was rather
encoursged by my father, who being at the time somewhat involved, thought
it a feasible plan of providing for me, and then, by my aid, recovering from
his own peeuniary embarrassment.
As yet I had never seen Elvirashe living in an adjoining county, some
fifty miles distant, where my aunt, on a visit to a distant relative, first made
her acquaintance, and formed that singular attachment, peculiar to
eccentric
temperaments, which had resulted in the manner already shown.
Accordingly
,
one fine spring morning, I mounted my horse, and set forth to
seek my intended, and behold what manner of person she was of. Late at
night I arrived at the village where she residedstabled my beasttook
lodging at a hotelinquired out her residenceand, betimes the morning
following, made my obeisance in her presence, with that bashful, awkward
graceif I may be allowed so paradoxical a termwhich my youth, present
purpose, and former good breeding combined, were calculated to produce.
I was more embarassed still a minute after, when having given my name,
and hinted at the singular document of the old lady deceased, I found my
fair intended, as well as her family, in total ignorance of my meaning; and
could I at the moment have been suddenly transferred to my horse, I do not
think I should have paused to make the necessary explanation. As it was,
there was no alternative; and accordingly begging a private interview with
Elvira, I disclosed the whole secret, which she listened to for a time with
unfeigned surprise, and then bursting into a wild, ringing laugh, declared
it to be `The funniest and most ridiculous thing she ever heard of.'
She was a gay, airy, beautiful beingfresh in the bloom of some fifteen
summerswith a bright, sparkling, roguish eyelong, floating, auburn
ringletsa musical voicea ringing laughthe latter frequent and long,
so that I soon felt it needed not the stimulating desire of wealth and revenge
to urge me on to that, which, under any circnmstances, would have been
by no means disagreeable. To make a long story short, I called upon her
at stated periods, and within a year from our first acquaintance, we were
plighted to each other. About this time my father, together with some
influential friends, procured me a lieutenancy, to serve in our present
struggle for the maintainance of that glorious independence, drawn up by
the immortal Jefferson, and signed by the noble patriots, without a
trembling
hand, unless caused by age, some two years before. I served a two
years' campaign, and fought in the unfortunate and bloody battle of Camden,
which resulted, as doubtless you have heard, in great loss and defeat to the
American arms. Shortly after the action commenced, our captain was
killed, and the command of the company devolved on me. I fulfilled my
duties to the best of my ability, and myself and men were in the hottest of
the fight. But from some alledged misdemeanor, whereof I can take my
oath I was guiltless, I was afterward very severely censured by one of my
superior officers, which so wounded my feelings, that I at once resigned
my commission and returned to my native state.
On arriving at home, to my surprise and mortification, I learned that
my intended was just on the eve of marriage with a cousin of minea
worthless
fellowwho, urged on by the relatives interested, and his own desire
of acquiring the handsome competence of twenty thousand dollars, had taken
advantage of my absence to calumniate me, (in which design he had been
aided by several worthy assistants) and supplant me in the good gracesI
will not say affections, as I think the term too strongof Elvira Longworth.
The lady in question I do not think I ever lovedat least as I
understand
the meaning of that termand nowthat she had listened to slander
against me while absent, and without waiting to know whether it would be
refuted on my return, had engaged herself to anotherI cared less for than
before;but my pride was touched, that I should be thus tamely set aside
for one I heartily despised; and this, together with my desire to thwart the
machinations of the whole intriguing clique arrayed against me, determined
me, if feasible, to regain the favor of Elvira, and have the ceremony
performed
as soon as possible. This, Ella, I know you think, and I am ready
to admit, was wrongvery wrong;but I make no pretensions to be other
than a frail mortal, liable to all the crrors appertaining thereto; and were
this the only sin to be laid to my charge, my conscience were far less
troublesome than now.
I determined, I say, to regain my former place in her favor or
affection
whichever
you likeand, to be brief, I apparently succeeded. The
day was set for our marriage, which, for several reasons unnecessary to
bedetailed
,
was to take place at the residence of my father; and, as the will
specified it should be with all due rejoicings, great preparations were
accordingly made, and a goodly number of guests invited.
At length the day camethe eventful day. Never shall I forget it;
nor with what feelings, at the appointed hour, I entered the crowded hall,
where the ceremony was to take place, with Elvira leaning tremblingly on
my arm, her features devoid of all color, and approached the spot where
the divine stood ready to unite us forever. All eyes were now fixed upon
us, and the marriage rite was begun amid that deep and almost awful
solemnity
,
which not unfrequently characterizes such proceedings on peculiar
occasions, when every spectator, as well as the actors themselves, feel a
secret awe steal over them, as though about to witness a tragic, rather than
a civil performance.
I have mentioned that Elvira trembled violently when we entered the
hall; but this became increased after the divine commenced the ritual; so
that when I had answered in the affirmative the solemn question pertaining
to my taking the being by my side as mine till death, her trepidation had
become so great that it was with difficulty I could support her; and when
the same interrogative was put to her, a silence of some moments followed,
and then the answer came forth, low and trembling, but still sufficiently
distinct to be generally understood, and was, to the unbounded astonishment
of all, in the negative!
In the negative! exclaimed Ella, suddenly, who had during the last
fow sentences been unconsciously leaning forward, as though to devour each
syllable as it was uttered, and who now resumed her former position with a
long drawn breath. In the negative say you, AlgeraaMr. Reynolds?
Call me Algernon, Ella, I pray you; it sounds more sweet and friendly.
Ay, she answered in the negative. Heavens! what a shock was there for
my proud nature! To be thus publicly insulted and rejectedto be thus
made the butt and ridicule of fools and knavesa mark for the jests and
sneers of friend and foe! Gods! how my blood boiled and coursed in lava
streams through my heated veins! I saw it all. I was the dupe of some
artful design, intended to stigmatise me forever; and wild with a thousand
terrible brain-searing thoughts. I rushed from the hall to my own apartment,
seized upon my pistols, and was just in the act of putting a period to my
existence, when my arm was suddenly grasped, and my hated rival and
cousin stood before me.
`Fiend!' cried I in frenzy, `devil in human shape!do you seek me in
the body? What want you here?
His features were pale with excitement, and his lips quivered as he
made answer: `Be calm, Algernon, be calm; it was meant but in jest!'
`Jest!' screamed I; `do you then own to a knowledge of it, villain?were
you its author?then take that, and answer it as you dare!'and as I spoke,
with the breech of my undischarged pistol, I stretched him senseless at my
feet. Under the excitement of the moment, I was about to take more
terrible
revenge, when others suddenly rushed inseized and disarmed me
bore my rival from my sightand, to conclude, placed me in bed, where I
was confined for three weeks by a delirious fever, and then only recovered
as it were by a miracle.
During my convalescence, I learned that my cousin, soon after my
return, had been privately married to Elvira; and prompted by his evil
genius, and some of my enemies, had induced his wife to enter into the plot,
the result of which has already been briefly narrated. I do not think she
did it through malice, and doubtless little thought of the consequences that
were destined to follow; but whether so or no, her punishment has, I think,
been fully adequate to her crime; for the last I heard of her, she was an
inmate of a mad-house,remorse for her conduct, the abuse heaped upon
her by society, and her own severe fright at the termination of the
stratagem
,
naving driven her insane. Now comes the most tragic part of my
narrative.
When so far recovered as to again be abroad, I was cautioned by my
parents against any rash act; and for their sakes, I promised to be
temperate
in all my movements; but, alas! how little we know when we promise,
what we may be in sooth destined to perform. On my father's estate, about
a mile distant from his residence, was a beautiful grovewhither, for
recreation
,
I was in the habit of repairing at all periods of my life; and where,
so soon as my strength permitted, after my sickness, I rambled daily. About
ten days from my recovery, as I was taking my usual stroll through these
grounds, I was suddenly confronted by my cousin. His cheeks were hollow
and pale, and his whole appearance haggard in the extreme. His eyes, too,
seemed to flash, or burn, as it were, with an unearthly brightness; and his
voice, as he addressed me, was hoarse, and his manner hurried.
`We meet well,' he said, `well! I have watched for you long.'
`Away I' cried I, `tempt me no moreor something will follow I may
regret hereafter!'
`Ha, ha, ha!' laughed he, in derision, with that peculiar hollow sound,
which even now, as I recall it, makes my blood run cold:`Say you so,
cousin?I came for that;' and again he laughed as before. `See here
see here!' and he presented, as he spoke, with the butts towards me, a brace
of pistols. `Here is what will settle all our animosities,' he continued;
`take your choice and be quick, or perchance we may be interrupted.'
`Are you mad,' cried I, `that you thus seek my life, after the wrongs
you have done me?'
`Mad!ha, ha!yes!yes!I believe I am,' he answered; `and my
wife is mad also. I did you wrong, I knowI went to apologiso for it, and
you struck me down. Whatever the offence, a blow I never did and never
will forgive;so take your choice, and be quick, for one or both of us must
never quit this place alive!'
`Away!' cried I, turning aside, `I will not stain my hands with the
blood of my kin. Go! the world is large enough to hold us both.'
`Coward!' hissed he; `take that then, and bare what I have borne;'
and with the palm of his hand he smote me on the cheek.
Gods! I could bear no more!I was no longer myselfI was
maddened
with passionand snatching a pistol from his hand, which was still
extended towards me, without scarcely knowing what I did, I exclaimed,
`Your blood be on your own head!'andandOh God!pardon me,
EllaIshot him through the body.
Ella, who had partly risen from her seat, and was listening with
breathless
attention, now uttered an exclamation of horror and sunk back, with
features ghastly pale; while the other, burying his face in his hands, shook
his whole frame with convulsive sobs. For some time neither spoke; and
then the young man, slowly raising his face, which was now a sad spectacle
of the workings of grief and remorse, again proceeded.
Horror strickenaghast at what I had doneI stood for a moment,
gazing upon him weltering in his blood, with eyes that burned and seemed
starting from their socketswith feelings that are indiscribableand then
rushing to, I endeavored to raise him, and learn the extent of his injury.
`Fly!' said he, faiutly, as I bent over him`fly for your life! I have
got my dueI am mortally woundedand if you remain, you will surely
be arrested as my murderer. Farewell, Algernonthe faull was mine
but this you cannot prove; and so leave meleave me, while you have
opportunity.'
His words were true,I felt them in force,if he died I would be
arraigned as his murderer,I had no proof to the contrary,circumstances
would be against me,I should be imprisonedcondemnedperhaps
executed
a
loathsome sight for gaping thousands;I could not bear the thought
I might escapeay, would escapeand bidding him a hasty farewell, I
turned and fled. Not a hundred rods distant I met my father; and falling
on my knees before him, I hurriedly related what had transpired, and begged
advice for myself, and his immediate attendance upon my cousin. He turned
pale and trembled violently at my narration, and, as I concluded, drew forth
a purse of gold, which he chanced to have with him, and placing it in my
hand, exclaimed:
`FlysonchildAlgernonfor God's sake, fly!'
`Whither, father?'
`To the far western wilds, beyond the reach of civilizationat least
beyond the reach of justiceand spare my old eyes the awful sight of
seeing
a beloved son arraigned as a criminal!'
`And my mother?'
`You cannot see herit might cost you your life,farewell!' and with
the last word trembling on his lips, he embraced me fondly, and we parted
perchance forever.
I fled, feeling that the brand of Cain was on me; that henceforth my life
was to be one of remorse and misery; that I was to be a wanderer upon the
face of the earthmayhap an Ishmael, with every man's hand against me.
To atone in a measure to my conscience for the awful deed I had
committed
,
I knelt upon the earth and swore, by all I held sacred, in time and
eternity, that if the wound inflicted upon my cousin should prove mortal, I
would live a life of celibacy, and become a wandering pilgrim in the western
wilds of America, till God should see proper to call me hence.
Andand did the wound prove mortal? asked Ella, breathlessly.
Alas! I know not, Ella, and I fear to know. Four months have passed
since then; and after many adventures, hardships, sufferings, and
hair-breadth
escapes, you see me here before you, a miserable man.
But not one guilty of murder, Algernon, said Ella, energetically.
I know not thatGod grant it true!
O then do not despair, Algernon!trust in God, and hope for the best.
I have a presentiment that all will yet be well.
Amen to that, dear Ella; and a thousand, thousand thanks, for your
sweet words of hope; they are as balm to my torn and bleeding heart; but
until I
know
my fate, we must not meet again; and if, oh God! and if the
worst be true,thenthen farewell forever? But who comes here?
CHAPTER IV.
THE STRANGERTHE DISGUISETHE SUPPERTHE SECRETTHE SUSPICIONTHE
DISCUSSIONTHE CURSE.
The closing sentence of the preceeding chapter was occasioned by the
glimpse of a man's shadow, that for a moment swept along in the sunlight,
some twenty paces distant from the speaker, and then suddenly disappeared
by being swallowed up in the larger and more stationary shade thrown from
the cottage by the sinking sun. Scarcely were the words alluded to uttered.
ere the sound of a step was heard close by the door, and the next moment
the cause of the shadow and remark divided the light of the entrance.
The individual in question, was a stout built, broad-shouldered, athletic
mansome five feet nine inches in heightwhose age, judging from his
general
appearance, as well as his features, might range from twenty-seven to
thirty years. At the moment when he appeared before our acquaintances
of the foregoing chapter, his right arm was held in a manner so as to screen
the lower portion of his face, while a hat, not very much unlike those of
the present day, pressed down upon his forehead, left but little of his
countenance
,
and that mainly about the eyes, visible. With the latter he gave
a quick, searching, suspicious glance at the two before him; and then, as if
satisfied he had nothing to fear, lowered his arm and raised his hat from his
forehead, exposing a physiognomy by no means pleasing to one skilled in
reading the heart thereby. His complexion was swarthyhis skin coarse
and the general expression of his features repulsive in the extreme; said
expression
arising from the combination of three distinct parts of his
countenance
namely:
the forehead which was low and receding from two
darkred
shaggy eyebrows,the eyes themselves, which were small, bloodshot
and very fiery; and the mouth, which was narrow, thin-lipped and
habitually
contracted into a sneering, sinister smile. In this general expression,
was combined cunning, deceit, treachery and bloodthirsty ferocityeach one
of which passions were sufficiently powerful, when fully excited, to
predominate
over the whole combination. The hair of his head was short, thick,
coarse and red, grew low upon his forehead, and, in its own peculiar way,
added a fierceness to his whole appearance. Nature had evidently designed
him for a villain of the darkest die; and on the same principle that she gives
a rattle to a certain venemous snake, that other creatures may be warned
of the deadly fang in time to avoid itso had she stamped him with a look
wherein his passions were mirrored, that those who gazed thereon might
know with whom and what they had to do, and be prepared accordingly.
The costume too of the stranger, was rather singular, and worthy of note
being composed, for the most part, of an extraordinary long frock or
overcoat
more
like the gown of some monk than eitherwhich reached almost
down to the moccasins covering his feet, and was laced together in front,
nearly the whole length, by thongs of deerskin. Around the waist passed a
rude belt of the same materialcarelessly tied at one sidein which,
contrary
to the usual custom of that period, there was not cofined a single
weapon
,
not even so much as a knife; and this fact, together with the general
appearance of the individual and his own suspicious movements, led
Algernon
,
almost at the first glance, to consider the long frock or gown an article
of disguise, beneath which the stranger was doubtless doubly armed and
costumed
in a very different manner.
As the eyes of the new comer, after closely scanning Reynolds, rested
for the first time upon Ella, there flashed across his ugly features an
expression
of admiration and surprisewhile the look of suspicion which he had
previously exhibited, seemed entirely to disappear. Turning to the young
man, who on his appearance had risen from his seat, and now stood as if
waiting to know his commands, in a voice evidently much softened from its
usual tones, but still by no means pleasant and harmonious, he said:
Will you be kind enough to inform me, sir, to whom this dwelling
belongs
?
It is owned, I believe, by one Benjamin Younker, answered Algernon,
in a cavalier manner, still eyeing the other closely.
May I ask his occupation?
He is a farmer, sira tiller of the soil.
Will you favor me with a description of his personal appearance?
I can do so, replied Algernon, somewhat surprised at the question,
provided I know the motive of inquiry to be a good one.
It is no other, I assure you, returned the stranger. It was simply
prompted by curiosity.
Well, then, the individual in question is a man who has seen more than
fifty years;is tallraw-bonedmuscularhas a stoop in the shouldera
long thin facesmall eyes, and hair slightly gray.
Has he any sons? inquired the stranger.
One, a youth of twenty, who bears a strong resemblance to his father.
Daughters?
He has no other child.
Then this young ladyslightly bowing to Ella.
Is a more distant relationa niece, answered Ella, rising as she spoke
and disappearing from his sight.
A beautiful creature! said the stranger musingly as if to himselfa
beautiful creature! Pardon me, added he, again addressing Algernon, but
may I inquire concerning yourself?
I am a guest here, sir.
Ahayes; a hunter I presume?
I sometimes hunt.
Pardon me againbut are there more indwellers here than you have
mentioned?
One, sirthe good dame of the cottage.
For a moment or two the stranger mused, as if conning over in his mind
all that had been said, and then observed: Doubtless you think me very
inquisitive; but I had a reason for all my questions, and I thank you
sincerely
,
sir, for your prompt replies. It is now growing late; the sun will
presently be down; and as I am a travellera stranger in this regionI
would rather not persue my journey farther, providing I could be
entertained
here for the night.
As to that, I am unable to answer, said Algernon; but if you will step
within, I will make the necessary inquiries.
Thank you, replied the stranger, with a show of cordiality, thank
you, and he immediately entered the cottage.
Those days, as before said, were the good old days of hospitality, and,
as far as population went, of social intercourse also, when every man's
cabin
was the stranger's home, and every neighbor every neighbor's friend.
There were no distinct grades of society then as now, from which an honest
individual of moral worth must be excluded because of povertya good
character for upright dealing being the standard by which all were judged;
and whoever possessed this, could rank equally with the best, though poor
as the beggar Lazarus. Doubtless intellect and education then, as well as at
the present day, held in many things a superiority over imbecility and
ignorance
;
but there were no distinct lines of demarcation drawn; and in the
ordinary routine of intercourse one with another, there was no superiority
claimed and none aknowledged. And this arose, probably, from the necessity
each felt of there being a general unitya general blending together of all
qualifications, as it were, into one body politicby which each individual
became an individual member of the whole, perfect in his place, and capable
of supplying what another might chance to need; as the man of education
might be puny in stature and deficient of a strong arm; the man of strong
arm deficient in education; the imbeeile man might be a superior woodman
the man of intellect an inferior one;so that as, before remarked, each of
these qualities being essential to perfect the whole, each one of course was
called upon to exercise his peculiar talent and take his position on an
equality with his neighbor. There has been great change in society since
then; those days of simple equality have gone forever; but we question if the
present race, with all their privileges, with all their security, with all their
means of enjoyment, are as happy as those noble old pioneers, with all their
necessities, with all their dangers, with all their sufferings.
According, therefore, to the established custom of the early settlers, the
stranger for whom Algernon proceeded to make inquiries, was entitled to all
the rights of hospitality; and whether liked or disliked, could not
consistently
be smiled away, nor frowned away, as doubtless he would have been, had
he lived in this civil wonder-working age of lightning and steam; and
though his appearance was any thing but agreeable to Mrs. Younker, who
surveyed him through her spectacles (being a little near sighted) from the
adjoining cabin, whither Algernon had repaired to learn her decision; and
though it would prove inconvenient to herself to grant his request, yet, as
she expressed it, He war a stranger, as hadn't no home and didn't know
whar to go to, and prehaps war hungry, poor man, and it wouldn't be right
nor Christian-like to refuse him jest a night's lodging like; and so the
matter
was settled, and Algernon was deputed to inform him that he could stay
and would be welcome to such fare as their humble means afforded.
Some half au hour later, a loud hallowing announced the arrival of the
two Younkers, with the domestic cattleconsisting of the kine and some pet
sheep which ran with themfrom their labors in an distant field, where
they had been engaged in harvesting corn. A few minutes after, the elder
Younker entered the cabin, bearing upon his shoulder a rifle, from which
depended a large fat turkey that he had shot during his absence. With a
slight but friendly nod to the stranger, he proceeded to deposit his game on
the hearthwhere it was presently examined and commented on at
considerable
length by the good dameand then carefully placing his rifle on a couple
of horn hooks depending from the ceiling for the purpose, he seated himself
on a stool, his back to the wall, with the air of one who is very much
fatigued
,
and does not wish to mingle in conversation of any kind.
The sun by this time was already below the horizon, twilight was fast
deepening into night, and the matron having finished her eulogy on the
turkey, and Wondered ef sech birds wouldn't git to being scaser arter a
while, when all on 'em war shot? proceeded to the cow-yard, to assist
Isaac in milking; while Ella burried hither and thither, with almost
noiseless
activity, to prepare the evening repast. A bright fire was soon kindled
in the chimney, over which was suspended a kettle for boiling water, while
in front nearly perpendicular, was placed a large corn loaf, whose savory
odor, as it began to cook, was far from being disagreeable to the olfactory
organs of the lookers on. The table, of which we have previously given a
description, was next drawn into the middle of the apartment and covered
with a home-made cloth of linen, on which were placed a medley of dishes
of various sizes and materialssome of wood, some of pewter, some of
earthen, and one of stonewith knives and forks to correspond. Three of
these dishes were occupiedone with clean, fresh butter, another with rich
old cheese, and the third with a quantity of cold venison steak. In the
course of another half hour, the cake was baked and on the tableIsaac
and his mother had entered with the milkthe announcement was made by
Ella that all was ready, and the whole party taking seats around the humble
board, proceeded to do justice to the fare before them.
A light placed in the center of the table, threw its gleams upon the faces
of each, and exhibited a singular variety of expressions. That of the
stranger
was downeast, sinister and suspicious, combined with an evident desire
of appearing exactly the reverse. Occasionally, when he thought no eye
was on him, he would steal a glance at Ella, and some times gaze steadily
like one who is resolved upon a certain event, without being decided as to
the exact manner of its accomplishmentuntil he found himself observed,
when his glance would fall to his plate, or be directed to some other object,
with the seeming embarrassment of one caught in some guilty act. This
was noticed more than once by Algernon, who, perhaps, more than either
of the others, felt from the first that strong dislike, that suspicious
repugnance
to the stranger, which can only be explained as one of the mysteries
of nature, whereby we are sometimes warned of whom we should shun, as
the instinct of an animal makes known to it its inveterate foe; and though
he strove to think there was nothing of evil meant by a circumstance
apparently so triflingthat the glance of the stranger was simply one of
admiration or curiosity.yet the thought that it might be otherwisethat
he might be planning something wicked to the fair being before him
haunted his mind like some hideous vision, made him for the time more
distrustful more watchful than ever, and was afterward reverted to with a
painful sensation. The features of Algernon also exhibited an expression
of remorse and hopeless melancholy, the reason whereof the reader, who
has now been made acquainted with the secret, will readily underst and.
The face of Ella, too, was paler than usualmore sad and thoughtful,so
much so, that it was remarked by Mrs. Younker, who immediately
instituted
the necessary inquiries concerning her health, and explained to her
at some length the most approved method of curing a cold, in case that were
the cause. In striking contrast to the sober looks of the othersfor
Younker
himself was a man who seldom exhibited other than a sedate expression
was the general appearance and manner of Isaac. He seemed exceedingly
exhilerated in spirits, yet kept his eyes down, and appeared at times very
absent minded. Whatever his thoughts were, it was evident they were
pleasing ones; for he would smile to himself, and occasionally display a
comical nervousness, as though he had some very important secret to make
known, yet was not ready to communicate it. This had been observed in
him through the day, and was so different from his usual manner, and so
much beyond any conjecture his mother could form of the cause, that at last
her curiosity became so excited, that to restrain it longer was like holding
down the safety-valve to an over-heated steam boiler; and accordingly,
taking advantage of another mysterious smile which Isaac chanced to display
while looking at a large piece of corn bread already on its way to his
capacious jaws, she exclaimed:
Why, what on yarth
is
the matter with you, Isaac, that you keep a
grinning, and grinning, and fidgetting about all to yourself so much like a
plaguy nateral born fool for?
So loud, sudden and unexpected was this question putfor all had been
silent some minutes previousthat Isaac started, blushed, dropped the bread
already near enough to his teeth to have felt uncomfortable, had it been
capable of feeling, endeavered to catch it, blundered, and finally upset his
plate and contents into his lap, in a manner so truly ridieulous, that Ella
and Mrs. Younker, unable to restrain their mirth, laughed heartily, while
the stranger and Algernon smiled, and the stern features of the father
relaxed
into an expression of quiet humor seldom seen on his countenance.
'Pon my word, continued Mrs. Younker, so soon as she could collect
breath enough after laughing to go on; I do raley believe as how the boy's
ayther crazy, or in love, for sartin. What does ail ye, Isaac?do tell!
Perhaps he was thinking of his dear Peggy, said Ella, archly, who was,
by the way, very fond of teasing him whenever opportunity presented, and
could not even now, despite her previous low spirits, forbear a little
innocent
raillerysuch being the natural and happy tone of her temperament,
that wit and humor were ever ready on the slightest provocation to take the
ascendency, as old wine when stirred ever sends its sparkling beads upward.
I wonder, Isaac, if you looked as amiable and interesting in the eyes of
dear Peggy, and made as graeeful an appearance, when you popped the
question?
Why, how in the name o' all Christen nater did you find out I'd done
it? asked Isaac, in reply, who having meantime regained his former
position
,
and restored the plate, minus some of its contents, now sat a perfect
picture of comical surprise, with his mouth slightly ajar, and his small eyes
strained to their utmost and fastened seriously upon the querist as he
awaited her answer.
Murder will out, dear Isaac, replied Ella, with a ringing laugh, in
which she was joined by most of the others, and particularly by the
subject
of the joke, who perceiving too late for retreat, that he had been
betrayed
into an acknowledgement of his secret, deemed this his wisest course
for defence.
And so, Isaac, you have really proposed to darling Peggy, then? and
we are to have a wedding shortly? continued his tormentor. And pray
which did look the most foolish of the two?or was it a drawn-game, as we
sometimes say of draughts?
Why, rejoined Isaac, changing color as rapidly as an aurora boreallis,
and evidently much embarrassed, I 'spect I mought as well own up, being's
I've got cotched in my own trap; and besides it won't make no great
difference
,
only as I war intending it for a surprise. You see I axed Peggy the
question last night; and its all settled, and we're going to be married in less
nor a week, ef nothing unforseen don't happen; and as Mr. Reynolds ar a
stranger in these diggins, I thought prehaps as how he'd like a little
amusement
like, and so I've fixed on him for my groomsman.
I am much obliged for your kind intentions on my behalf, and the honor
you would confer on me, answered Reynolds, sadly; but I am sorry to
say, I shall be under the necessity of declining your invitation; as on the
morrow I design taking a farewell leave of you all, and quitting this part of
the country forever.
Mr. Younker, his wife and son all started with looks of surprise at this
announcement, while Ella again grew deadly pale, and rising with some little
trepidation, retired from the table. The stranger was the only one unmoved.
To-morrow! ejaculated Mrs. Younker.
Take leave o' us! said the host.
Quit the country forever! repeated Isaac.
Such, I assure you, is my determination, rejoined Algernon.
But your wound, Mr. Reynolds? suggested Younker.
Is not entirely healed, returned Algernon, yet I trust sufficiently so
to allow me to pursue my journey. The wound, as you are aware, was
only a flesh onethe ball having entered the right side, glanced on the
lower rib and passed out nearly in frontand though very dangerous at the
time from excessive hemorrhage, has of late been rapidly healing, and now
troubles me but little if any.
Well, now, Mr. Reynolds, rejoined Mrs. Younker. I'm a
considerable
older woman nor you arthat is, I mean to say I'm a much older
individule
,and
I 'spect I've had in my time some lettle experience in matters
that you don't know nothing about; and so you musn't go to thinking hard
o' me, ef I give you a lettle advice, and tell you to stay right whar you ar,
aud not stir a single step away for three weeks;'cause ef you do, your
wound may get rupturous agin, and in some lone place jest carry you right
straight off into the shader o' the valley of deathas our good old Rev. Mr.
Allprayer used to say, when he wanted to comfort the sick. O, dear good
man he war. Preacher Allprayer,continued the voluble old lady, with
a sigh, her mind now wholly occupied with his virtuesdear good man he
war! I jest remember,Lord bless ye, I'll never forgit ithow he come'd
to me when I war sick, with tears a running out o' his eyes like he'd been
eating raw inyuns; poor man, and told me that I war going to die right
straight away, and never need to hope to be no better; and that I'd most
likely go right straight to that orful place whar all bad folks goes to. O, the
dear man! I never could help always liking him arter thatit made me feel
so orful narvous and religious like. Why, what on yarth be you grinning
at agin, Isaac?jest for all the world like a monkey for?
Nothing, mother, answered Isaac, nearly choking with smothered
laughter, only I war jest kind o' thinking what a kind comforter Mr.
Allprayer
war, to tell you you couldn't live no longer, and that when you died
you'd jest go right straight toto
Silence! you irrelevant boy, you! (irreverent was doubtless meant)
interrupted the dame, angrily: How dare you to go making fun o' the pious
Rev. Mr. Allprayer?him as used to preach all Sunday long, and pray all
Sunday night, and never did nothing wrongthough he did get turned out
o' the meeting house arterward for getting drunk and swearing; but then
the poor man cried and said it war nothing but a accident, which hadn't
happened more nor ten times to him sence he'd bin a preacher of the
everlasting
gospel. Thar, thar, the crazy head's a giggling agin! I do wish,
Ben, you'd see to Isaac, and make him behave himselffor he's got so
tittery
like, sence he's axed Peggy, thar's no use o' my trying to do nothing
with him.
Isaac! Isaac! said his father with a reproving glance, and, as though
that voice and look possessed a spell, the features of the young man instantly
became grave, almost solemn. Then turning to Algernon, the old man
continued: As to leaving us, Mr. Reynolds, you of course know your own
business best, and it arn't my desire to interfere; but ef you could put up
with our humble fare, say a week or ten days longer, I think as how it
would be much better for you, and would give us a deal more pleasure
besides.
Why, I'll jest tell you what tis, put in Isaac; I've fixed on you for
groomsman, and I arn't a going to gin in no how; so unless you want to
quarrel, you'll have to stay; and more'n that, it's spected you'll see to
taking Ella thar, for I know she don't like to go with any o' the fellers
round here, and I shall gin out she's going with you, which may be won't hurt
your feelings none,at any rate I know it won't hers.
At the mention of Ella, Algernon crimsoned to the eyes, and became so
exceedingly confused that he could with difficulty stammer forth, by way
of reply, the query as to the time when the important event was expected
to take place.
Let me see, answered Isaac, telling off the days on his fingers:
tomorrow's
Friday; then Saturday's one, Sunday's two, Monday's three, and
Tuesday's fouronly four days from to-morrow morning, Mr. Reynolds.
Then, as you so urgently insist upon it, rejoined Reynolds, I will
postpone
my departure till after the wedding.
Isaac thanked him cordially, and the father and mother looked gratified
at the result; Ella he could not seeshe having withdrawn from the table,
as previously noted. Some further conversation ensued relative to the
manner in which weddings were conducted in that country, and the design
of proceeding with the one in question; but as we intend the reader to be
present at the wedding itself, we shall not detail it. We will remark here,
by the way, that the stranger seemed to take a singular interest in all that
was said, concerning the residence of the intended bridethe road the party
were expected to take to reach theretheir probable numbermanner of
travel, and the time when they would be likely to set forth and return. In
all this it was observed by Algernon, that whenever he asked a question
direct, it was put in such a careless manner as would lead one not otherwise
suspicious to suppose him perfectly indifferent as to whether it were answered
or not; but he somehow fancied, he scarce knew why, that there was a
strong under current to this outward seeming. And furthermore he
observed
,
that the stranger in general avoided putting a question at allrather
seeking his information by conjecturing or supposing what would
immediately
be contradicted or confirmed. This mode of interrogation, so closely
followed up to every particular, yet apparently with such indifference,
together with the stranger's treacherous look and several minor things all
bearing a suspicious cast, more than half convinced Algernon that the
other was a spy, and that some foul play was assuredly meditated; though
what, and to whom, or for what purpose, he was at a loss to determine.
From the particulars of the coming wedding, the stranger, after a little,
adroitly turned the conversation upon the wound of Reynolds, asked a
number
of questions, and appeared deeply interested in the whole narration
concerning itthe attack upon him by the Indians and his providential
escape through the assistance of Booneall of which was detailed by Isaac
in his own peculiar way. From this case in particular, the conversation
gradually spread to other cases that had happened in the vicinity; and also
to the state of the country, with regard to what it had been and now was
its settlementsits increase of inhabitantsthe many Indian invasions and
massacres that had occurred within the last five years on the borders,and
the present supposed population of the frontiers.
As to myself, said Younker, in reply to some observation of the
stranger
,
as to myself and family, we've been extremely fortunate in 'scaping
the red foethough I've bin daily fearful that when I went away to my
work in the morning, I'd may be come back agin at noon or night and find
my women folks gone, or murdered, and my cot in ashes; but, thank the
Lord! I've been so far spared sech a heart rending sight.
And had you no personal fears? asked the stranger.
I don't know's I understand you.
Had you no fears for yourself individually?
Well, I can't say's I had, answered the other. I'm an old manor
at least I'm in my second half centuryand I've so endeavered to live, as
not to fear to go at any moment when God sees fit, and by whatsomever means
he may choose to take me.
I suppose you now consider yourself in a measure safe from Indian
encroachments
?
observed the other.
No man, strangerI beg pardon, but I'd like to know your name!
Certainly, sir, answered the other, a little embarrassed. My name is
isWilliams.
Thank you! No man, Mr. Williams, ar justified in considering himself
safe from Injens, in a country like this; but to tell the truth, I don't feel so
fearful of'em, as when I first come out here with my family, two year ago;
though thar's no telling what may hap in the course o' two year more.
And did you venture here at once, on your arrival in this western
country
?
Not exactly; for the land laws o' Varginna, passed the year I come
out, made it rayther difficult gitting hold o' land, about which thar war
a great deal o' disputing, and which war kept up till the commissioners
came out and settled the matter; and so while this war agitating, I took
my family to Boonesborough, whar they remained, excepting Isaac, who
went along with me, until we'd got all matters fixed for moving 'em here.
But as you've axed considerable many questions, pray may I know ef you're
from the east?And ef so, what news thar is with respect to this here war
with the Britishers?
Why, replied the other hesitatingly, though not strictly speaking from
the east, yet I've been eastward the past season, and have some news of the
war; and, as far as I am able to judge, think it will result in the total
subjugation
of the colonies.
God forbid! exclaimed Younker.
Heaven forefend! said Reynolds, with a start.
Lord presarve us!marsy on us! cried Mrs. Younker, with
vehemence
.
What on yarth shall we do, ef them plaguy Britishers git
uppermost
?
They'll take away all our lands, for sartin!and Ben's bin and
bought four hundred acres, poor man, at forty cents a acre, under the new
laws of Varginna.
[4]
[4]
It may be proper to note here, for the benefit of those unfamiliar with the early
history
of Kentucky, that at the period of which we write it was claimed and held by Virginian
as a portion of her territory, for which she legislated accordingly.
which comes to one hundred and sixty dollars, hard money;
and now maybe he'll have to lose it all, and not git nothing for it; and
then what in the name o' the whole univarsal creation will become on us?
Well, well, Dorothydon't fret about it till it happensthar'll be
plenty
o' time theh, said Younker, gravely; and prehaps it won't happen at all.
Don't talk to me about fretting, Mr. Younker! rejoined the now
irritated
dame, a la Caudle: I reckon I don't fret no easier nor you do, nor
half so much nother; but I'd like to know who wouldn't fret, when they
know they're going to lose all that property by them thar good for nothing red
coated. Britishers, who I do believe is jest as mean as Injens, and they're
too mean to live, that's sartin. Fret, indeed! I reckon it wouldn't do for
you to be letting Preacher Allprayer hear ye say so; for he said one time
with his own mouthand to me too, mind that!that I'd got the bestest
4
disposition in the whole univarsal yarth o' creation under the sun! and
the voluble old lady paused to take breath.
It's my opine, that ef Preacher Allprayer had lived with you as long as I
have, he wouldn't reiterate that thar sentence under oath, returned Younker
quietly. Then perceiving that a storm was brewing, he hastened to change
the conversation, by addressing the stranger: What cause have you, Mr.
Williams, for speaking so discourageous o' the war?
The failure of the American arms in battle, the weakness of their
resources
,
and the strength of their opponents, replied the other. I
presume
you have heard of the battles of Guilford and Camden, in both of which
General Greene was defeated?
General
Gates
commanded at Camden, sir! interposed Reynolds
somewhat
haughtily.
I beg pardon, sir! retorted the other, in a sneering, sarcastic tone, but
I was speaking of the defeat of General
Greene!
At Camden?
At Camden, sir!
I am sorry you are no better informed, rejoined Algernon, with
flashing
eyes. I repeat that General Gates commanded at Camden; and as,
unfortunately
,
I chanced to be in the fight, I claim the privilege of being
positive
.
The youth is doubtless speaking of the battle fought a year or two ago,
rejoined Williams, turning to Younker, in a manner the most insulting to
Reynolds, who clenched his hand, and pressed his nether lip with his teeth
until the blood sprang through, but said nothing. I have reference to the
two engagements which took place at Guilford Court House and Camden,
in March and April last; whereby, as I said before, General Greene, who
commanded at both, was twice defeated, and retreated with great loss;
although
in the former action his forces outnumbered those of his opponent,
Lord Cornwallis, as two to one; and in the latter, far exceeded those of
Lord Rawdon, his opponent also.
This is indeed startling news, answered Younker, and I'm fearful o'
the result!
You may depend on't, them thar four-hundred acres is all gone clean to
nothing, observed Mrs. Younker; and its my opine, Ben, you'd better sell
right straight out immediately, afore the news gits about any further, for
fear o' accidents and them things.
I suppose in reality the present war with England does not trouble you
here? said the stranger, interrogatively.
Why not in reality, answered Younker, only so far as the Britishers
and thar accursed renegade agents set on the Injens agin us.
To what renegade agents do you allude? inquired the other, with a
degree of interest he had not before exhibited.
Why to the Girtys, McKee, and Elliot,and perticularly to that thar
scoundrel, Simon Girty, the worst o' all on 'em.
Ha! Simon Girty, said the other, with a slight start and change of
countenance, what know you of him?
Nothing that's good, you may be sartin, and every thing that's evil.
He's leagued with the Injens, purposely to excite 'em agin his own white
brethrento have them murder women and children, that he may feast his
eyes on thar innocent blood. I'm not given to be o' a revengeful speret,
Mr. Williams, but I never think o' that thar renegade, Simon Girty, but I
in wardly pray for the curse o' an avenging God to light upon him; and
come it will, ayther soon or late, you may depend on't!
Amen to that thar sentiment! responded the dame; while the stranger
became very much agitated, on account, as he said, of a violent pain in his
side, to which he was subject.
Mrs. Younker was on the point of bringing down her invectives on the
head of the renegade in a speech of some considerable length, when
perceiving
the distressful look of the other, the kind-hearted woman suddenly
forgot her animosity in sympathy for her suffering guest, and forthwith
proceeded, with all the eloquence of which she was master, to recommend a
certain essence that chanced to be in the house, as a never failing remedy
for all griping and other pains whereby unfortunate humanity was
oftentimes
afflicted.
It's one o' the bestest things as ever war invented, continued the good
woman, in her eulogy of the article in question, and has did more good in
it's time, nor all the doctors on the univarsal yarth put together could do, in
the way of curing sprains, and bruises, and stomach-pains, and them things;
and ef you don't believe it, Mr. Williams, you can see it all in print, ef
you can read, and I spect you can, on the bottle itself, jest as plain as any
thing; and besides, I've got the testament (testimony doubtless) of the good
and pious Rev. Mr. Allprayer, who tuk some on't once for the gout, and he
said as how the contracting (counteracting?) pains war so many, that he
didn't no more feel the gout for a long time to come arterwards. I've no
doubt it'll sarve you jest the same way, and I'll go and fetch it right straight off.
But the mission of the good woman was prevented by the complainant's
insisting that he was much better, would presently be well, and wished to
retire for the night. His request was grantedbut little more was said
and all shortly after betook themselves to bedto think, or sleep, or dream,
as the case might be with each.
When the family arose on the following morning, they found the
stranger
had departed; but when or whither none could tell.
CHAPTER V.
THE EARLY GUESTSTHE JOURNEYTHE RACE FOR THE BOTTLETHE WEDDING
THE DINNERTHE TOASTSTHE DANCE.
The year 1781 was remarkable in the history of Kentucky for the
immense
emigration from the east into its territory of unmarried females. It
appears, in looking over the records of the time, as though some mighty
barrier had hitherto kept them in check, which being removed, allowed them
to rush forward in overwhelming force, like to the pent up waters of some
stream when its obstruction suddenly gives way. Whatever this hitherto
obstruction or barrier may have been, we do not pretend to say; but the
fact itself we record as we find it chronicled in history. The result of this
influx of females into a region almost wholly populated by the opposite sex,
was one, as will readily be perceived, of great importance to the well being
of the embryo state; and was duly celebrated by the rising generation, in a
general jubilee of marriagesone following fast upon another, like drops of
rain in a genial summer shower; and, to extend the simile, with an effect by
no means less productive of fertility, in a long run, to the country round
about.
A wedding in those days was an affair of great importance to the
neighborhood
of its location; and was looked forward to by old and youngthe
latter in particularas a grand holiday of feasting, dancing and general
festivity
.
Nor can this be wondered at, when we take into consideration the
fact, that, in the early settlement of the country, a wedding was almost the
only gathering, as they were called, which was not accompanied with some
laborious
employmentsuch as harvesting, log-rolling, and the like.
Occasionally
there might be dissatisfaction felt and expressed by some, who, from
one cause or another, chanced to be left out of the almost general invitation;
in which case a special resentment not unfrequently followed. This was
accomplished in various wayssometimes by felling trees, or placing other
obstacles across some narrow portion of the horse-path by which the
wedding
party were advancing, thereby causing considerable delay for their
removal
sometimes
by ambushing and firing a volley of blank cartridges at
the party in question, so as to frighten the horses, by which means more or
less were frequently injured, in being thrown to the groundand sometimes
by shearing the manes and tails of the horses themselves, while their owners
were being occupied by the feast and the dance, and the gay carousal of the
occasion. But to proceed.
The morning of the day set apart by Isaac Younker, as the one which
was to see him duly united by Hymen's bands to Peggy Wilson, came in
due timeas many an important one has both before and sincewithout
one visible sign in the heavens, or otherwise, to denote that any thing
remarkable was about to happen. In fact it might be put down to the
reverse of all this; for, unlike the generality of wished-for days, it was
exceedingly fair, balmy and beautiful. The sun rose at the expected time,
large and red, and saluted the hills and treetops, and anon the vales, with a
smiling light, as though he felt exceedingly happy to greet them again after
a calm night's repose. The dew sparkled on blade and leaf, as if with delight
at his appearance; a few flowers modestly uncovered their blooming heads;
a few warblers of the forestfor although autumn was nearly half advanced,
some yet tarried their journey to the sunny southsung gleesome songs;
and altogether the morning in question was really a delightful one.
The family of the Younkers were stirring betimes, in making the
necessary
preparations for their departure, and looking out for the expected
guests; who, according to the custom of the period, first assembled at the
residence of the groom, to proceed thence in company with him to the
mansion
of the bride, which place they must always reach in time to have the
ceremony performed before partaking of the dinner prepared for the
occasion
.
For this purpose, as the distance to the house of the fair intended
was not unfrequently considerable, they generally came at an early hour as
possible; and as Isaac's fair Peggy was not likely to be visible short of a ten
miles' ride, his companions for the journey accordingly began to appear in
couples before his father's dwelling ere the sun was an hour above the hills.
Isaac, on the present occasion, stood ready to receive them as they rode
up, arrayed in his wedding garments, whichsave a few trifling exceptions
in some minor articles, and the addition of five or six metal buttons
displayed
on his hunting frock in a very singular manner, and a couple of knee
buckles, all old family relicspresented the same appearance as those worn
by him during his ordinary labors. And this, by the way, exhibits another
feature of the extreme simplicity of the timeand one too highly
praise-worthy
when
the individual was sought for himself alone, and not for the
tinsel gew-gaws, comparatively speaking, he might chance to display. Neces,
sity forced all to be plain and substantial in the matter of dress; and
consequently
comfort and convenience were looked to, rather than ostentatious
show. All at that day were habited much alikeso that a description of the
costume of one of either sex, as in the case of their habitations, previously
noted, would describe that of a whole community.
Let the reader, says a historian, in speaking of the manners and dress
of those noble pioneers, imagine an assemblage of people, without a store,
tailor, or mantuamaker within an hundred miles; and an assemblage of
horses, without a blacksmith or saddler within an equal distance. The
gentlemen
dressed in shoepacks, moccasins, leather breeches, leggins, linsey
hunting-shirts, and all home-made. The ladies dressed in linsey petticoats,
and linsey or linen bed-gowns, coarse shoes, stockings, handkerchiefs, and
buckskin gloves, if any. If there were any buckles, rings, buttons or
ruffles
,
they were the relies of old timesfamily pieces from parents or
grand-parents
.
The horses were caparisoned with old saddles, old bridles or
halters, and pack-saddles, with a bag or blanket thrown over thema rope
or string as often constituting the girth as a piece of leather.
But to our story.
Since leaving Isaac in the preceding chapter, after his important
announcement
,
as therein recorded, he had been by no means idle. The two days
immediately following had been spent by him in riding post-haste through
the surrounding country, to inform his friends that he was on the point of
becoming a married man, and require their presence at the appointed hour
and place of ceremony. The balance of the time (Sunday of course
excepted) had been carefully husbanded by him in making all due
preparation
;
and he now stood before his expected guests with the air of one, to
use a common phrase, who has not been caught napping. For each, as they
rode up, he had a friendly salutation and familiar word; and inviting them
to dismount and enter, until the whole number should be arrived, he led
away and secured their horses to the neighboring trees.
In due time the last couple made their appearance; and having partaken
of some refreshment, which was highly recommended and presented by Mrs.
Younker herself,whose tongue, by the way, had seen no rest for at least
two hoursthe whole party, in gleeful spirits, prepared to mount and set
forth on their journey. Even Algernon, as he assisted the graceful Ella
into her saddle, and then sprang lightly himself upon the back of a high
mettled, beautiful steed by her side, could not avoid exhibiting a look of
cheerfulness, almost gaiety, in striking contrast to his habitual gloom. And
this too produced a like effect upon Ella, who, mounted upon a fine spirited,
noble animal, and displaying all the ease and grace of an accomplished rider,
with her flushed cheek and sparkling eyes, seemed the personification of
loveliness. Her dress was exceedingly neat, of the fashion and quality worn
in the eastbeing one she had brought with her on her removal hither.
A neat hood, surmounted with a green veil, now thrown carelessly back and
floating down behind, covered her head and partially concealed a profusion
of tasty ringlets.
The company at length being all mounted, Isaac took it upon himself to
lead the way; for the reason, as he alledged, that having travelled the
ground oftener than either of the others, he of course knew the best and
nearest path to the abode of Peggy Wilson. Algernon as groomsman came
next with Ella, followed in turn by the father and mother of the groom, and
then in double file by the whole companytalking, laughing and full of
gleeto the number of some fifteen couples. Turning the corner of the
house, they forded the streamlet previously mentioned, crossed the valley,
and ascended by a narrow horse path the opposite hillleaving the
cane-brake
some distance away to the left.
In those days a roador at least such a highway as we of the present so
denominatewas a something unknown; a few horse-paths, so termed,
traversing
the country in various directionsnarrow, oftentimes obstructed,
and sometimes dangerousbeing the only substitutes. Over one of this
latter class, as before said, our wedding party now wended their way, in high
good spirits; sometimes in a brisk trot or gallop, where their course lay
open and clearsometimes walking their horses very slow, in single file,
where the path, winding across craggy bluffs, among rocks and trees, became
very narrow and unsafe. Twice, on this latter account, did the gentlemen
of the company dismount and lead the horses of their partners for some
considerable distance past the stony and dangerous defile, by which means
all accidents were avoided. When they had reached within a mile of their
destination, Isaac drew rein and all came to a halt. Turning upon his
saddle
,
with the air of a commander of some important expedition, he sang out
in a loud, shrill voice:
Well boys and gals, here we arthis here's the spotwho's a going to
run for the bottle?
Whoop! yaho! give way thar! was the answer from a couple of
voices in the rear; at the same instant, two young men, separating from their
partners, came bounding forward, on two blood horses, at break-neck speed.
Stop! thundered Isaac, as they came tearing up to where he was
sitting
astride his beast; and obedient to his command, the two individuals in
question reined in their impatient steeds, hard abreast, close by his side.
Well, ef you arn't a couple o' beauties, then jest put it down that I don't
know, continued Isaac, eyeing them cooly from head to heel, with a half
quizzing, comical look. You'd both on ye avearge two decent looking
fellersfor whar Seth Stokes is too long, Sam Switcher arn't long enough;
and whar Sam Switcher's got too much, Seth Stokes han't got nothing.
A roar of laughter, in which both Seth and Sam joined, followed Isaac's
closing remarks; for besides partaking of the ludicrous, none could deny
that his description was correct. The two worthies in question were
certainly
two very singular looking beings to be brought together for a race,
and presented a most laughable appearance. The one bearing the poetical
appellation of Seth Stokes, was long, thin and bony, with sharp features,
and legs that reminded one of a carpenter's compass; while his companion,
Sam Switcher, was round-favored, short in limbs and stature, and fat almost
to corpulencythereby forming a contrast to the other of the most striking
kind.
As soon as the laugh at their expense had subsided, Isaac again sang out:
Squar your hosses' heads tharget ready, boysnow clippet, and don't
keep us long waiting the bottle! for I reckon as how some on us is gitting
dry. Yehep! yahoa! and ere the sound of his voice had died away, down
came the switches, accompanied by a terrible yell, and off went horses and
bottle-ridersover stumps, logs and rockspast trees and brush and
whatever
obstacle might lie in their coursewith a speed that threatened them
with death at every moment; while the others remained quietly seated on
their ponies, enjoying the sport, and sometimes shouting after them such
words of encouragement as; Go it, Seth! Up to him, Sammy! Pull
up, legs! Jump it, fatty! so long as the racers were in sight.
This race for the bottle, as it was called, was a peculiar feature for
displaying
the horsemanship and hardy recklessness of the early settlers; as a
more dangerous one, to both horse and rider, could not well be imagined.
That the reader may form a clear conception of what it was in realityand
also to destroy the idea, if any such may have been formed, that it existed
only in our imaginationwe shall take the liberty of giving a short extract
from the author already quoted. In speaking of the foregoing he says:
The worse the paththe more logs, brush and deep hollows, the better
as these obstacles afforded an opportunity for the greater display of
intrepidity
and horsemanship. The English fox-chase, in point of danger to
the riders and their horses, is nothing to this race for the bottle. The start
was announced by an Indian yell; when logs, brush, muddy hollows, hill
and glen, were speedily passed by the rival ponies. The bottle was always
filled for the occasion, so that there was no use for judges; for the first who
reached the door was presented with the prize, with which he returned in
triumph to the company. On approaching them, he announced his victory
over his rival by a shrill whoop. At the head of the troop he gave the bottle
first to the groom and his attendants, and then to each pair in succession to
the rear of the line, giving each a dram; and then putting the bottle in the
bosom of his hunting-shirt, took his station in the company.
In something like a quarter of an hour the clatter of horses feet was heard
by the company, the rival-racers presently appeared in sight, and all became
anxiety to learn who was the successful runner. They were not long kept
in suspense; for advancing at a fast gallop, the riders were soon within
speaking distance, when a loud, shrill whoop from Seth Stokes announced
that in this case success had at least been with the long, if not with the strong.
How's this, Sammy? cried a dozen voices, as the rivals rode up to the
party.
I don't exactly know, answered the individual addressed, shaking his
head with a serio-comical expression; but stifle me with the night-mar, if
ever I'm cotched riding a race with death on horseback agin.
This allusion to the bony appearance of his companion, caused a roar of
laughter at the expense of the winner, in which he good-humoredly joined.
According to custom, as previously mentioned, the bottle was presented first
to Isaac, and then passed in regular order through the linesAlgernon and
Ella merely putting it to their lips without drinking. When this ceremony
was over, the party resumed their journey, no less merry on account of the
whiskey, and by half an hour past eleven o'clock, all drew rein before
the door of Abijah Wilson, the father of the fair intended.
Here another party, the friends of the bride, were waiting to receive
them; and after some few introductions, much shaking of hands and other
demonstrations of joy had taken place, the anouncement was made, that the
squire was ready to perform the ceremony. Instantly all talking was
suspended
,
the company proceeded to form into a half circle, and then all
became
silent and solemn as the house of death. Isaac presently appeared
from behind a coarse temporary screen of cloth, hung up for the occasion
the house having no division save a chamber over headleading the
blushing
Peggy by the hand. (a rosy cheeked, buxom lass of eighten) both looking
as frightened and foolish as could reasonably be expected. Behind the bride
and groom came Algernon, in company with a dark eyed, pretty brunett,
who performed the part of bridesmaid. Taking their several places, the
squire as he was termeda man of fortystepped forward, and said a few
words concerning the importance of the present eventasked the necessary
questionsjoind their hands, and pronounced them man and wife. Then
followed the usual amount of congratulationsgood wishes for the future
happiness of the married pairkissing of the bride, and so forth,in all of
which proceedings they differed not materially from their successors of the
present day.
About half an hour from the close of the ceremony, the guests were invited
to partake of a sumptuous dinner, prepared expressly for the occasion.
It was placed on rough tables made of large slabs, supported by small, round
legs set in auger holes; and though there was a scantiness of dishesand
these in the main consisting of a few pewter-plates, several wooden trenchers,
with spoons of like material, interspersed with some of hornand though
the scarcity of knives required many of the gentlemen to make use of those
carried in their belts,yet the food itself was such as might have rejoiced an
epicure. It consisted of beef, roasted and boiledpork, roasted and fried
together with chicken, turkey, partridge and venisonwell flanked on
every side by bread, butter and cheese, potatoes, cabbage and various other
vegetables. That it was both acceptable and pallatable, needed no other
evidence
than the hearty joyous manner in which each individual performed
his or her part, and the rapidity with which it disappeared. The
desert
was composed of two or three kinds of pies and puddings, washed down
(at least by those who chose so to do) with whiskey. Great hilarity
prevailed
particularly
after the introduction of the bottle. Immediately dinner
was over, the tables were removed, the fiddler was called for, and the dance
commenced, which was to last till the following morning. The dance was
opened by Isaac and the bridesmaid, with another couplebeginning with a
square four, and ending with what was termed a jig. From this time forth,
until the party separated, the poor fiddler experienced but little relaxation
or comfortunless in being encouraged, occasionally, by a refreshing salute
from the lips of Black Betty; a being of no greater intellect, reader, than a
bottle of whiskey.
Some two hours after dinner, the father and mother of Isaac announced
their intention of forthwith returning home; and although seriously pressed
to tarry longer, shortly after took their leave of the company;Mrs.
Younker adding, as a farewell speech, That she hoped to gracious,
Peggy 'd jest make Isaac as good a wife nor she had Ben, and then thar
wouldn't never be no need o' having trouble; and wound up by quoting
the Rev. Mr. Allprayer as the best authority on the subject. Younker stood
by her side, calmly heard her through, and then shrugging his shoulders
with a very significant expression, walked away without saying a word, to
the infinite amusement of the whole assemblage.
As to Algernon, he seemed to take no delight in what was going forward;
and though he participated somewhat in the dance, yet it was evident to all
observers that his mind went not with his body, and that what he did was
done more with a design of concealing his real feelings, than for any
amusement
it afforded himself. When not occupied in this manner, or in
conversation
,
he would steal away, seat himself where he was least likely to
be observed, and fall into a gloomy abstracted mood, from which, when
suddenly
roused by some loud peal of laughter, or by the touch and voice of
some person near, he would sometimes start and look around as one just
awakened from a frightful vision. This gloomy abstraction, too, appeared to
grow upon him more and more, as the day settled into night and the night
wore on, as though he felt some dreaded calamity had been hanging over,
and was now about to fall upon him. So apparent was this toward the last,
that even the most careless began to observe, and make remarks, and ask
questions concerning him; and some even proceeded to inquire of him
regarding
the state of his health. His answers to all interrogatives now became so
brief and abrupt, that but few ventured to address him the second time.
Whatever the cause of his present gloomy state of mind, it was evidently
not the ordinary oneat least not wholly thatfor never before had Ella
(who was in the habit, since their acquaintance, of observing him narrowly)
seen him in such a mood as now. It was, perhaps, one of those strange
mental foresights peculiar to certain temperaments, whereby the individual
is sometimes warned of impending danger, and feels oppressed by a weight
of trouble impossible to shake off.
This serious change in the appearance of Algernon, was not without its effect
upon Ella. Naturally of a tender, affectionate and sympathetic disposition, she
could not feel at ease when another was suffering, and particularly when that
other was one standing so high in her estimation as Algernon Reynolds.
Naturally
,
too, possessing light and buoyant spiritsfond of gaiety where all were gay
she exhibited on the present occasion the effect of two strong but
counteracting
passions. Her features, if we may be allowed the comparison, were
like the noon-day heavens, when filled with the broken clouds of a passing
storm.Now all would be bright and cheerful, and the sun of mirth would
sparkle in her eyes; and anon some dark cloud of dejection would sweep
along, shut out the merry light, and cast its shadow drearily over the whole
countenance,or, to use language without methapor, she would one moment
be merry and another sad. Toward the last, however, the latter feeling
gained the ascendancy, she appeared to take no further share in the
meriment
of the dance, and had any watched her closely, they might have
guesed
the cause, from the manner in which she from time to time gazed at the
pale face of Algernon.
Meantime the dance went bravely on, Black Betty circulated somewhat
freely, and the mirth of the revellers grew more and more hoisterous.
Taking
advantage of a slight cessation in the general hilarity, about nine o'clock
in the evening, and while the fiddler with some of the party were engaged
in partaking of refreshment, Seth Stokes, encouraged doubtless by the
inspiration
he had received from the whiskey, stepped boldly into the
middle
of the appartment with the
bottle in his hand and said:
Jest allow me, my jollies, to give a toast.
Harken all! A toasta toastfrom the long man o' the bony frame!
cried the voice of Sam Switcher. A laugh, and then silence followed.
Here's toto Isaac and Peggy Younker, two beauties! continued Seth.
May thar union be duly acknowledged by the rising generation o' old
Kaintuck; and the speaker gravely proceeded to drink.
Bravo! bravo! cried a dozen voices, with a merry shout, accompained
by great clapping of hands,while Isaac, who was sitting by his new wife,
arose, blushed, bowed rather awkwardly, and then sat down again.
Isaac! Isaac!A toast from Isaac! shouted a chorus of voices.
Isaac at first looked very much confusedscratched his head and twisted
around in a very fidgetty manner,but presently his countenance flushed,
and a smile of triumph crossing his sharp features, announced that he had
been suddenly favored with an idea apropos. This was instantly perceived
by some of the wags standing near, one of whom exclaimed:
I see itit's coming!
He's got it! said a second.
I knew it.I'd ha' bet a bar-skin he'd fetch it, cried a third.
Out with it, Ike, afore you forget it, shouted the fourth.
Hold your jabbering tongues! cried Isaac, in vexation. You're enough
to bother a feller to death. I'd like to see some o' the rest on ye cramped
up fur a toast, jest to see how
you'd
feel with all on 'em hollering like. A
hearty laugh at his expense was all the sympathy poor Isaac received.
Give us the bottle! resumed Isaac. Now here goes, continued he,
rising and holding Black Betty by the neck. Here's to the gals o' old
KaintuckGod bless em! May they bloom like clover heads, be plentier
nor bar-skins, and follow the example o' Peggy, every mother's daughter on
'em!hooray! And having drank, the speaker resumed his seat, amid roars
of laughter and three rounds of applause.
By the time this mirth had subsided, the fiddler struck up, and the dance
again went on as before. Some two hours later the bridesmaid, with two or
three others, managed to steal away the bride unobserved; and proceeding
to a ladder at one end of the appartment, ascended to the chamber above
and saw her safely lodged in bed. In the course of another half hour the
same number of gentlemen performed a like service for Isaacsuch being
customary at all weddings of that period.
During the night Black Betty, in company with more substantial
refreshment
,
was sent up to the newly maried pair some two or three times; and
always
returned (Black Betty we mean) considerably lighter than she went;
thus proving, that if lovers can live on air, the married ones do not always
partake of things less spiritual. About three o'clock in the morning,
Algernon
and Ella took leave of the company and set out upon their returnhe
plending illness as an apology for withdrawing thus early. The remainder
of the party kept together until five, when they gradually began to separate,
and by six the dancing had ceased, and the greater portion of them taken
their departure. Thus ended the wedding of Isaac Younkera fair
specimen
,
by the way, of a backwood's wedding in the early settlement of the
west.
CHAPTER VI.
THE RIDETHE CONVERSATIONTHE PRESENTIMENTTHE RAVINE AND
AMBUSCADE
.
Deep and gloomy were the meditations of Algernon Reynolds, as, in
company
with Ella Barnwell, he rode slowly along the narrow path which he
had traversed, if not with buoyant, at least with far lighter spirits than now,
the morning before. From some latent cause, he felt oppressed with a
weight of despondency, as previously mentioned, that served to prostrate in
a measure both his mental powers and physical system. He felt, though he
could give no reason why, that some calamity was about to befall himself
and the fair being by his side; and he strove to rouse himself and shake off
the gloomy thoughts; but if he succeeded, it was only momentary, when
they would again rush back with an increased power. He had been subject,
since the unfortunate quarrel with his cousin, to gloomy reveries and
depression
of spiritsbut never before had he felt exactly as now; and though
in all former cases the event refered to had been the cause of his sad
abstractions
,
yet in the present instance it scarcely held a place in his thoughts.
Could it be a presentimenthe asked himselfsent to warn him of danger
and prepare him to meet it? But the question he could not answer.
The night, or rather the morning, though clear overhead, was
uncommonly
dark; and the stars, what few could be discerned, shed only pale,
faint gleams, as though their lights were about to be extinguished. For
some time both Algernon and Ella continued their journey scarcely
exchanging
a syllableshe too, as well as himself, being deeply absorbed
in no very pleasant reflections. She thought of him, of his hard fate, to
meet with so many bitter disappointments at an age so young; and at last
for no premiditated, no intentional crimebe forced to fly from home and
friends, and all he held dearto wander in a far off land, among strangers
or worse, among the solitudes of the wilderness,exposed to a thousand
dangers from wild, savage beasts, and wilder and more savage human beings;
and perhaps, withal, be branded as a felon and fugitive from justice. She
thought what must be his feelingshis sense of utter desolationwith none
around to sympathizeno sweet being by his side to whisper a single word
of encouragement and hope; or, should the worst prove true, to share his
painful lot, and endeavor to render less burdensome his remorseful thoughts,
by smiles of endearment and looks of love. She thought too, that to-morrow
perhaps to-dayhe would take his departure, peradventure never to
behold
her again; and this was the saddest of the train. Until she saw him,
Ella had never known what it was to loveperchance she did not now,
but at least she had experienced those fluttering sensations, those deep and
strange emotions, those involuntary yearnings of the heart toward some
object
in his presencethat aching void in his absencewhich the more
experienced
would doubtless put down to that cause; and which no other being
had ever even for a moment awakened in her breast. For something like
half an hour the two rode on together, buried in their own sad reflections,
when Ella broke the silence, by saying in a low touching voice:
You seem sad to-night, Algernon.
Algernon started, sighed heavily, and turning slightly on his sadle, said:
I am sad, Ellavery, very sad.
May I ask the cause? rejoined Ella, gently.
Doubtless you will think it strange, Ella, but the cause I believe to have
originated in a waking vision or presentiment.
That does seem strange! observed Ella, in return.
Did it never strike you, dear Ella, that we are all strange beings,
subject
to strange influences, and destined, many of us, to strange ends?
inquired
Reynolds, solemnly.
Perhaps I do not understand you, replied Ella; but with regard to
destiny, I am inclined to think that we in a measure shape our own. As to
our being strange, there are many things relating to us that we may not
understand
,
and therefore look upon them in the light of which you speak.
Are there any we do understand, Ella? rejoined Algernon. When I
say understand, I mean the word to be used in its minutest and broadest
sense. You say there are many things we may not understand concerning
ourselves,what ones, I pray you, do we fully comprehend? We are here
upon the earthso much we know. We shall die and pass awayso much
we know also. But how came we here, and why? How do we exist? How
do we think, reasou, speak, feel, move, see, hear, smell, taste? All these
we do, we know; but yet not onenot a single one of them can we
comprehend
.
You wish to raise your hand; and forthwith by some
extraordinary
powerextraordinary because you cannot tell where it is, nor
how it isyou raise it. Why cannot a dead person do the same?
Strange question you will say to yourself with a smile, but one easily
answered! Why, because in such a person life is extinctthere is no vital
principlethe heart has stoppedthe blood has ceased to flow in its regular
channels! Ay! but let me ask you
why
that life is extinct?why that
breath has stopped?and why that blood has ceased to flow? There was
just the same amount of air when the person died as before! There were
the same ingredients still left to stimulate that blood to action! Then
wherefore
should both cease?and with them the power of thought, reason, speech,
and all the other senses? It was not by a design of the individual
himself
;
for he strove to his utmost to breathe longer; he was not ready to die
he did not want to quit this earth so soon; and yet with all his efforts
to the contrary, reason fledthe breath stoppedthe blood ceasedthe
limbs became palsied and cold,and corruption, decay and dust stood ready
to follow. Now why was this? There is but one answer: `God willed it!' If
then one question resolves itself into one answer,`the will of God'so may
all of the same species; and we come out after a long train of analytical
reasoning
,
exactly where we startedwith this difference that when we set
out, we believed in being able to explain the wherefore; but when we came
to the end, we could only assert it as a wonderful fact, whereof not a single
iota could we understand.
Algernon spoke in a clear, distinct, earnest tonein a manner that showed
the subject was not new to his thoughts,and after a short pause, during
which Ella made no reply, he again proceeded.
In this grand organ of manwhere all things are strange and
incomprehensible
to
me the combination of the physical and mental is strangest of
all. The soul and the body are united and yet divided. Each is distinct
from and acts without the other at times, and yet both act in concert with a
wonderful power. The soul plans and the body executes. The body
exercises
the soulthe soul the body. The one is visiblethe other invisible;
the one is mortalthe other immortal. Now why do they act together
here? Why was not each placed in its separate sphere of action. Again:
What is the soul? Men tell us it is a spirit. What is a spirit? An
invisible something that never dies. Who can comprehend it? None.
Whither does it go when separated forever from the body? None can
answer, save in language of Scripture: `It returns to God who gave it!'
I have never heard the proposition advanced by another, continued
Algernon, after another slight pause, but I have sometimes thought myself,
that the soul departs from the body, for a brief season, and wanders at will
among scenes either near or remote, and returns with its impressions, either
clouded or clear, to communicate them to the corporeal or not as the case
may be;hence dreams or visions, and strong impressions when we wake,
that something bright and good has refreshed our sleep, or something dark
and evil has made it troubled and feverish. Again I have sometimes thought
that this soulthis invisible and immortal something within ushas power
at times to look into the future, and see events about to transpire; which
events being sometimes of a dark and terrible nature, leave upon it like
impressions; and hence gloomy and melancholy forebodings. This may be
all sophistryas much of our better reasoning on things we know nothing
about often is,but if it be true, then may I trust to account for my present
sadness.
Have you really, then, sad forebodings? inquired Ella, quickly and
earnestly.
Against my will and sober reason, dear Ella, I must own I have.
Perchance, however, the feeling was only called up by a train of melancholy
meditations. While sitting there to-night, gazing upon the many bounding
formssome full of beauty and grace, and some of strengthnoting their
joyous faces, and listening occasionally to the lightsome jest and merry,
ringing laugh,I could not avoid contrasting with the present the time when
I was as happy and full of mirth as they. I pictured to myself how they
would stare and shudder and draw away from me, did they know my hand
was stained with the blood of my own kin. Then I began, involuntarily as
it were, to picture to myself the fate of each; and they came up before me
in the form of a vision, (though if such, it was a waking one) but in regular
order; and I saw them pass on one after anothersome gliding smoothly
down the stream of time to old agesome wretched and crippled, groping
their way along over barren wastes, without water or food, though nearly
dying for the want of bothsome wading through streams of blood, with
fierce and angry looksand some with pale faces, red eyes and hollow cheeks,
roving amid coffins, sepulchres and bones;but of all, the very fewest
number happy.
Oh! it was an awful vision! exclaimed Ella, with a shudder.
It was awful enough, rejoined Algernon; and despite of me, it made
me more and more sad as I thought upon it. Could it indeed be a dream?
But not I wasseemingly at leastas wide awake and conscious as at the
present moment. I saw the dance going on as everI saw the merry
smiles, and heard the jest and laugh as before. Could it be some strange
hallucination of the brainsome wild imaginationcaused by my previous
exercise and over heat? I pondered upon it long and seriously, but could
not determine. SuddenlyI know not how nor whythat ill-looking
stranger
who lodged one night at your uncle's, and departed so mysteriously,
came up in my mind; and almost at the same moment, I fancied myself
riding with you, dear Ella, through a dark and lonely wood,when all of
a sudden there came a fierce yellseveral dark, hideous forms, with him
among them, swam around meI heard you shriek for aidand then all
became darkness and confusion, from which I was aroused by some one
inquiring if I were ill? What I answered I know not; but the querist
immediately took his leave.
It all seems very strange, Algernon, observed Ella, thoughtfully; but it
was probably nothing more than a feverish dream, brought about by your
exercise acting too sudden and powerfully upon your nervous system, which
doubtless has not as yet recovered from the prostration caused by your
wound.
So I tried to think, dear Ella, returned Algernon, with a sigh; but I
have not even yet been able to shake off the gloomy impression, that,
whatever
the cause, it was sent as a warning of danger. But I am foolish,
perhaps
,
to think as I do, and so let us change the subject. You spoke a few
minutes since of destiny. You said, if I mistake not, you believed each
individual capable of shaping his own.
I did, answered Ella, with the exception that I qualified it by saying
in a measure. No person, I think, has the power of moulding himself to an
end which is contrary to the law of nature and his own physical
organization
;
but at the same time, he has many ways, some good some evil, left
open for him to choose, else he were not a free agent.
Ay, rejoined Algernon, by-paths all to the same great end. I look
upon every one here, Ella, as a traveller placed upon the great highway
called destinywith a secret power within that impels him forward, but
allows no pause nor retrograde. Along this highway are flowers, and briars,
and thistles, and weeds, and shady woods, and barren rocks, and sterile
bluffs, and grassy plots; but proportioned differently to each, as the Maker
of all designs his path to be pleasant or otherwise. Beside this highway are
perhaps a dozen minor paths, all running a similar course, and all finally
merging into iteither near or far, as the case may bebefore its
termination
at the great gate of death. The free agency you speak of, is in
choosing
of these lesser pathssome of which are full of the snares of temptation,
the chasms of ruin, and the pitfalls of destruction; and some of the flowers
of peace, the bowers of plenty, and the green woods of contentment. But
how to follow the proper one is the difficulty; for they run into one another
cross and recross in a thousand different waysso that the best disposed
as often hit the wrong as the right one, and are entrapped before they are
aware of their dangerous course. Worldly wisdom is here put at fault, and
the fool as often goes right as the wise man of lorethus showing,
notwithstanding
our free agency of choice that circumstances govern us, and that
what many put down as crime, is, in fact, oftentimes, neither more nor less
than error of judgement.
Then you consider free agency only a chance game, depending, as it
were, upon the throw of a die? obseryed Ella, inquiringly.
I believe this much of free agency, that a train of circumstances often
forces some to be evil and others good; and that we should look upon the
former, in many casesmind I do not say allas unfortunate, rather than
criminalwith pity rather than scorn; and so endeavor to reclaim them.
Were this doctrine more practised by Christiansby those whom the world
terms good, (but whom circumstances alone have made better than their
fellows,) there would be far less of sin, misery and crime abounding for
them to deplore. Let the creed of churches only be to ameliorate the
condition
of the poorrelieve the distressedremove temptations from youth
encourage the virtubus, and endeavor, by gentle means, to reclaim the
erringand the holy design of Him who died to save would nobly progress,
prisons would be turned into asylums, and scaffolds be things known only
by tradition.
Algernon spoke with an easy, earnest eloquence, and a force of emphasis
that made each word tell with proper effect upon his fair hearer. To Ella
the ideas he advanced were, many of them, entirely new; and she mused
thoughtfully upon them, as they rode along, without reply; while he,
becoming
warm upon a subject that evidently occupied no inferior place in his
mind, went on to speak of the wrongs and abuses which society in general
heaped upon the unfortunate, as he termed themcontrasted the charity
of professing Christians of the eighteenth century with that of Christ
himself
and
pointed out what he considered the most effectual means of remedy.
To show that a train of circumstances would frequently force persons against
their own will and reason to be what society terms criminal, he referred to
himself, and his own so far eventful destiny; and Ella could not but admit
to herself, that, in this case at least, his arguments were well grounded, and
she shaped her replies accordingly.
Thus conversing, they continued upon their course, until they came to
the brow of a steep descent, down which the path ran in a zigzag manner,
through a dark, gloomy ravine, now rendered intensely so to our travellers,
by the hour, their thoughts, the wildness of the scenery around, and the
dense growth of cedars covering the hollow, whose untrimmed branches,
growing even to the ground, overreached and partly obstructed their way.
By this time only one or two stars were visible in the heavens, and they
shone with pale, faint gleams, while in the east the beautiful gray and
orimson
tints of Aurora announced that day was already breaking on the
slumbering
world. Drawing rein, Algernon and Ella paused as if to
contemplate
the scene. Below and around them each object presented that misty,
indistinct appearance, which leaves the imagination power to give it either a
pleasing or hideous shape. In the immediate vicinity the country was
uneven
,
rocky, and covered with cedars; but far off to the right could be
discerned
the even surface of the cane-brake, previously mentioned, now
stretching away in the distance like the unruffied bosom of some beautiful
lake. A light breeze slightly rustled the leaves of the trees, among whose
branches an occasional songster piped forth his morning roundelay of
rejoicing
.
How lovely is nature in all her varieties! exclaimed Ella, with
animation
,
as she glanced over the scene.
Ay, and in that variety lies her loveliness, answered Algernon. It is
the constant and eternal change going forward that interests us, and gives
to nature her undying charm. Manhigh-souled, contemplative man
was not born to sameness. Variety is to his mind what food is to his body;
and as the latter, deprived of its usual nourishment, sinks to decayso the
former, from like deprivation of its strengthening power, becomes weak and
imbecile. Again, as coarse, plain food and hardy exercise add health and
vigor to the physicalso does the contemplation of nature in her wildness
and grandeur give to the mental a powerful and lofty tone. Of all writers
for poetical and vigorous intellects, give me those who have been reared
among cloud-capped hills, and craggy steeps, and rushing streams, and
roaring
cataracts; for their conceptions are grand, their comparisons beautiful,
and the founts from which they draw, as exhaustless almost as nature
herself
.
I have often thought the same myself, returned Ella; for I never
gaze upon a beautiful scene in nature, but I always feel refreshed therefor.
To me the two most delightful are morning and evening. I love to stand
upon some eminence, and mark, as now, the first gray, crimson and golden
streaks that rush up in the eastern sky, and catch the first rays of old Sol,
as he, surrounded by a reddened halo, shows his welcome face above the
hills; or at calm eve watch his departure, as with a last, fond, lingering
look he takes his leave, as 'twere in sorrow that he could not longer tarry;
while earth, not thus to be outdone in point of grief, puts on her sable dress
to mourn his absence.
Ah! Ella, said Algernon, turning to her with a gentle smile, methinks
morning and evening are somewhat indebted to you for a touch of poetry
in their behalf.
Rather say I am indebted to them for a thousand fine feelings I have not
even power to express, rejoined Ella.
Algernon was on the point of returning an answer, when, casting his eyes
down into the ravine, he slightly started, his gaze became fixed, and his
features
grew a shade more pale. Ella noticed this sudden change, and in a
voice slightly tremulous inquired the cause. For nearly a minute Algernon
made no reply, but kept his eyes steadily bent in the same direction,
apparently
riveted on some object below. Ella also looked down, but seeing
nothing worthy of note, and growing somewhat alarmed at his silence, was
on the point of addressing him again, when slightly turning his head, and
rubbing his eyes with his hand, he said:
Methought I saw a dark object move in the hollow below; but I think I
must have been mistaken, for all appears quiet there nownot even a limb
or so much as a leaf stirs. Lest there should be danger, however, dear Ella,
I will ride down first and ascertain. If I give an alarm, turn your horse
and do not spare him till you reaoh Wilson's.
No, no, no! exclaimed Ella, with vehemence, laying her hand upon
his arm, as he was about starting forward, her own features now growing
very pale. If you go, Algernon, you go not alone! If there is danger, I
will share it with you.
Algernon turned towards her a face that one moment crimsoned with
animation
and the next became deadly pale, while his whole frame quivered
with intense emotion, and he seemed vainly struggling to command
contending
feelings. Suddenly clusping her hand in his, he pressed it warmly,
raised it to his lips, and in a trembling tone said:
Elladear EllaGod bless you! If everbutnoOh God!Oh
God! and covering his face with his hands, he wept convulsively; while
she, no less deeply affected, could scarcely sit her horse.
At length Algernon withdrew his hands, and exhibited features pale but
calm. Drawing forth his pistols, he carefully examined their priming, and
then replaced them in his belt. During this operation, he failed not to press
Ella to alter her design and remain, while he went forward; but finding her
determined on keeping him company, he signified his readiness to proceed,
and both started slowly down the hill together. They reached the ravine
in safety, and had advanced some twenty yards farther, when suddenly there
arose a terrific Indian yell, followed instantly by the sharp report of several
fire-armsa wild, piercing shrieksome two or three heavy groansa
rustling among the treesand then by a stillness as deep and awfully
solemn as that which pervades the narrow house appointed for all living.
CHAPTER VII.
THE OLD WOODSMAN AND HIS DOGTHE WEDDING PARTYTHE FRIGHTTHE
MESSENGERTHE ALARMING INTELLIGENCETHE PREPARATIONS FOR PURSUIT.
The sun was perhaps an hour above the mountain tops, when a solitary
hunter, in the direction of the cane-brake, might have been seen shaping his
course toward the hill whereon Algernon and Ella had so lately paused to
contemplate the dawning day. Upon his shoulder rested a long rifle, and a
dog of the Newfoundland species sometimes followed in his steps or trotted
along by his side. In a few minutes he reached the place referred to, when
the snuffling of his canine companion causing him to look down, his
attention
instantly became fixed upon the foot-prints of the horses which had
passed there the day before, and particularly on the two that had repassed
there so lately.
What is it, Csar? said he, addressing the brute. Nothing wrong
here I reckon. Csar, as if conscious of his master's language, raised his
head, and looking down into the ravine, appeared to snuff the air; then
darting forward, he was quickly lost among the branching cedars. Scarcely
thirty seconds elapsed, ere a long, low howl came up from the valley; and
starting like one suddenly surprised by some disagreeable occurrence, the
hunter, with a cheek slightly blanched, hurried down the crooked path,
muttering as he went, Thar's something wrong, for sartinfor Csar
never lies.
In less than a minute the hunter came in sight of his dog, which he found
standing with his hind feet on the ground and his fore-paws resting upon the
carcass of a horse, that had apparently been dead but a short time. As C
sar perceived his master approach, he uttered another of those peculiar long,
low, mournful howls, which the superstitious not unfrequently interpret
as omens of evil.
Good heavens! exclaimed the hunter, as he came up, thar's been
foul play here, Csar, foul play for sartin. D'ye think, dog, it war Indians
as done it.
The brute looked up into the speaker's face, with one of those
expressions
of intelligence or sagacity, which seem to speak what the tongue has
not power to utter, and then wagging his tail, gave a sharp fierce bark.
Right, dog! continued the other, as stooping to the ground he began
to examine with great care the prints left there by human feet. Right,
dog, they're the rale varmints and no mistake. Ef all folks war as
sensible
and knowing as you, thar wouldn't be many fools about I reckon.
Having finished his examination on the ground, the hunter again turned
to look at the carcass of the horse, which was lying on its, left side, some
two feet from the path, and had apparently fallen dead from a shot in
the forehead, between the eyes. An old saddle, devoid of straps, lay just
concealed under the branching cedarsbut no other accoutrements were
visible. The ground around was trodden as if by a scuffle, and the limbs of
the trees were broken in many places, while in two or three others could be
seen spots of blood, not even yet drynone of which informants of the
recent
struggle escaped the keen observation of the woodsman. Suddenly
the dog, which had been watching his master's motions intently, put his
nose to the ground, darted along the path further into the ravine, and
presently
resounded another of those mournful howls.
Ha! another diskivery! exclaimed the hunter, as he started after
his companion. About thirty yards further on, he came upon the carcass
of another horse, which had been killed by a ball in the right side, and
the blow of some weapon, probably a tomahawk, on the head. By its side
also lay a lady's saddle, stripped like the former of its trappings. This
the woodsman now proceeded to examine attentively, for something
like a minute, during which time a troubled expression played over his
dark, sunburnt features.
I'm either mightily mistaken, said he at length, with a grave look, or
that thar horse and saddle is the property of Ben Younker; and I reckon
it's the same critter as is rid by Elia Barnwell. God forbid, sweet
lady
,
that it be thou as has met with this terrible misfortune!but ef it be,
by the Power that made me, I swar to follow on thy trail, and ef I meet
any of thy captors, then Betsey I'll just call on yoa for a backwoods
sentiment.
As he concluded, the hunter turned with a look of affection towards his
rifle, which he firmly grasped with a nervous motion. At this moment,
the dog, which had been busying himself by running to and fro with his
nose to the ground, suddenly paused, and laying back his ears, uttered a
low, fierce growl. The hunter cast toward him a quick glance, and
dropping
upon his knees, applied his ear to the earth, where he remained some
fifteen seconds; then rising to his feet, he made a motion with his hand, and
together with Csar withdrew into the thicket.
For some time no sound was heard to justify this precaution of the
woodsman
;
but at length a slight jarring of the ground became apparent, followed
by a noise at some distance, resembling the clatter of horses' feet, which,
gradually growing louder as the cause drew nearer, soon become sufficiently
so to put all doubts on the matter at rest. In less than five minutes from
the disappearance of the hunter, some eight or ten horses, bearing as many
riders, approached the hill from the direction of Wilson's and began to
descend
into the ravine. The party, composed of both sexes, was in high
gleesome jesting, some singing, and some laughing uproariously. Nothing
occurred to interrupt their merriment, until they began to lose themselves
among the cedars of the hollow, when the foremost horse suddenly gave a
snort and bounded to one sidea movement which his companion, close
behind
,
imitatedwhile the rider of the latter, a female, uttered a loud, piercing
scream of fright. In a moment the whole party was in confusionsome
turning their horses to the right about and riding back towards Wilson's, at
headlong speedand some pausing in fear, undecided what to do. The two
foremost horses now became very refractory, rearing and plunging in a
manner
that threatened to unseat their riders every moment. Of the two, the one
ridden by the lady was the most ungovernable; and in spite of her efforts
to sooth or hold him, he seized the bit in his teeth, and rearing on his hind
legs, plunged madly forward until he came to where the other carcass was
lying, when giving another snort of fear, he again reared, and turning aside
5
into the thicket, left his rider almost senseless in the path he had just quit
ted. Fortunately the beast shaped his course to where the hunter was
concealed, who, with a sudden spring as he was rushing past, seized upon
the bridle near the bit, and succeeded after a struggle in mastering and
leading him back to the path.
By this time the companion of the lady had come up, and seeing her
condition
,
was dismounting to render her assistance, when his eye falling upon
the stranger, he started and placed his hand quickly to his belt, as if in search
of some weapon of defence. The hunter saw the movement, and said with
a gesture of command:
Hold! young man; don't do any thing rash!
Who are you, sir?
A friend.
Your name! continued the other, as he sprang to the ground.
Names don't matter, stranger, in cases sech as this. I said I war a friend.
By what may I know you as such?
My deeds! returned the other, laconically. Think you, stranger, ef
I wanted to harm ye, I couldn't have done it without you seeing me? and
as he spoke, he glanced significantly towards his rifle.
True, returned the other; but what's the meaning of this? and he
pointed toward the dead horse.
It means Indians, as nigh as I can come at it, replied the hunter. But
look to the living afore the dead! And the woodsman in turn pointed toward
the lady.
Right! said the other; and springing to her side, he raised her in his
arms. She was not injured, other than slightly stunned by the fall, and she
quickly regained her senses. At first she was somewhat alarmed; but
perceiving
who supported her, and nothing in the mild, noble, benevolent
countenance
of the strangerwho was still holding her horse by the bridleof
a sinister nature, she anxiously inquired what had happened.
I can only guess by what I see, answered the hunter, that some o'
your company have been less fortunate than you. Didn't two o' them set
out in advance?
Gracious heavens! cried the young man supporting the lady; it is
Ella Barnwell and the stranger Reynolds!
Then they must be quickly trailed! rejoined the hunter briefly. Go,
young man, take your lady back agin, and raise an armed party for pursuit.
Be quick in your operations, and I'll wait and join you here. Leave your
horses thar, for we must take it afoot; and besides, gather as much
provision
as you can all easily carry, for Heaven only knows whar or when
our journey 'll end.
But do you think they're still living?
I hope so.
Then let us return, Henry, said the lady, as quick as possible, so
that a party for pursuit may be collected before the wedding guests have all
separated.
I fear it will be difficult, Mary, but we must try it, replied the young
man, as he assisted her to mount. Then turning to the stranger, he added:
But won't you accompany us, sir?
No, it can do no good; besides I'm afoot, and would only cause delay,
and thar's been too much o' that already.
At least, sir, favor me with your name.
The first white hunter o' old Kaintuck, answered the other, stroking
the neck of the fiery beast on which the lady was now sitting.
What! exclaimed the other, in a tone of surprise: Boone! Colonel
Danicl Boone?
Why, I'm sometimes called colonel, returned the hunter dryly, still
stroking the horse's neck; but Daniel's the older title, and a little the most
familiar one besides.
I crave pardon for my former rudeness, colonel, said the other,
advancing
and offering his hand; but you were a stranger to me you know.
Well, well, it's all rightI'd have done exactly so myself, answered
Boone, grasping the young man's hand with a cordiality that showed no
offence had been taken. And nowahow do you call yourself?
Henry Millbanks.
Now, Master Millbanks, pray be speedy; for while we talk our friends
may die, and it goes agin nater to think on't, said Boone, anxiously.
As he spoke, he led forward the lady's horse past the other carcass, while
Henry, springing upon his own beast, followed after. Having seen them
safely out of the ravine, the noble hunter turned back to wait the arrival
of the expected assistance. He had just gained the center of the thicket,
when he was slightly startled again by the growl of his dog, and the tramp
of what appeared to be another horse, coming from the direction of
Younker's
.
Hastily secreting himself, he awaited in silence the approach of the
new comer, whom he soon discerned to be an old acquaintance, who was
riding at a fast gallop, bearing some heavy weight in his arms. As he came
up to the carcass of Ella's horse, he slackened his speed, looked at it
earnestly
,
then gazed cautiously around, and was about to spur his beast onward
again, when the sound of Boone's voice reached his ear, requesting him to
pause; and at the same time, to his astonishment, Boone himself emerged
into the path before him.
Ha! Colonel Boone, said the horseman quickly, I'm glad to meet ye;
for now's a time when every true man's wanted.
What's the news, David Billings? inquired Boone, anxiously, as he
noticed a troubled, earnest expression in the countenance of the other.
Bad! answered Billings, emphatically. The Injens have been down
upon us agin in a shocking manner.
God forbid thar be many victims! ejaculated Boone, unconsciously
tightening the grasp on his rifle.
Too manytoo many! rejoined Billings, shaking his head sadly.
Thar's my neighbor Millbanks' family
Well, well! cried Boone, impatiently, as the other seemed to hesitate.
Have all been murdered, and his house burnt to ashes.
All? echoed Boone.
All but young Harry, who's fortunately away to a wedding at Wilson's.
Why the one you speak of war just now here, said Boone, with a start;
and I sent him back to raise a party to trail the red varmints, who've been
operating as you see yonder. Good heavens! what awful news for poor
Harry, who seems so likely a lad.
Yes, likely you may well say, returned the other; and so war the
whole familyGod ha' mercy on 'em! But what's been done here?
Why I suppose Ella BarnwellYounker's niece, you knowand a likely
young stranger who war along with her, called Reynolds, have been
captured
.
Ha! well it's supposed Younker and his wife are captives too, or else
that thar bones lie white among the ashes of thar own ruins.
Good God! cried Boone. Any more, David?
Yes, thar's Absalom Switcher and his wife, and a young gal of twelve;
and Ephraim Stokes' wife and a young boy of five, who war left by
themselves
,
(Stokes himself being away, and his son Seth at the wedding, as was
a son o'Switcher's also) have all bin foully murderedbesides Johnny
Long's family, Peter Pierson's, and a young child of Fred Mason's, that
happened to be at Pierson's house, and one or two others whose names I
disremember.
But when did this happen, David?
Last night, replied the other. It's suspected that the Injens ha' bin
waiting round here, and took advantage of this wedding, when the greater
part on 'em war away. It's thought too that thar war a white spy out, who
gin 'em information, and led 'em onas a villainous looking chap war seed
about the vicinity not long ago.
Do they suspicion who war the spy? asked Boone.
Why some thinks as how it war that thar accussed renegade, Simon
Girty.
Wretch! muttered Boone, grasping his rifle almost fiercely; I'd like
to have old Bess, here, hold a short conflab with him. But what have you
got thar in your arms, that seems so heavy. David?
Rifles, colonel. I've bin riding round and collecting on 'em for this
mad party of Younker's, who went off without any precaution; and I'm now
on my way to deliver 'em, that they may start instanter arter the cussed
red skins, and punish 'em according to the Mosaic law.
Spur on then, David, and you may prehaps overtake some o'them; and
all that you do, arm and send 'em here as quick as possiblefor I'm
dreadful
impatient to be off.
The colloquy between the two thus concluded, the horsemana strongly
built, hard-favored, muscular man of fortyset spurs to his horse; and
bounding onward toward Wilson's (distant some five milesthe ravine
being about half way between the residence of the groom and bride), he was
quickly lost to the sight of the other, who quietly seated himself to await
the reinforcement.
In the course of half an hour, Boone was joined by some three or four of
the wedding party, who had been overtaken by Billings, learned the news,
accepted a rifle each, bidden their fair companions adieu, and sent them and
the horses back to the house of the bride, while they moved forward to meet
danger, rescue the living, and seek revenge.
In the course of an hour and a half, Billings himself returned, accompanied
by some seven or eight stout hearts, among whom were young Switcher,
Stokes, Millbanks, and lastly, Isaac Younker, who had been roused from
the nuptial bed to hear of the terrible calamity that had befallen his friends.
Isaac; on the present occasion, did not disgrace his training, the land which
gave him birth, nor the country he now inhabited. When the messenger
came with the direful news, although somewhat late in the morning, Isaac
had been found in his bed, closely folded in the arms of the god of sleep. On
being awakened and told of what had taken place, he slowly rose up into a
sitting posture, rubbed his eyes, stared searchingly at his informant,
gathered
himself upon his feet, threw on his wedding garments, and made all
haste to descend below, where he at once sought out his new wife, Peggy,
who had risen an hour before, and grasping her by the hand, in a voice
slightly tremulous, but with a firm, determined expression in his features,
said:
Peggy, dear, I 'spect you've heard the whole on't. Father, mother,
Ella and Reynoldsall gone, and our house in ashes. I'm going to follow,
Peggy. Good byeGod bless you! Ef I don't never come back, Peggy
and the tears started into his eyesyou may jest put it down I've been
clean sarcumvented, skinned, and eat up by them thar ripscallious Injens;
and turning upon his heel, as his tender hearted spouse burst into tears, he
seized upon some provisions that had graced the last night's entertainment,
gave Black Betty a long and cordial salute with his lips, shook hands with
his wife's father and mother, kissed Peggy once again, pulled his cap over
his eyes, and, without another word, set forth with rapid strides on the
eastern path leading to the rendezvous of Daniel Boone.
On the faces of those now assembled, who had lost their best and dearest
friends, could be seen the intense workings of the strong passions of grief
and revenge, while their fingers clutched their faithful rifles with a nervous
power. The greatest change was apparent in the features of Henry
Millbanks
.
He was a fine-favored, good-looking youth of eighteen, with light
hair and a florid complexion. The natural expression of his handsome
countenance was an easy, dignified smile, which was rendered extremely
fascinating by a broad, noble forehead, and a clear, expressive, gray eye;
but now the floridity had given place to a pale, almost shallow hue, the
forehead
was wrinkled with grief, the lips were compressed, and the smile had
been succeeded by a look of great fierceness, aided by the eye, which was
more than usual sunken and bloodshot.
But little was said by any of the party; for all felt the chilling gloom of
the present, so strongly contrasted with the bright hours and merry jests
which had so lately been apportioned to each. Boone called to Csar and
bade him seek the Indian trail; a task which the noble brute flew to
execute
;
and in a few minutes the whole company were on their way, with the
exception of Billings, who, by the unanimous request of all, returned to
Wilson's, to cheer, console and protect the females, and, if thought
advisable
,
to conduct them to Bryan's Stationa strong fort a few miles distant
where they might remain in comparative security.
CHAPTER VIII.
THE INDIANS AND THEIR PRISONERSFRESH ARRIVALSTHE RENEGADETHE
THREATTHE STRATAGEM.
While the events just chronicled were enacting in one part of the
country
,
others, of a different nature, but somewhat connected with them, were
taking place in another. In a dark, lonely pass or gorge of the hills, some
ten miles to the north of the scene of the preceding chapter, where the
surrounding
trees grew so thick with branches and leaves that they almost
entirely excluded the sunlight from the waters of a stream which there
rolled foaming and roaring between the hills aud over and against the rocks
of its precipitous bed, or, plunging down some frightful precipice, lay as if
stunned or exhausted by the fall in the chasm below, mirroring in its still
bosom with a gloomy reflection the craggy steeps rising majestically above
it,in this dark and lonely pass, we say, was a party of human beings, to
whom the proper developement of our story now calls us.
The company in question was composed of eight persons, five of whom
were Indians of the Seneca tribe;
[5]
[5]
Some historians have stated that the Indians here alluded to were Mingoes, and
not
Senecas; and that they were a remnant of the celebrated Logan's tribe.
the others,a thin faced, gaunt, stoop
shouldered man past the middle agea rather corpulent, masculine looking
woman, a few years his juniora little fair haired, blue eyed, pretty
faced girl of six,were white captives. Four of the Indians were seated or
partly reclining on the ground, with their guns beside them, ready for
instant
use if necessary, engaged in roasting slices of deer meat before a fire
that had been kindled for the purpose. The fifth savage was pacing to and
fro, with his rifle on his arm, performing the double duty of sentinel and
guard over the prisoners, who were kept in durance by strong cords, some
ten paces distant. The old man was secured by a stick passing across his
back horizontally, to which both wrists and arms were tightly bound by
thongs of deer skin. To prevent the possibility of escape, both legs were
fastened together by the same material, and a long, stout rope encircling his
neck was attached to a tree hard by. This latter precaution and much of
the former seemed unnecessary; for there was a mild look of resigned
dejection on his features, as they bent toward the earth, with his chin
resting
on his bosom, that appeared strongly at variance with any thing like
flight or strife. His female companion was fastened in like manner to the
tree, but in other respects only bound by a stout thong around the wrists in
front. The third member of the white party, the little girl, was seated at
the feet of the old man, with her small wrists also bound until they had
swollen so as to pain her, looking up from time to time into his face with a
heart-rending expression of grief, fear and anxiety.
Of the Indians themselves, we presume it would be difficult to find, among
all the tribes of America, five more blood thirsty, villainous looking beings
than the ones in question. They were only partially dressed, after the
manner of their tribe, with skins around their loins, extending down to their
knees, and moccasins on their feet, leaving the rest of their bodies and limbs
bare. Around their waists were belts, for the tomahawk and scalping knife,
at three of which now hung freshly taken scalps. Their faces had been
hideously painted for the war-path; but heat and perspiration had since out
done the artist, by running the composition into streaks, in such a way as
to give them the most diabolical appearance imaginable. On each of their
heads was a tuft of feathers, some of which had the appearance of having
recently been scorched and blackened by fire, while their arms and bodies
were here and there besmeared with blood.
The four around the fire were in high, good glee, as they roasted and
devoured their meatjudging from their nods, and grins, and grunts of
approbation, whenever their eyes glanced in the direction of their
prisoners
the
effect of which was far from consoling to the matron of the latter,
who, having eyed them for some time in indignant silence, at length burst
forth with angry vehemence:
Well now jest grin and jabber and grin, like a pesky set o'nateral born
monkeys, that's ten times better nor you is any day of your good for
nothing
,
sneaking lives. Goodness, gracious, marsy on me alive! continued
the dame, whom the reader has doubtless recognised as Mrs. Younker, I
only jest wish you had to change places with me and Ben here for about
five minutes, and ef I didn't make your old daubed, nasty, villainous,
unyarthly
looking faces, grin to another tune, I hope I may never be blessed
with liberty agin in creation, as long as I live on the face o' this univarsal
yarth!
Ugh! ejaculated the sentinel, turning towards the speaker, as she
concluded
her fierce tirade of abuse, at the same time placing his hand on the
tomahawk in his belt with an angry gesture: Ugh! me squaw killshe no
stop much talky!
You'd kill me, would ye? you mean, dirty, ripscallious looking varmint
of the woods you, that don't know a pin from a powder horn! rejoined the
undaunted Mrs. Younker, in a vehement tone: You'd kill me for using
the freedom of tougue, as these blessed Colomies is this moment fighting for
with the tarnal Britishers? You'd kill me, would ye? Well, it's jest my
first nateral come at opinion, as I telled Ben here, not more'n a quarter o'
an hour ago, that you war jest mean enough for any thing, as ever war
invented, in the whole universal yarth o' creationso of you do kill me, I
won't be in the leastest grain disappinted, no how.
Don't, Dorothydon't irritate the savage for nothing at all! said her
husband, who, raising his head at the first remark of the Indian, now saw in
his fierce flashing eyes, angry gestures, and awful contortions of visage, that
which boded the sudden fulfilment of his threat: Don't irritate him, and
git murdered for your pains, Dorothy! Why can't you be more quiet?
Don't talk to me about being quiet, Benjamin Younker, away out here
in the woods, a captive to such imps as them thar, with our house all burnt
to nothing like, and our cows and sheeps and hosses destructed, and
Here the speech of the good woman was suddenly cut short, by the
whizzing
of a tomahawk past her head, which slightly grazed her cheek, and
lodged in the tree a few feet beyond. Whether it was aimed at her life and
missed its mark, or whether it was merely done to frighten her, does not
appear; though the manner of the savage, after the weapon was thrown,
inclines us to the latter supposition; for instead of rushing upon her with
his knife, he walked deliberately to the tree, withdrew the tomahawk, and
then turning to her, and brandishing it over her head, said:
Squaw, still be! Speak much, me killum!
Be the design of the Indian what it might, the whole proceeding certainly
produced one result, which nothing had ever been known to do beforeit
awed to silence the tongue of Mrs. Younker, just at a moment when talking
would have been such a relief to her overcharged spirit; and merely
muttering
,
in an under tone, I do jest believe the ripscallious varmint is in
arnest sure enough! she held her speech for the extraordinary space of
half an hour.
Meantime the other savages finished their repast, and having offered a
portion of it to the prisoners, which the latter refused, they proceeded to
destroy their fire, by casting the burning brands into the rushing waters of
the stream below. This done, they extended their circle somewhateach
placing himself by a tree or rockand then in the most profound silence
stood like bronzed statuary, apparently awaiting the arrival of another
party. At lastand just as the sun was beginning to peep over the brow
of the steep above them, and let his rays struggle with the matted foliage of
the trees, for a glimpse of the roaring waters underneathone of the
Indians
started, looked cautiously around, dropped flat upon the earth, and
then rising, and motioning with his hand for all to be silent, glided
noiselessly
away, like the shadow of some evil spirit, into the surrounding thicket.
He had scarcely been absent three minutes, when a slight crackling among
the brush was heard near at hand, and immediately after he rejoined his
companions, followed by a party of eight Indian warriors, and two white
prisoners, headed by a low-browed, sinister, blood-thirsty looking white
man, in a garb resembling that worn by a subordinate British officer. His
coat was red, with facings of another color, underneath which was partially
displayed a handsome vest and ruffled shirt. About his waist passed a broad
wampum belt, in which were confined a brace of silver mounted pistols
another pair of less finish and valuea silver handled dirka scalping
knife and tomahawk, on whose blades could be seen traces of blood.
Around his neck was a neatly tied cravat, and dangling in front of his vest
a gold chain, which connected with a watch hid in a pocket of his breeches,
whence depended a larger chain of steel, supporting in turn three splendid
gold seals and two keys. His nether garments were breeches, leggins and
moccasins, all of deer skin, and without ornament. His hat, not unlike
those of the present day, was on this occasion graced with a red feather,
which protruded above the crown, and corresponded well with his general
appearance.
The Indian companious of this individual, were no wise remarkable for
any thing, unless it might be ferocity of expression. They were habited,
with but one exception, like those previously described, and evidently
belonged
to the same tribe. This exception was a large, athletic, powerful
Indian, rather rising of six feet, around whose waist was a finely worked
wampum belt, over whose right shoulder, in a transverse direction, extended
a red scarf, carelessly tied under the left arm, and in whose nose and ears
were large, heavy rings, denoting him to be either a chief or one in
command
.
His age was about thirty; and his features, though perhaps less
ferocious than some of his companions, were still enough so to make him an
object of dread and fear. His forehead was low, his eye black and piercing,
and his nose rather flat and widely distended at the nostrils. He was called
Peshewa: Anglice, Wild-cat.
As the prisoners of the latter party came in sight of those of the former,
there was a general start and exclamation of surprise, while the sad faces
of each showed how little pleasure they felt in meeting each other under
such painful circumstances. The last comers, as the reader has doubtless
conjectured, were Algernon and Ella. Immediately on their entering the
ravine, as previously recorded, they had been set upon by savages, their
horses shot from under them, and themselves made captives. This result,
however, as regards Algernon, had not been effected without considerable
effort on the part of his numerous enemies. At the first fire, his horse had
fallen; but disentangling himself, and drawing his pistols, he sprang upon
the side of his dying beast, and discharged them both at his nearest foes
one of which had taken effect, and sent a warrier to his last account. Then
leaping in among them, he drew his knife and cut madly about him until
secured; though doubtless he would have been tomahawked on the spot,
only that he might be reserved for the tortures, when his brutal captors
should arrive at their destination. Meantime the animal which bore the
lovely Ella, being wounded by the same fire which had killed her
companion's
bounded forward some twenty paces, when a blow on the head with
a tomahawk laid him prostrate, and she had been secured also. The party
had then proceeded to bury the dead, at some little distance, and start upon
their journey, to join their companionswhich latter we have just seen
accomplished.
As soon as mutual recognitions had passed between the prisoners, the
individual habited in the British uniform stepped forward and said, jocosely:
So, friends, we all meet again, do we, eh?ha, ha, ha!
At the sound of his voice, the old man and his wife, both of whom had
been too intently occupied with Algerpon and Ella to notice him before,
started, and turning their eyes suddenly upon him, simultaneously exclaimed:
Mr. Williams!
Sometimes
Mr. Williams, answered the other, with a strong emphasis on
the first word, accompanying it with a horrible oath; but now, when disguise
is no longer necessary, Simon Girty, the renegade, by!ha, ha, ha!
As he uttered these words, in a hoarse, bragadocia tone, a visible shudder
of fear or disgust, or both combined, passed through the frame of each of
the prisoners; and Algernon turning to him, with an expression of loathing
contempt, said:
I more than half suspected as much, when I sometime since
contemplated
your low-browed, hang-dog countenance. Of course we can expect
no mercy at such hands.
Mercy! cried Girty, tuining fiercely upon him, his eyes gleaming
savagely, his mouth twisting into a shape intended to express the most
withering
contempt, while his words fairly hissed from between his tightly set
teeth: Mercy? dog! No, by hl! for none like you! Hark ye, Mr.
Reynolds! Were you in the damnable cells of the Inquisition, accused of
heresy, and about to be put to the tortures, you might think yourself in
Paradise compared to what you shall yet undergo!
As he uttered these words, Ella shrieked and fell fainting to the earth.
Springing to, Girty raised her in his arms, and pointing to her pale features,
as he did so, continued:
See! Mr. Reynolds, this girl loves you; I love her; we are rivals; and
you, my rival, are in my power: and by ! and all the powers of
darkness
,
you shall feel my vengeance!
You love her? broke in Mrs. Younker, who, despite her previous
dangerous
warning, could hold her peace no longer: You love her! you mean,
contemptible, red headed puppy! I don't believe as how you knows enough
to love nothing! And so you're Simon Girty, hey? that thar sneaking,
red-coat renegade! Well, I reckon as how you've told the truth once; for
I've hearn tell that he war an orful mean looking imp o' Satan; and I jest
don't believe as how a meaner one nor yourself could be sheer'd up in the
whole universal yarth o' creation.
Rail on, old woman! replied Girty, as he chafed the temples of Ella
with his hands; but in a little lower key, or I shall be under the necessity
of ordering a stopper to your mouth; which, saving the tortures of the
stake, is the worst punishment for you I can now invent. As for you, Mr.
Younker, continued he, turning his face to the old man, with a peculiar
expression, you seem to have nothing to say to an old friendha, ha,
ha!
Whensomever I mention the name o' Simon Girty, replied Younker,
in a deliberate and startlingly solemn tone, I al'ays call down God's curse
upon the fiendish renegadeand I do so now.
By ! old man, cried Girty, casting Ella roughly from him, and
starting upright, the perfect picture of a tiend in human shape, another
word, and your brains shall be scattered to the four winds of heaven! As he spoke, he brandished his tomahawk over the other's head, while the child
before noticed, uttered a wild seream, and sprang to Mrs. Younker, at whose
side she crouched in absolute terror.
Strike! answered Younker, mildly, with an unchauged countenance,
his eye resting steadily upon the other, who could not meet his gaze in the
same manner. Strike! Simon Girty; for I'm a man that's never feared
death, and don't now; besides, I reiterate all I've said, and with my dying
breath pray God to curse ye!
Not yet! rejoined Girty, smothering his rage, as he replaced his
weapon. Not yet, Ben Younker; for you take death too easy; and by
! I'll make it have terrors for you! But what child is this? continued
he, grasping the little girl fiercely by the arm, causing her to utter a cry of
pain and fear. By heavens! what do we with squalling children? Here,
Oshasqua, I give her in your charge; and if she yelp again, brain her, by
! and he closed with an oath.
The Indian whom we have previously noticed as the sentinel, stepped
forward, with a demoniac gleam of satisfaction on his ugly countenance, and
taking the child by the hand, led her away some ten paces, where he annused
himself by stripping her of such apparel as he fancied might ornament his
own person; while she, poor little thing; afraid to cry aloud, could only sob
forth the bitterness of her heart.
Meantime Girty turning to Ella, and finding her gradually recovering,
assisted her to rise; and then motioning the chief aside, he held a short
consultation with him, in the Indian dialect, regarding their next
proceedings
,
and the disposal of the prisoners.
Were it not, Peshewa, for his own base words, said the renegade, in
reply to some remark of his Indian ally, I would have spared him; but
now, and his features exhibited the concentrated expression of infernal
hate and revenge; but now, Peshewa, he dies! with all the horrors of the
stake, that you, a noble master of the art of torture, can invent and inflict.
The Long Knife
[6]
[6]
Sometimes Big Knifefirst applied to the Virginians by the Indians.
must not curse the red-man's friend in his own camp and
go unpunished. I commend him to your merey, Peshewaha, ha, ha! and
he ended with a hoarse, fiend-like laugh.
Ugh! returned Wild-cat, giving a gutteral grunt of satisfaction,
although
not a muscle of his rigid features moved, and, save a peculiar gleam
of his dark eye, nothing to show that he felt uncommon interest in the
sentence
of Younker: Peshewa a chief! The Great Spirit give him memory
the Great Spirit give him invention. He will remember what he have
done to prisoners at the stake,he can invent new tortures. But the squaw?
Ay, the squaw! answered the renegade, musingly; the old man's
wifeshe must he disposed of also. Ha! a thought strikes me, Peshewa:
You have no wife, (the savage gave a grunt) suppose you take her?
Peshewa started, and his eyes flashed fire, as he said with great energy:
Does the wolf mate with his hunter, that you ask a chief of the Great
Spirit's red children to mate with their white destroyer?
Then do with her what you dn please, rejoined Girty, throwing in an
oath. I was only jesting, Peshewa. But come, we must be on the move!
for this last job will not be long a secret; and then we shall have the Long
Knives after us as hot as hl. We must divide our party. I will take with
me these last prisoners and six warriors, and you the others. A quarter of
a mile below here we will separate and break our trail in the stream; you
and your party by going up a pieceI and mine by going down. This will
perplex them, and give us time. Make your trail conspicuous, Peshewa,
and I will be careful to leave none whatever, if I can help it; for, by !
I must be sure to escape with my prisoners. If you are close pressed, you
can brain and scalp yours; but for some important reasons, I want mine to
live. We will meet, my noble Peshewa, at the first bend of the Big Miami.
The Indian heard him through, without moving a muscle of his seemingly
blank features; and then answered, a little haughtily:
Kitchokema
Great Chiefa term sometimes given to
Girty by the Indians.
plans all, and gives his red brother all the danger; but
Peshewa is brave, and fears not.
And do you think it's through fear? asked Girty, angrily.
Peshewa makes no charges against his brother, answered Wild-cat,
quietly.
Perhaps it is as well he don't, rejoined Girty, in an under tone,
knitting
his brows; and then quickly added: Come, Peshewa, let us move;
for while we tarry, we are giving time to our white foes.
Thus ended the conference; and in a few minutes after the whole party
was in motion. Following the course of the waters down to the base of the
hills, they came to a sloping hollow of some considerable extent, where the
stream ran shallow ever a smooth, beautiful bed. Into this latter the whole
company now entered, for the purpose of breaking the trail, as previously
intimated by Girty; and here they divided, according to his former plan also.
If the unhappy prisoners regretted meeting one another in distress, their
parting regrets were an hundred fold more poignant; for to them it seemed
evidently the last time they would ever behold on earth each others faces;
and this thought alone was enough to dim the eyes of Ella and her adopted
mother with burning tears, and shake their frames with heart rending sobs
of anguish; while the old man and Algernon, although both strove to be
stoical, could not look on unmoved to a similar show of grief. Since their
meeting, the captives had managed to converse together sufficiently to learn
the manner of each others capture, and give each other some hope of being
successfully followed and released by their friends; but now, when they
saw the caution displayed by their enemies in breaking the trail, they began
to fear for the result. Just before entering the stream, they passed through
a cluster of bushes that skirted the river's bank; and Ella, the only prisoner
whose hands were unbound, by a quick and sly movement succeeded in
detaching a small portion of her dress, which she there left as a sign to
those who might follow, that she was still alive, and so encourage them to
proceed, in case they were about to falter and turn back.
The separation being now speedily effected, the two parties were quickly
lost to each otherGirty and his band going down the bed of the stream
some two hundred yards before touching the bank; and the others, headed
by Wild-cat, going up about half that distance.
Leaving each to their journey, let us now return to the band already in
pursuit.
CHAPTER IX.
THE PURSUERSTHE SEARCH FOR THE TRAILTHE OLD WOODSMAN'S SAGACITY
THE DIVISIONTHE PERPLEXITYTHE MYSTERIOUS LEAFTHE CAMPTHE
STORMTHE ALARMTHE MEETING.
About an hundred yards from where Boone and his young companions
set forth, the dog, which was running along before them, paused, and with
his nose to the ground, set up a fierce bark. When arrived at the spot, the
party halted and perceived the body of an Indian, slightly covered with
earth, leaves, and a few dry bushes. Hastily throwing off the covering from
his head, they discovered hideous features, wildly distorted by the last three
of death, and bloody from a wound in his forehead made by a ball. His
scalp had been taken off also, by those who buried himfrom fear,
probably
,
that he would be found by enemies, and this secured as a trophya
matter of disgrace which the savage, under all circumstances, ever seeks to
avoid, both for himself and friends.
Well done, Master Reynolds! observed Boone, musingly, spurning the
body with his foot, turning away, and resuming his journey: You're a
brave young man; and I'll bet my life to a bar-skin, did your best under
the sarcumstances; and ef it's possible, we'll do somewhat for you in return.
Well, ef he arh't a brave chapthat thar same Algernen Reynolds
then jest put it down as how Isaac Younker don't know nothing 'bout faces,
returned the individual in question, in reply to Boone. I never seed a
man with his fore'ed and eye as would run from danger when a friend war
by, wanting his sarvice.
Ay, he is indeed a clever youth! rejoined Boone.
Well, colonel, he's all that, again returned Isaac; and I'll al'ays look
'pon't in the light o' a sarvice, that you jest placed him in my hands, when
he war wounded; for to do sech as him a kindness, al'ays carries along its
own reward. And Ella, my poor sweet cousin, as war raised up in good
sarcumstances, and lost her allshe too I reckon feels kind o' grateful to
you, colonel, besides.
As how? asked Boone.
Why I don't know's it's exactly right for me to tell as how, replied
Isaac, shrewdly, who was fearful of saying what Ella herself might wish
kept a secret.
I understand ye, said Boone, in a low tone, heard only by Isaac; and
the subject was then changed for one more immediately connected with
their present journey.
In the course of conversation that followed, it was asked of Boone how he
chanced to be in the vicinity, and learnt of the calamity that had befallen
Algernon and Ella, before any of the others; to which he replied, by stating
that he was on his way from Boonesborough to Bryan's Station, and coming
into the path just above the ravine, had been indebted to his noble brute
companion for the discoverya circumstance which raised Csar in the
estimation of the whole party to a wonderful degree. Nor was this
estimation
lessened by the conduct of Csar himself in the present instance; for
true to his training, instinct and great sagacity, he led them forward at a
rapid pace, and seemed possessed of reasoning powers that would have done
no discredit to an intelligent human being. One instance in point is worthy
of note. In passing through a dense thicket on the Indian trail, the noble
brute discovered a small fragment of ribbon, which he instantly seized in his
mouth, and turning back to his master, came up to him wagging his tail,
with a look expressive of joy, and dropped it at his feet. On examination it
was recognised as a detached portion of a ribbon worn by Ella; and this
little incident gave great animation and encouragement to the partyas it
proved, that she at least was yet alive, and had a hope of being followed by
friends.
Some two hours from their leaving the ravine, they came to the dark
pass, where we have seen the meeting between the two Indian parties. Here
our pursuers halted a few minutes to examine the ground, and form
conjectures
as to what had taken placein doing which, all paid the greatest
deference to the opinions and judgement of Boone, who was looked upon by
all who knew him as a master in the woodsman's craft.
After gazing intently for some time at the foot prints, Boone informed his
companions that another party had been in waiting, had been joined by the
others, and that all had proceeded together down the stream; and moreover,
that there was an addition of white prisoners, one of which was a child.
This caused a great sensation among his listenersmany of whom had lost
their relatives, as the reader already knowsand Hope, the cheering angel,
which hovers around us on our pathway through life, began to revive in
each breast, that the friends they were mourning as dead, might still be
among the living, and so made them more eager than ever to press on to the
rescue.
At the river's bank, the sagacious Csar discovered another piece of
ribbondropped there as the reader knows by Ellawhich he carried in
triumph to his master, and received in turn a few fond caresses.
Here, said Boone, as himself and companions entered the streamlet,
whose clear, bright waters, to the depth of some three inches, rolled merrily
over a smooth bed, with a pleasing murmur: Here, lads, I reckon we'll
have difficulty; for the red varmints never enter a stream for nothing; and
calculating pretty shrewdly they'd be followed soon, no doubt they've taken
good care to puzzle us for the trail. Ef it be as I suspect, we'll divide on
the other side, and a part o' us go up, and a part down, till we come agin
upon thar track. But then agin, added Boone, musingly, with a troubled
expression, it don't follow, that because they entered the stream they
crossed it; and it's just as likely they've come out on the same side they
went in; so that we'll have to make four divisions, and start on the sarch.
Accordingly on reaching the other shore, and finding the trail was lost,
Boone divided the partyassigning each his placeand separating, six of
them recrossed the stream, and dividing again, two, headed by Isaac, went
up, and two led by Henry Millbanks went down along the bank; while
Boone and Seth Stokes, with the rest, proceeded in like manner on the
opposite side, and the dog flew hither and yon, to render what service he
could also. For something like a quarter of an hour not the least trace of
the savages could be found, when at last the voice of Isaac was heard shouting.
I've got itI've got it! Here it is, jest as plain and nateral as
cornstalks
Hooray!
In a few minutes the whole company was gathered around Isaac, who
pointed triumphantly to his discovery.
That's the trail sure enough, observed Boone, bending down to scan
it closely; and rather broad it is too. It's not common for the wily
varmints
to do thar business in so open a manner, and I suspicion it's done for
some trickery. Look well to your rifles, lads, and be prepared for an
ambush
in you thicket just above thar, while I look carefully along this for a
few rods, just to see ef I can make out thar meaning. They've spread
themselves
here considerable, continued the old hunter, after examining the
trail a few minutes in silence; but ef they thinks to deceive one that has
been arter 'em as many times as I, they've made quite a mistake; for I can
see clean through thar tricks, as easy as light comes through greased paper.
What discovery have you made now? inquired young Millbanks, who,
together with the others, pressed eagerly around Boone to hear his answer.
Why I've diskivered what I war most afeard on, answered the
woodsman
.
I've diskivered that the varmints have divided, for the sake of
giving
us trouble, or leading us astray from them as they cares most about.
See here! and bending down to the ground, Boone pointed out to his young
companions, many of whom were entirely ignorant of that ingenious art of
wood-craft, whereby the experienced trapper knows his safety or danger in
the forest, as readily as the sailor knows his on the ocean, and which appears
to the uninitiated like a knowledge superhumanBoone pointed out to them,
we say, three distinct foot prints, which he positively asserted were neither
made by the Indians nor the captives of the ravine.
But I'd jest like to know, Colonel Boone, how you can be so sartin o'
what you declar, of it wouldn't be for putting you to too much trouble,
said one of the party, in surprise.
Obsarve, replied Boone, who, notwithstanding it would cause some
little delay, was willing to gratifying his young friends, by imparting to them
what information he could regarding an art so important to frontier life:
Obsarve that print thar (pointing with his finger to the largest one of the
three); now that war never made by Master Reynolds, for it's much too
big; and this I know from having got the dimension o' his track afore I left
the ravine to trail him; and I know it war never made by one o' the red
heathen, for it arn't the shape of thar feet; and besides, you'll notice how
the toe turns out'and from the heela thing an Indian war never guilty on
for they larn from children to tread straight forward. The next one
you'll obsarve turns out in like manner; and though it's smaller nor the
first, it arn't exactly the shape of Reynolds's, and it's too big for Ella's; and
moreover I opine it's a woman'sthough for the matter o' that I only guess
at it. The third you perceive is the child's; and them thar three are the
only ones you can find that arn't Indian's. Now note agin that the trail's
spread here, and that here and thar a twig's snapped on the bushes along
thar way, which the red-skins have done a purpose to make thar course
conspicuous, to draw thar pursuers on arter 'em, prehaps for an ambush,
prehaps to keep them from looking arter the others.
In this perplexity what are we to do? inquired young Millbanks.
Why, answered Boone, energetically, God knows my heart yearns to
rescue all my fellow creaters who're in distress; but more particularly,
prehaps, them as I know's desarving; and as I set out for Master Reynolds,
and his sweet companion, Ella Barnwell, God bless her! I somehow reckon
it's my duty to follow themthough I leave the rest o' ye to choose for
yourselves. Ef you want to divide, and a part go this trail and part follow
me, mayhap it'll be as well in the end.
This plan seemed the best that could be adopted under the circumstances;
and after some farther consultation among themselves, it was finally agreed
that Isaac, with six otherstwo of whom were Switcher and Stokesshould
proceed on the present trail; while Millbanks and the remainder should
accompany
Boone. Isaac was chosen as the most suitable one to lead his party,
on account of his foresight and shrewdness, and, withal, some little
knowledge
which he possessed of the country and the woodsman's artpreviously
gained in a tour with his father, when seeking a location, together with an
expedition of considerable extent shortly after made with Boone himself.
To him, as the leader, the noble old hunter now turned, and in a brief
manner imparted some very important advice, regarding his mode of
proceeding
under various difficulties, particularly cautioned him against any
rash act, and concluded by saying, Wharsomever or howsomever you may
be fixed, Isaac, and you his companions, (addressing the young men by his
side) don't never forget the injunction o' Daniel Boone, your friend, that
you must be cool, steady and firm; and whensomever you fire at a painted
varmint, be sure you don't throw away your powder!
He then proceeded to shake hands with each, bidding them farewell and
God speed, in a manner so earnest and touching as to draw tears from many
an eye unused to the melting mood. The parting example of Boone was
now imitated by the others, and in a few minutes both divisions had resumed
their journey.
Dividing his party again as before, Boone proceeded with them to examine
closely both banks of the stream for the other trail. Commencing where
they had left off on the announcement of Isaac, they moved slowly
downward
,
taking due note of every bush, leaf and blade as they went along
often pausing and bending on their knees, to observe some spot more
minutely, where it seemed probable their enemies had withdrawn from the
water. Csar, too, apparently comprehending the object of their search,
ran to and fro, snuffing at every thing he saw, sometimes with his nose to
the ground and sometimes elevated in the air. At length he gave a
peculiar
whine, at a spot about twenty yards below that which had been reached
by his master, on the side opposite Isaac's discovery; and hastening to
him, Boone immediately communicated to the others the cheering
intelligence
that the trail had been found.
Each now hurrying forward, the old hunter was soon joined by his young
friends; not one of whom, on coming up, failed to express surprise that he
should be so positive of what their eyes eyes gave them not the least proof.
The place where they were now assembled, was at the base of a hill, which
terminated the flat or hollow in that direction, and turned the stream at a
short bend off to the left, along whose side its waters ran for some twenty
yards, when the arm or projection of the ridge ended, and allowed it to turn
and almost retrace its path on the opposite sidethus forming an eliptical
bow. At the point in question, rose a steep bank of rocks, of limestone
formation, against which the stream, during the spring and fall floods, had
rolled its tide to a height of six or eight feet; and had lodged there, from
time to time, various sorts of refusesuch as old leaves, branches and roots
of trees, and the like encumbrances to the smooth flow of its waters. On
these rocks it was that the eyes of the party were now fixed; while their
faces exhibited expressions of astonishment, that the old hunter should be
able to distinguish marks of a recent trail, where they could perceive
nothing
but the undisturbed surface of what perhaps had been ages in forming.
And so, lads, you don't see no trail thar, eh? said Boone, with a quiet
smile, after having listened to various observations of the party, during
which time he had been carelessly leaning on his rifle.
Why, I must confess I can see nothing of the kind, answered Henry.
Nor I, rejoined another of the party.
Well, ef thar be any marks o' a trail here, jest shoot me with red
pepper
and salt, ef ever I'm cotched bragging on my eyes agin, returned a
third.
That thar observation 'll hold good with me too, uttered a fourth.
Here's in, said the fifth and last.
You're all young men, and have got a right smart deal to larn yet,
resumed Boone, afore you can be turned out rale ginuine woodsmen and
hunters. Now mark that thar small pebble stone, that lies by your feet on
the rock. Ef you look at it right close, you'll perceive that on one side
on't the dirt looks new and freshwhich proves it's jest been started from
its long quietude. Now cast your eyes a little higher up, agin yon dirt
ridge which partly kivers them thar larger stones, and you'll see an indent
that this here pebble stone just fits. Now something had to throw that
down, o' course; and ef you'll just look right sharp above it, you'll see a
smaller dent, that war made by the toe of some human foot, in getting up the
bank. Agin you'll obsarve that that thar dry twig, just above still, has been
lately broke, as ef by the person who war climbing up taking hold on't for
assistance; but that warn't the reason the climber broke itit war done
purposely; as you'll see by the top part being bent up the hill, as ef to
point us on. By the Power that made me! added Boone, gazing for a
moment
at the broken twig intently, ef I arn't wondrously mistaken, thar's a
leaf hanging to it in a way nater never fixed it.
Right, there is! cried Henry, who, looking up with the rest, chanced
to observe it at the same moment with Boone; and springing forward with
a light bound, he soon reached the spot, and returned with it in his hand.
It was a fall leaf, which had been fastened in a hasty manner to the twig in
question, by a pin through its center. On one side of it was scrawled, in
characters difficult to be deciphered:
Followfastfor God's sake!E
.
As Millbanks, after looking at it closely, read off these words, Boone
started, clutched his rifle with an iron grasp, and merely saying, in a quiet
manner, Onward, ladsI trust you 're now satisfied! he sprang up the
rocks with an agility that threatened to leave his young companions far in
the rear.
All now pressed forward with renewed energy; and having gained the
summit of the hill, which here rose to the height of eighty feet, they were
enabled, by the aid of Csar, to come quickly upon the trail of the Indians,
who, doubtless supposing themselves now safe from pursuit, had taken little
or no pains to conceal their course. Of this their pursuers now took
advantage
,
and hurried onward with long and rapid strides; now through thick
dark woods and gloomy hollows; now up steep hills and rocky barren cliffs;
now through tangles and over marshy groundsclearing all obstacles that
presented themselves with an ease which showed that notwithstanding some
of them might be inferior as woodsmen, none were, at all events, as
travellers
in the woods.
By noon the party had advanced some considerable distance, and were
probably not far in the rear of the pursuedat least such was the opinion
of Boonewhen they were again, to their great vexation, put at fault for
the trail, by the cunning of the renegade, who, to prevent all accidents, had
here once more broken it, by entering another small streamleta branch of
Eagle river;and although our friends set to with all energy and diligence
to find it, yet, from the nature of the ground round about, the darkness of
the wood through which the rivulet meandered, and several other causes,
they were unable to do so for three good hours.
This delay tended not a little to discourage the younger members of our
pursuing party, who, in consequence thereof, began to be low spirited, and
less eager than before to press forward when the trail was again found; but
a few words from Boone in a chiding manner, telling them that if they
faltered
at every little obstacle, they would be unfit representatives of border
life, served to stimulate them on to renewed exertions. To add to the
discomfiture
of allnot excepting Boone himselfthe sun, which had thus
far shone out warm and brilliant, began to grow more and more dim, as a
thick huze spread through the atmosphere overhead, foretokening an
approaching
storman event which might prove entirely disastrous to their
hopes, by obliterating all vestiges of the pursued. As the gallant old hunter
moved onward with rapid stridespreceded by the faithful brute, which,
on the regular trail, greatly facilitated their progress, by saving the
company
a close scrutiny of their coursehe from time to time cast his eyes
upward and noted the thickening atmosphere with an anxious and troubled
expression.
For some time the sun shone faintly; then his rays became entirely
obscured
,
and his position could only be discerned by a bright spot in the
heavens; this, ere he reached the horizon, became obscured also; when
the old hunter, who had watched every sign closely, looking anxiously
toward
the west, observed:
I don't like it, lads; thar's a storm a brewing for sartin, and we shall
drenched afore to-morrow morning. Howsomever, he continued, it arn't
the wetting as I cares any thing about,for I'm used to the elements in all
thar stages, and don't fear 'em no more'n a dandy does a feather bed,but
the trail will be lost in arnest this time; and then we'll have to give in, or
follow on by guess work. It's this as troubles me; for I'm fearful poor Ella
and Reynolds won't get succor in time. But keep stout hearts, lads, he
added, as he noticed gloomy expressions sweep over the faces of his
followers
;
keep stout heartsdon't get melancholy; for in this here world
we've got to take things as we find 'em; and no doubt this storm's all for
the best, ef we could only see ahead like into futurity.
With this consoling reflection the hunter again quickened his pace, and
pressed forward until the shadows of evening warned him to seek out an
encampment for the gathering night. Accordingly, sweeping the adjoining
country with an experienced eye, his glance soon rested on a rocky ridge,
some quarter of a mile to the right, at whose base he judged might be found
a comfortable shelter from the coming rain. Communicating his thoughts
to his companions, all immediately quitted the trail and advanced towards
it, where they arrived in a few minutes, and found, to their delight, that
the experienced woodsman had not been wrong in his conjectures. A cave
of no mean dimensions was fortunately discovered, after a short search
among the rocks, into which all now gathered; and striking a light, they
made a small fire close at the entrance, around which they assembled and
partook of the refreshments brought with themBoone declaring he had
not tasted a morsel of food since leaving Boonsborough early in the
morning
.
The meal over, the young men disposed themselves about the cave in
the best manner possible for their own comfort; and being greatly fatigued
by their journey, and the revels of the night previous, they very soon gave
evidence of being in a sleep too deep for dreams. Boone sat by the fire,
apparently in deep contemplation, until a few embers only remained; then
pointing Csar to his place near the entrance, he threw himself at length
upon the ground, and was soon imitating the example of his young comrades.
Early in the evening it came on to blow very hard from the cast, and
about midnight set in to rain, as Boone had predicted, which it continued to
do the rest of the night; nor were there any signs of its abatement, when
the party arose to resume their journey on the following morning.
What can't be cured must be endured, said Boone, quoting an old
proverb, as he gazed forth upon the storm. We must take sech as comes,
lads, without grumbling; though I don't know's thar's any sin in
wishing
it war a little more to our liking. Howsomever, he added, prehaps
it won't be so much agin us arter all; for the red varmints mayhap 'll
think as how all traces of 'em have been washed away, and feeling safe
from pursuit, be less cautious about their proceedings; and by keeping on
the same course, we may chance upon 'em unawares. So come, lads, let 's
eat and be off.
Accordingly making a hasty breakfast, and securing the remainder of
their provision as well as ammunition, in the bosoms of their hunting frocks
which were always made large for such and similar purposestightening
the belts about their bodies, and placing their rifle's, lock downwards, under
the ample skirts of their frocks, to shield them from the rainthe whole
party sallied forth upon their second days adventure. Regaining the spot
they had quitted the evening before, Boone took a long look in the direction
whence they first approached, and then shaping his course so as to bear as
near as possible on a direct line with it, set forward at a quick pace, going
a very little west of due north.
In this manner our pursuers continued their journey for some three or
four hours, scarcely exchanging a syllablethe storm beating fiercely against
their faces and drenching their bodieswhen an incident occurred of the
most alarming kind.
6
They had descended a hill, and were crossing an almost open plain of
some considerable extentwhich was bounded on the right by a wood, and
on the left by a cane-brakeand had nearly gained its center, when they
were startled by a deep rumbling sound, resembling the mighty rushing of
a thousand horse. Nearer and nearer came the rushing sound, while each
one paused, and many a pale face was turned with an anxious, inquiring
glance upon Boone, whose own, though a shade paler than usual, was
composed
in every feature, as he gazed, without speaking, in the direction whence
the noise proceeded.
My God! what is it? cried Henry, in alarm.
Behold! answered Boone, pointing calmly toward the cane-brake.
A cry of surprise, despair and horror, escaped every tongue but the old
hunter'sas, at that moment, a tremendous herd of buffaloe, numbering
thousands, was seen rushing from the brake, and bearing directly to the
spot where our party stood. Escape by flight was impossible; for the
animals
were scarcely four hundred yards distant and booming forward with
the speed of the frightened wild horse of the prairie. Nothing was
apparent
but speedy death, and in its most horrible form, that of dying unknown,
beneath the hoofs of the wild beasts of the wilderness. In this awful
moment of suspense, which seemingly but preceded the disuniting of soul
and body, each of the young men turned a breathless look of horror
upon the old hunter, such as landsmen in a terrible gale at sea would
turn upon the commander of the vessel; but, save an almost
impreceptible
quiver of the lips, not a muscle of the now stern countenance of
Boone changed.
God of Heaven!we are lost! cried Henry, wildly. Oh! such a
death!
Every man's got to die when his time comesbut none afore; and
yourn hasn't come yet, Master Harry, replied Boone, quietly; unless,
he added, a moment after, as he raised his rifle to his eye, Betsey here's
forgot her old tricks.
As he spoke, his gun flashed, a report followed, and one of the foremost
of the herd, an old bull, which had gained a point within two hundred
yards of the marksman, stumbled forward and rolled over on the earth, with
a loud bellow of pain. His companions, which were pressing close behind,
snorted with fear, as they successively came up, and turning aside, on either
hand, made a furrow in their ranks, that, gradually widening as they
advanced
,
finally cleared our friends by a space of twenty yards; and so passed
they on, making the very earth tremble under their mighty tread.
[7]
[7]
A similar occurrence to the above is recorded of Boone's first appearance in the
Western
Wilds.
See Boone's LifeBy Flint
.
It was a sublime sightto behold such a tremendous caravan of wild
beasts rushing pastand one that filled each of the spectators, even when
they knew all danger was over, with a sense of trembling awe; and they
stood and gazed in silence, until the last of the herd was lost to their
vision
;
then advancing to the noble hunter, Henry silently grasped his hard,
weather-beaten hand, and turned away with tearful eyesan example that
was followed by each of the others, and which was more heart-touchingly
expressive of their feelings, than would have been a vocabulary of
appropriate
words.
Our party next proceeded to examine the wounded bull, which was
still bellowing with rage and pain; and having carefully approached and
despatched him with their knives, they found that the ball of Boone had
penetrated his head. Taking from him a few slices of meat, to serve them
in case their provisions ran short, they once more resumed their journey
the wind still easterly and the storm raging.
About three hours past noon the storm began to show signs of abatement
the wind blew less hard, and had veered several points to the northan
event which the old hunter noted with great satisfaction. They had now
gained a point within ten miles of the beautiful Ohio, when the dogwhich,
since he had had no trail to guide him, ran where he chosecommenced
barking spiritedly, some fifty paces to the left of the party, who immediately
set off at a brisk gait to learn the cause.
I'll wager what you dare, lads, the pup's found the trail, said Boone.
The event proved him in the right; for on coming up, the footsteps of
both captors and captives, who had evidently passed there not over three
hours before, could be distinctly traced in the loomy earth. A shout,not
inferior in power and duration to that set up by crazy-headed politicians, on
the election of some favoritewas sent away to the hills, announcing the
joy of our party; which the hills, as if partakers also of the hilarious
feelings
,
in turn duly echoed.
This new, important and unexpected discovery, raised the spirits of all
our company to a high degree; and they again set forward at a faster gait
than ever, so as to overtake the pursued if possible before they crossed the
Ohio river. The trail was now broad and distinct, and the footprints of the
Indians, as also those of their captives, Algernon and Ella, could be clearly
defined wherever the ground chanced to be of a clayey nature. In
something
like two hours our pursuers succeeded in reaching the river; but
unfortunately
too late to intercept their enemies and rescue their friends, who
had already crossed sometime before. By trailing them to the water's edge,
they discovered the very spot where the canoes of the savages had been
secreted on the beach, behind some drift-logs, nearly opposite the mouth of
the Great Miami.
Ef we'd only been here a little sooner, observed Boone, musingly,
we'd ha' saved some o' the varmints the trouble of paddling over thar; or
ef we only had the means o' crossing now, we'd be upon 'em afore they
war aware on't. Howsomever, as it is, I suppose we'll have to make a raft to
cross on and so give the red heathen a little more time.
Is it not possible, colonel, answered Millbanks, in a suggestive way,
that the Indians, forming the two parties, may all be of the same tribe,
and have crossed here together, when they came over to make the attack?
and that the boats of the other division, unless they have recrossed, may
still be secreted not far hence?
By the Power that made me! exclaimed Boone, energetically, a good
thought, lada good thought, Master Harryand we'll act on't at once,
by sarching along the banks above here; for as the other varmints took off
to the east, it arn't improbable they've just steered a little round about, to
come down on 'em, while these went right straight ahead.
At once proceeding upon this suggestion, Boone and his companions
commenced
a close examination along the shore; which finally resulted in their
finding, as had been premised, not the canoes themselves, but traces of
where they had recently been, together with the trail of the other party,
who had also arrived at this point and crossed over. This caused no little
sensation among our pursuers, who, scaning the footprints eagerly, and
perceiving thereby that the prisoners were still along with their captors
scarcely knew whether most to rejoice or be sad. One thing at least was
cheering, they were still alive; and could their friends, the present party
succeed in crossing the river during the night, might be rescued. But where
was Isaac and his band, was the next important query. If, as they ardently
hoped, he and his comrades had not lost the trail, they might be expected to
join them soona reinforcement which would render them comparatively safe.
Meantime the storm had wholely subsidedthe wind blew strong and
cold from the northwesta few broken, dripping clouds sailed slowly
onward
while
the sun, a little above the horison, again shone out clear and
bright, and painted a beautiful bow on the cloudy ground of the eastern
heavens.
Well, lads, the storm's over, thank God! said Boone, glancing upward,
with an expression of satisfaction; and now, as day-light'll be scarce
presently
,
we'll improve what there is, in constructing a raft to cross over on;
and maybe Isaac and the rest on 'em will join us in time to get a ride.
As the old hunter concluded, he at once applied himself to laying out such
drift logs as were thought suitable for the purpose, in which he was assisted
by three of the others, the remaining two proceeding into the bushes to cut
withes for binding them together; and so energetic and dilligent was each in
his labors, that, ere twilight had deepened into night, the rude vessel was
made, launched, and ready to transport its builders over the waters. They
now resolved to take some refreshment, and wait until night had fully set
in, in the faint hope that Isaac might possibly make his appearance. With
this intent, our party retired up the bank, into the edge of the wood that
lined the shore, for the purpose of kindling a fire, that they might dry their
garments, and roast some portions of the slaughtered bull.
Scarcely had they succeeded, after several attempts, in effecting a bright
ruddy blazewhich threw from their forms, dark, fantastic shadows, against
the earth, trees and neighboring busheswhen Ceasar uttered a low, deep
growl, and Boone, grasping his rifle tightly, motioned his companions to follow
him in silence into an adjoining thicket. Here, after cautioning them to remain
perfectly quiet, unless they heard some alarm, he carefully parted the
bushes, and glided noislessly away, saying, in a low tone, as he departed:
I rather 'spect it's Isaac; but I'd like to be sartin on't, afore I commit
myself.
For some five or ten minutes after the old hunter disappeared, all was
silent, save the crackling of the fire, the rustling of the leaves, the sighing
of the wind among the trees, and the rippling of the now swollen and muddy
waters of the Ohio. At length the sound of a voice was heard some fifty
paces distant, followed immediately by another in a louder tone, and then
by a shout which made the old forest ring again.
On hearing this, our friends in the thicket gave a shout in return, and then
rushing forward, were soon engaged in shaking the hands of Isaac and his
comrades, with a heartiness on both sides that showed the pleasure of
meeting
was earnest and unalloyed.
As more important matters are now pressing hard upon us, and as our space
is limited, we shall omit the detail of Isaac's adventures, as also the further
proceedings of both parties for the present, and substitute a brief summary.
The trail whereon Isaac and his party started the day before, being broad
and open, they had experienced but little difficulty in following it, until
about noon, when they reached a stream where it was broken, which caused
them some two hours delay. This, doubtless, prevented them from
over-taking
the enemy that day; and the night succeeding, not having found
quarters as comfortable as Boone's, they had been thoroughly soaked with
rain. The trail in the morning was entirely obliterated; but pursuing their
course in a manner similar to that adopted by Boone, the result had happily
been the same, and the meeting of the two parties the consequence, at a
moment
most fortunate to both.
All now gathered around the fire, to dry their garments, refresh
themselves
with food, tell over to each other their adventures, and consult as to
their future course. It was finally agreed to cross the stream that night, in
the hope, by following up the Miami, to stumble upon the encampment of
their adversaries; who were, doubtless, at no great distance; and who, as
they judged, feeling themselves secure, might easily be surprised to
advantage
.
How they succeeded in their perilous undertaking, coming events
must show.
CHAPTER X.
THE RENEGADE AND HIS PRISONERSTHE PERIL OF REYNOLDSTHE RENDEZVOUS
THE MEETINGTHE ENTREATYTHE CONSULTATIONTHE SEPARATIONTHE
ENCAMPMENT.
The feelings in the breasts of Algernon and Ella, as they reluctantly
moved onward, captives to a savage, blood-thirsty foe, are impossible to be
described. To what awful end had fate destined them? and in what place
were they to drain the last bitter dregs of wo? How much anguish of
heart, how much racking of soul and how much bodily suffering was to be
their portion, ere death, almost their only hope, would set them free? True,
they might be rescued by friendssuch things had been donebut the
probability
thereof was as ten to one against them; and when they perceived
the care with which the renegade sought to destroy all vestiges of their
course, their last gleam of hope became nearly extinguished.
We have previously stated that Ella was left unbound; but wherefore,
would perhaps be hard to conjecture; unless we suppose that the renegade
feeling for her that selfish affection which pervades the breasts of all beings,
however base or criminal, to a greater or less degreefancied it would be
adding unnecessary cruelty to bind her delicate hands. Whatever the
cause, matters but little; but the fact itself was of considerable importance to
Ella, who took advantage of her freedom, in passing the bushes before
noticed
,
to snatch a leaf unperceived, whereon, by great adroitness, she
managed
to trace with a pin a few almost illegible characters; and also, in
ascending
the bank, which she was allowed to do in her own way, to throw down
with her foot the stone, break the twig at the same instant, and pin the leaf
to it, in the faint hope that an old hunter might follow on the trail, who, if
he came to the spot, would hardly fail to notice it.
The freedom thus given to Ella, and the deference shown her by the
renegade
and his allieswho appeared to treat her with the same respect they
would have done the wife of their chiefwere in striking contrast with their
manners toward Algernon, on whom they seemed disposed to vent their scorn
by petty insults. Believing that his doom was sealed, he became
apparently
resigned to his fate, nor seemed to notice, save with stoical indifference,
any thing that took place around him. This quiet, inoffensive manner, was
far from pleasing to Girty, who would much rather have seen him chafing
under his bondage, and manifesting a desire to escape its toil. But if this
was the outward appearance, not so was the inward feelings of our hero.
He knew his fateunless he could effect an escape, of which he had little
hopeand he nerved himself to meet and seem to his captors careless of it;
but his soul was already on the rack of torture. This was not for himself
alone; for Algernon was a brave man, and in reality feared not death;
though, like many another brave man, had no desire to die at his time of life,
especially with all the tortures of the stake, which he knew, from Girty's
remark, would be his assignment;but his soul was harrowed at the thought
of Ellaher awful doomand what she might be called upon to undergo:
perhaps a punishment a thousand times worse than deaththat of being the
pretended wife, but in reality the mistress, of the loathsome renegade. This
thought to him was torturealmost madnessand it was only by the most
powerful struggle with himself, that he could avoid exposing his feelings.
For a time, after ascending the rocky bank of the stream and gaining the
hill, the renegade and his Indian allies, with their captives, moved silently
onward at a fast pace; but at length, slackening his speed somewhat, Girty
approached the side of Algernon, who was bound in a manner similar to
Younker, with his wrists corded to a cross bar behind his back, and
apparently
examining them a moment or two, in a sneering tone, said:
How comes it that the bully fighter of the British, under the cowardly
General Gates, should be so tightly bound, away out in this Indian country,
and a captive to a
renegade
agent?ha, ha, ha!
The pale features of Algernon, as he heard this taunt, grew suddenly
crimson, and then more deadly white than everhis fingers fairly worked in
their cords, and his respiration seemed almost to stifle himso powerfully were
his passions wrought upon by the cowardly insults of his adversary; but at
last all became calm and stoical again, when turning to Girty, he coolly
examined
him from head to heel, from heel to head and then moving away his
eyes, as if the sight were offensive to him, quietly said:
An honest man would be degraded by condescending to hold discourse
with so mean a
thing
as Simon Girty, the renegade.
At these words Girty started, as if bit by a serpentthe aspect of his dark
sinister features changed to one concentrated expression of hellish ragehis
eyes seemed to turn redhis lips quiveredthe nostrils of his flat ugly nose
distendedfroth issued from his mouthwhile his fingers worked
convulsively
at the handle of his tomahawk, and his whole frame trembled like a
tree shaken by a whirlwind. For some time he essayed to speak, in vain;
but at last he hissed forth, as he whirled the tomahawk aloft:
Die!dog!die!
Ella uttered a piercing shriek of fear, and sprung forward to arrest the
blow; but ere she could have reached the renegade, the axe would have
been buried to the helve in the brain of Algernon, had not a tall powerful
Indian suddenly interposed his rifle between it and the victim.
Is the great chief a child, or in his dotage, he said to Girty, in the
Shawanoe dialect, that he lets passion run away with his reason? Is not
the Big Knife already doomed to the tortures? And would the white chief
give him the death of a warrior?
No, by ! cried Girty, with an oath. He shall have a dog's death!
Right! Mugwaharight! I thank you for your interferenceI was beside
myself. The stakethe torturethe stakeha, ha, ha! added he in
English
,
with a hoarse laugh, which his recent passion made sound fiend-like
and unearthly; and as he concluded, he smote Algernon on the cheek with
the palm of his hand. The latter winced somewhat, but mastered his
feelings
and made no reply; and the renegade resuming his former pace, the
party again proceeded in silence.
Towards night, Ella became so fatigued and exhausted by the long day's
march, that it was with the greatest difficulty she could move forward at all;
and Girty, taking some compassion on her, ordered the party to halt, until
a rough kind of litter could be prepared, on which being seated, she was
borne forward by four of the Indians. At dark they halted at the base of a
hill, where they encamped and found a partial shelter from the wind and
rain. At daylight they again resumed their journey, and by four o'clock in
the afternoon arrived at the river, which they immediately crossed in their
canoes, and, as the water was found in a good stage, did not land until they
reached the first bend of the Miami, the place agreed on for the meeting
between
Girty and Wild-cat.
As the latter chief and his party had not yet made their appearance,
Girty
and his band went ashore with their prisoners, and took shelter under
one of the largest trees in the vicinity, to await their coming. Of this
expected
meeting, the captives as yet knew nothing; and it was of course
not without considerable surprise, mingled with a saddened joy, that they
observed the approach, some half an hour later, of their friends and
enemies
.
Ella, on first perceiving their canoes silently advancing up the stream,
and who were their occupants, started up with a cry of joy, which was the
next moment saddened, by the thought that she was only welcoming her
relatives
to a miserable doom. Still it was a joy to know they were yet alive;
and as the sinking heart is ever buoyed up with hope, until completely
engulfed
in the dark billows of despairso she could not, or would not,
altogether
banish the animating feeling, that something might yet interfere to
save them all from destruction. As the canoes touched the shore, Ella
sprang forward to greet her adopted mother and father; but her course was
suddenly checked, by one of the Indian warriors, who, grasping her
somewhat
roughly by the arm, with a gutteral grunt and fierce gesture of
displeasure
,
pointed her back to her former place. Ella, downcast and
frightened
,
tremblingly retraced her steps, and could only observe the pale faces
and fatigued looks of her relatives and the little girl at a distance; but she
saw enough to send a thrill of anguish to her heart; and Girty, who
perceived
the expressions of agony her sweet features now displayed, at once
advanced to her, and, modulating his voice somewhat from its usual tones,
said:
Grieve not, Ella. I will endeavor to procure you an interview with
your friends.
The kindness manifested in the tones of the speaker, caused Ella to look
up with a start of surprise and hope; and thinking he might perhaps be
moved to mercy, by a direct appeal to his better feelings, she replied,
energetically
,
with a flush on her now animated countenance:
O, sir! I perceive you are not lost to all feelings of humanity. Here
the compression of Girty's lips, and a knitting together of his shaggy brows,
warned Ella she was treading on dangerous ground, and she quickly added:
All of us are liable to err; and there may be circumstances, unknown to
others, that force us to be, or seem to be, that which in our hearts we are
not; and to do acts which our calm moments of reason tell us are wrong,
and which we afterwards sincerely regret.
I know not that I understand you, said the renegade, evasively.
To be more explicit, then, rejoined Ella, I trust that you, Simon
Girty, whose acts hitherto have been such as to draw down reproaches and
even curses upon your head, from many of your own race, may now be
induced, by the prayer of her before you, to do an act of justice and
generosity
.
Speak out your desire! returned Girty, as Ella, evidently fearful of
broaching the subject too suddenly, paused, in order to observe the effect
of what had already been said. Speak out briefly, girl; for yonder stands
Wild-cat awaiting me.
O, then let me implore you to listen, and God grant your heart may be
touched by my words! rejoined Ella, passionately, as she fancied she saw
something of relentment in his stern features. Look yonder! Behold
that poor old man!whose head is already sprinkled with the silvery
threads of over fifty wintersbeside whom stands the companion of his
sorrowsboth of whose lives have been spent in quiet, honest pursuits
whose doors have ever stood openwhose board has ever been free to the
needy wayfarer. You yourself have been a partaker of their hospitality,
in their own homewhich, alas! I have since learned is in ashesand can
testify to their liberality and kindness. Is this a proper return therefor,
think you?
But did not he, yon gray-headed man, then and there curse me to my
face? returned the renegade, fiercely, in whose eye could be seen the cold
sullen gleam of deadly hate; and shall I, the outcast of my raceI, whose
deeds have made the boldest trembleI, whose name is a by-word for
cursesnow spare him, that has defied and called down God's maledictions
on me?
O, yes! yes! cried Ella, energetically. Convince him, by your acts
of generosity, that you are not deserving of his censure, and he, I assure
you, will be eager to do you justice. O, return good for evil, where evil
has been done you, and God's blessing, instead of His curse will be yours!
It may be the
Christian's
creed to return good for evil, answered Girty,
with a strong emphasis on the word Christian, accompanied by a sneer;
but by ! such belongs not to me, nor to those I mate with! Hark you,
Ella Barnwell! I could be induced to do much for youfor I possess for
you a passion stronger than I have ever before felt for any human
being
but
were I ever so much disposed to grant your request, it is now
beyond
my power.
As how? asked Ella, quickly.
Listen! I will tell you briefly. When first I saw, I felt I loved you,
and from that moment resolved you should be mine. Nay, do not
shudder
so, and turn away, and look so palea worse fate than being the wife of
a British agent might have been apportioned you. To win you by fair
words, I knew at once was out of the questionfor one glance showed me
my rival. Besides, I was not handsome, I knewhad not an oily tongue,
and did not like the plan of venturing too much among those who have good
reasons for fearing and hating me,therefore I resolved on your capture.
I had already meditated an attack on some of the settlers in the vicinity,
and I resolved that both should be accomplished at one time. The result
you know. Younker and his wife became my prisoners. This was done
for two purposes. First, to revenge me for the insult heaped upon Simon
Girty. Secondly, to spare their lives; for had it not been for my positive
injunctions, they would have shared the fate of their neighbors. My
design
,
I say, was to spare their lives and send them back, whenever it could
be done with safety, provided they showed any signs of contrition. Did
they? No, by heavens! they again upbraided me to my face. I was again
cursed. My blood is hotmy nature revengeful. That moment sealed their
doom, I gave them up to Peshewa. They are no longer my prisoners.
For their lives you must plead with him. I can do nothing. Have you
more to ask?
Girty, toward the last, spoke rapidly, in short sentences, as one to whom
the conversation was disagreeable; and Ella listened breathlessly, with a
pale cheek and trembling form; for she saw, alas! there was nothing
favorable
to be gained. As he concluded, she suddenly started, clasped her hands
together, and looked up into his stern countenance, with a wild, thrilling
expression
,
saying, in a trembling voice:
You have said you love me!
I repeat it.
Then, for God's sake, as you are a human being, and hope for peace in
this world and salvation in the nextrestore merestore us all to our
homes!and to my dying day will I bless and pray for you.
Umph! returned the renegade, dryly; I had much rather
hear
your
sweet voice, though in anger, than to merely
think
you may be praying for
me at a distance. But I see Wild-cat is getting impatient; and as he
concluded
,
he turned abrutly on his heel, and advanced to Peshewawho was
now standing with his warriors and prisoners on the bank of the stream,
some fifty paces distant, awaiting a consultation with himwhile Ella hid her
face in her hands and wept convulsively.
Welcome, Peshewa! said Girty, as he approached the chief. You and
your band are here safe, I perceive; and by ! you have timed it well,
too, for we have only headed you by half an hour.
Ugh! grunted Wild-cat, with that look and gutteral sound peculiar to
the Indian. Kitchokema has learned Peshewa is here!
Come, come, answered the renegade, in a somewhat nettled manner,
no insinuations! I saw Peshewa when he arrived.
But could not leave the Big Knife squaw to greet him, added the Indian.
Why, I am not particularly fond of being hurried in my affairs, you
know.
But there may be that which will not leave Kitchokema slow to act, in
safety, rejoined Wild-cat, significantly.
How, chief! what mean you? asked Girty, quickly.
The Shemanoes
[8]
[8]
Americans, or Big Knives. We would remark here, that we have made use altogether
of the Shawanoe dialect; that being most common among all the Ohio tribes, save the
Wyandots
or Hurons, who spoke an entirely different language.
Well? said Girty.
Are on the trail, concluded Wild-cat, briefly.
Ha! exclaimed the renegade, with a start, involuntarily placing his
hand upon the breach of a pistol in his girdle. But are you sure,
Peshewa
?
Peshewa speaks only what he knows, returned the chief, quietly.
Speak out, then
how
do you know? rejoined Girty, in an excited tone.
Peshewa a chief, answered the Indian, in that somewhat obscure and
metaphorical manner peculiar to his race. He sleeps not soundly on the
war-path. He shuts not his eyes when he enters the den of the wolf. He
saw
the camp-fires of the pale-face.
Such had been the fact. Knowing that his trail was left broad and open,
and that in all probability it would soon be followed, Wild-cat had been
diligently
on the watch; and as his course had been shaped in a roundabout,
rather than opposite direction (as the reader might at first glance have
supposed
)
from that taken by Boone, he and his band, by reason of this, had
encamped, on the night in question, not half a mile distant from our old
hunter, but on the other side of the ridge. Ascending this himself, to note
if any signs of an enemy were visible, Peshewa had discovered the light of
Boone's fire, and traced it to its source. Without venturing near enough to
expose himself, the wily savage had, nevertheless, gone sufficiently close to
ascertain they were the foes of his race. His first idea had been to return,
collect a part of his warriors, and attack them; but prudence had soon got
the better of his valor; from the fact, as he reasoned, that his band were
now in the enemy's country, where their late depredations had already
aroused the inhabitants to vengeance; and he neither knew the force of
Boone's partyfor the reader will remember they were concealed in a
cavenor what other of his foes might be in the vicinity;besides which,
his purpose had been accomplished, and he was now on the return with his
prisoners;the whole of which considerations, had decided him to leave them
unmolested, and ere daylight resume his journey; so that, even should they
accidently come upon his trail, he would be far enough in advance to reach
and cross the river before them. Such was the substance of what
Wild-cat
,
in his own peculiar way, now made known to Girty; and having
inquired
out the location distinctly, the latter exclaimed:
By heavens! I remember leaving that ridge away to the right, which
proves that the white dogs must have been on my trail. I took pains enough
to conceal it before that night; but if they got the better of me, I don't
think they did of the rain that fell afterwards,so that they have doubtless
found themselves on a fool's errand, long ere this, and given up the search.
Besides, should they reach the river's bank, they have no means of
crossing
,
and therefore we are safe.
Wild-cat seemed to muse on the remarks of Girty, for a moment or two,
and then said:
Why did Mishemenetoc
[9]
[9]
Great Spirit.
give the chief cunning, but that he might use
it against his foes?why caution, but that he might avoid danger?
Why that, of course, is all well enough at times, answered Girty;
but I don't think either particular cunning or caution need be exercised
nowfrom the fact that I don't believe there is any danger. Even should the
enemies you saw be fool-hardy enough to follow us, they are not many in
number probably, and will only serve to add a few more scalps to our
girdles
.
However, we are safe for to-night, at all events; for if they reach
the river, as I said before, they won't be able to cross, unless they make a
raft or swim it; and you may rest assured, Peshewa, they will sleep on the
other side, if for nothing else than their own safety.
What, therefore, does my brother propose? asked Wild-cat.
Why, I am for encamping, as soon as we can find a suitable spotsay
within a mile of herefor by ! I am not only hungry but cold, and my
very bones ache, from travelling in this untimely storm, which I perceive
is on the point of clearing up.
Peshewa likes not sleeping with danger so near, replied the savage.
Well, I'm not
afraid
, rejoined Girty, laying particular stress on the
latter word; and so suppose you take the prisoners, with a part of the band,
and go forward, while myself and the balance remain behind to reconnoitre
in the morning; for by ! that will be time enough to look for the lazy
white dogs. Yet stay! he added, a moment after, as if struck by a new
thought. Suppose you take the two Big Knives, and leave the squaws
with mefor being very tired, they will only be a drag upon your party
and then you can have the stakes ready for the others, if you get in first,
so that we can have the music of their groans to make us merry on our
second meeting.
To this latter proposition, the chief gave a grunt of assent, and the whole
matter being speedily arranged, the council ended.
The conversation between these two worthies having been carried on in
the Indian dialect, was of course wholly unintelligible to Mrs. Younker and
her husband, who were standing near; and trying in vain, for some time, to
gain a clue to the discussion, the good lady at last gave evidence, that if her
body and limbs were weary, her tongue was not; and that with all the
warnings she had received, her old habits of volubility had not as yet been
entirely superceded by thoughtful silence.
I do wonder what on yarth, she said, that thar red-headed Simon Girty,
and that thar ripscallious old varmint, as calls himself a chief, be coniving
at?and why the pesky Injens don't let me and Ella and the rest on'em come
together agin, as we did afore? Thar she standsthe darlingas pale
nor a lily, and crying like all nater, jest as if her little heart war a going
to break and done with it. I 'spect the varmints is hatching some orful
plans to put us out o' the wayprehaps to hitch us to the stake and burn us
all to cinder, like they did our housen, and them things. Well, Heaven's
will be done!as Preacher Allprayer said, when they turned him out o'
meeting for gitting drunk and swearingthe dear good man!but I do wish,
for gracious sake, I could only jest change places with 'emef jest for five
minutesand I reckon as how they'd be glad to quit their gibberish, and
talk like Christian folks, once in thar sneaking lives! Thar, they're done
now, I do hope to all marcy's sake! and I reckons as how we'll soon have
the gist on't.
The foregoing remarks of Mrs. Younker, were made in a low tone, and
evidently not intended, like Dickens' Notes, for general circulationthe
nearly fatal termination of a former speech of hers, having taught her to be
a little cautious in the camp of the enemy. The conclusion was succeeded
by a stare of surprise, on being civilly informed by Girty, that she was
now at liberty to join Ella as soon as she pleased.
Well now that's something like, returned the dame, with a smile that
was intended to be a complimentary one; and shows, jest as clear as any
thing, that thar is a few streaks o' human nater in you arter all. Then,
as if fearful the permission would be countermanded, the good lady at once
set off in haste to join her adopted daughter.
Subsequent events, however, soon changed the favorable opinion Mrs.
Younker had began to entertain of Girtyparticularly when she discovered,
as she imagined, that the liberty allowed her, had only been as a ruse to
withdraw her from her husbandwho, as she departed, had been immediately
hurried away, without so much as a parting farewell.
Orders now being rapidly given by Girty and Wild-cat, were quickly and
silently executed by their swarthy subordinates; and in a few minutes, the
latter chief was on his way, with four warriors, the two male prisoners and
the little girlOshasqua, to whom the latter had been consigned by Girty,
as the reader will remember, and who still continued to accompany Wild-cat,
refusing to leave her behind.
When informed by Girty, in an authoritive tone, that he must join the
detachment of Wild-cat, Algernon turned toward Ella, and in a trembling
voice said: Farewell, dear Ella! If God wills that we never meet again
on earth, let us hope we may in the Land of Spirits; and ere she,
overcome
by her emotion, had power to reply, he had passed on beyond the reach
of her silvery voice.
Immediately on the departure of Peshewa, Girty ordered the canoes to be
drawn ashore and concealed in a thicket near by, where they would be
ready in case they should be wanted for another expedition; and then
leading
the way himself, the party proceeded slowly up the Miami, for about a
mile, and encamped for the night, within a hundred yards of the river.
CHAPTER XI.
THE ENCAMPMENT OF THE RENEGADETHE CAPTOR AND HIS FAIR CAPTIVE
THE IMMINENT PERIL OF ELLATHE DEADLY SURPRISETHE FLIGHTTHE
PURSUITTHE RESCUETHE DEADTHE BURIAL.
It was about ten o'clock on the evening in question, and Simon Girty was
seated by a fire, around which lay stretched at full length some six or eight
dark Indian forms, and near him, on the right, two of another sex and race.
He was evidently in some deep contemplation; for his hat and rifle were
lying by his side, his hands were locked just below his kneesas if for the
purpose of balancing his body in an easy positionand his eyes fixed
intently
on the flame that, waving to and fro in the wind, threw over his ugly
features a ruddy, flickering light, and extended his shadow to the size and
shape of some frightful monster. The clouds of the late storm had entirely
passed away, and through the checkered openings in the trees overhead,
could be discerned a few bright stars, which seemed to sparkle with
uncommon
brilliancy, owing to the clearness of the atmosphere. All beyond the
immediate circle lighted by the fire, appeared dark and silent, save the
solemn
,
almost mournful, sighing of the wind, as it swept among the tree-tops
and through the branches of the surrounding mighty forest.
What the meditations of the renegade were, we shall not essay to tell;
but doubtless they were of a gloomy nature; for after sitting in the position
we have described, some moments, without moving, he suddenly started,
unclasped his hands, and looked hurriedly around him on every side, as if
half expecting, yet fearful of beholding, some frightful phantom; but he
apparently saw nothing to confirm his fears; and with a heavy sigh, he
resumed
his former position.
What were the thoughts of that dark man, as he sat there?he whose
soul had been steeped in crime!he whose hands had long been made red
with the blood of numberless innocent victims! Who shall say what guilty
deeds of the past might have been harrowing his soul to fear and even
remorse? Who shall say he was not then and there meditating upon death,
and the dread eternity and judgement that must quickly follow dissolution?
Who shall say he was not secretly repenting of that life of crime, which
had already drawn down the curses of thousands upon his head?
Something
of the kind, or something equally powerful, must have been at work
within him; for his features ever and anon, by their mournful contortions
if we may be allowed the phrasegave visible tokens of one in deep agony
of mind. It would be no pleasant task to analyze and lay bare the secret
workings of so dark a spirit, even had we power to do it; and so we will
leave his thoughts, whether good or evil, to himself and his God.
By his side, and within two feet of the renegade, lay extended the
beautiful
form of Ella Barnwellwith nothing but a blanket and her own
garments
between her and the earthwith none but a similar covering over
herwith her head resting upon a stone, and apparently asleep. We say
apparently asleep; but the drowsy son of Erebus and Nox had not yet
closed her eyelids in slumber; for there were thoughts in her breast more
potent than all his persuasive arts of forgetfulness, or those of his prime
minister, Morpheus. Was she thinking of her own hard fateaway there in
that lonely forestwith not a friend nigh that could render her assistance
with now no hope of escape from the awful doom to which she was hastening?
Or was she thinking of him, for whom her heart yearned with all the
thousand
,
undefined, indescribable sympathies of affection?he who so lately had
been her companion?for the heart of love measures duration, not by the
cold mathematical calculation of minutes and hours, and days and weeks,
and months and years, but by events and feelings; and the acquaintance of
weeks may seem the friend of years, and the acquaintance of years be
almost
forgotton in weeks;was she thinking of him, we sayof Algernon?
who, even in misery, had been torn from her side, had said perchance his
last trembling farewell and gone so suffer a death at which humanity
must shudder! Ay, all these thoughts, and a thousand others, were rushing
wildly through her feverish brain. She thought of her own fateof his
of her relationspictured out in her imagination the terrible doom of each
and her tender heart became wrung to the most excruciating point of agony.
By the side of Ella, was her adopted motherburied in that troubled sleep,
which great fatigue sends to the body, even when the mind is ill at ease,
filling
it with startling visionsand around the fire, as we said before, lay the
dusky forms of the savages, lost to all consciousness of the outer world. The
position of Ella was such, that, by slightly turning her head, she could
command a view of the features of the renegade, whose strange workings,
as before noted, served to fix her attention and divide her thoughts, between
him, as the cause of her present unhappiness, and that unhappiness itself
and she gazed on his loathsome, contorted countenance, with much the same
feeling as one might be supposed to gaze upon a serpent, coiling itself around
his body, whose deadly fangs, either sooner or later, would assuredly give
the fatal stroke of death. She noted the sudden start of Girty, and the
wildness with which he peered around him, with feelings of hope and fear
hope, that rescue might be at handfear, lest something more dreadful was
about to happen. At length Girty started again, and turned his head toward
Ella so suddenly, that she had not time to withdraw her eyes, ere his were
fixed searchingly upon them.
And are you too awake? he said, with something resembling a sigh.
I thought the innocent could ever sleep!
Not when the guilty are abroad, with deeds of death, and friends
exposed
,
returned Ella, bitterly.
Ah! truetrue! rejoined Girty, again looking toward the fire, in a
musing mood.
Well may you muse and writhe under the tortures of your guilty acts,
continued Ella, in the same bitter tone; for you have much to answer for,
Simon Girty.
And who told you the past tortured me? cried Girty, quickly, turning
on her a fierce expression.
Your changing features and guilty starts, answered Ella.
Ha! then you have been a spy upon me, have you? said Girty,
pressing
the words slowly through his clenched teeth, knitting his shaggy brows,
and fixing his eye with intensity upon hers, until she quailed and trembled
beneath its seeming fiery glance, which the light, whereby it was seen,
rendered
more demon-like than usual, while it made shadow chase shadow, like
waves of the sea, across his face: You have been a spy upon my actions,
eh? Beware! Ella Barnwellbeware! Do not put your head in the lion's
mouth too often, or he may think the bait troublesome; and by ! had
other than you told me what I just now heard, he or she had not lived to
repeat it.
Far better an early death and innocence, than a long life of guilt and
misery, returned Ella, at once regaining her former boldness of speech:
Far better the fate you speak of, than mine.
And would you prefer being wedded to death, rather than me? asked
Girty, quickly, in surprise.
Ay, a thousand times! replied Ella, energetically, rising as she spoke,
into a sitting posture, and looking fearlessly upon the renegade, her
previously
pale features now flushed with excitement. I fear not death, Simon
Girty; I have done no act that should make me fear the change that all
must sooner or later undergo; but I could not join my hand to that of a
man of blood, without loathing and horror, and feeling criminal in the sight
of God and man; and least of all, to you, Simon Girty, whose name has
become a word of terror to the weak and innocent of my race, and whose
deeds of late, have been such as to make me join my voice in the general
maledictions called down upon you.
During this speech of Ella, Girty sat and gazed upon her with the look
of a baffled demon; and, as she concluded, fairly hissed through his teeth:
And so you would prefer death to me, eh? By ! you shall have
your choice!
As he spoke, he grasped Ella by the wrist with one hand, seized his
tomahawk with the other, and sprang upon his feet. His rapid movement
and wild manner now really frightened her; and uttering a faint cry of
horror
,
she endeavored to release his hold; while the warriors, aroused by the
noise, bounded up from the earth, weapon in hand, with looks of alarm.
Turning to them, Girty now spoke a few words in the Indian tongue, and
with significant glances at Ella, they were just in the act of again encamping,
when crack went some five or six rifles, followed by yells little less savage
than their own, and four of them rolled upon the earth, groaning with pain,
while the others, surprised and bewildered, grasped their weapons and shouted:
The Shemanoes! The Long Knives! not knowing whether to
stand or fly.
Girty, meantime, had been left unharmed; although the shivering of the
helve of the tomahawk in his hand, in front of his breast, showed him he
had been a target for no mean marksman, and that his life had been
preserved
almost by a miracle. For a moment he stood irresolutehis nostrils
fairly dilated with fear and rage, still holding Ella by the wrist, who was too
paralyzed with what she had seen to speak or movestraining his eyes in
every direction to note, if possible, the number of his foes and whence their
approach. The whole glance was momentary; but he saw himself nearly
surrounded by his enemies, who were fast closing in toward the center with
fierce yells; and pausing no longer in indecision, he encircled Ella's waist
with his left arm, raised her from the ground, and keeping her as much as
possible between himself and his enemies, to deter them from firing, darted
away toward a thicket, some fifty yards distant, pursued by two of the
attacking
party.
Just as Girty gained the thicket, one of his pursuers made a sudden
bound forward and grasped him by the arm; but his hold was the next
moment
shaken off by the renegade, who, being now rendered desperate, drew
a pistol from his belt, with the rapidity of lightning, and laid the bold
adventurer
dead at his feet. Almost at the same moment, Girty received a blow
on the back of his head, from the breech of the rifle of his other antagonist,
that staggered him forward, when releasing his hold of Ella, he turned and
darted off in another direction, firing a pistol as he went, the ball of which
whizzed close to the head of him for whom it was designed, and in a moment
more he was lost in the mazes of the forest.
Meantime the bloody work was going forward in the center; for at the
moment when Girty darted away, the report of some three or four rifles
again echoed through the wood, two more of the red warriors bit the
dust, while the other two fled in opposite directions, leaving Boone and his
party sole masters of the field.
Eager, excited, reckless and wild, several of the young men now rushed
forward, with yells of triumph, to the wounded Indians, whom they
immediately
tomahawked without mercy, and began to scalp, when the voice of
Boone, who had been more cautious, reached them from a distance: Beware
o' the fire-light, lads! or the red varmints will draw a bead
[10]
[10]
A hunter's phrase for taking sight.
on some of ye.
Scarcely were the words uttered, ere his warning was sadly fulfilled; for
the two savages finding they were not pursued, and thirsting for revenge, turned
and fired almost simultaneously, with aims so deadly, that one of the young
men, by the name of Beecher, fell mortally wounded and expired a moment
after; and another, by the name of Morris, had his wrist shattered by a ball.
This fatal event produced a panic in the others, who at once fled
precipitately
into the darkness, leaving Mrs. Younker, who had by this time gained
her feet, standing alone by the fire, a bewildered spectator of the
terrible
tragedies that had so lately been enacted by her side. To her Boone
now immediately advanced, notwithstanding the caution he had given the
others, and turning to him as he came up, the good lady exclaimed, in a tone
of astonishment:
Why, Colonel Boone, be this here you? Why when did you come
and how on yarth did ye git hereand what in the name o' all creation has
been happening? For ye see I war jest dosing away thar by the fire, and
dreaming all sorts of things, like all nater, when somehow I kind o' thought
I'd all at once turned into a man and gone to war a rale soldier, and the
battle
had opened, and the big guns war blazing away, and the little guns war
popping off, and the soldiers war shrieking and groaning and falling around
me, like all possessed; and men a trampling, and horses a running like skeered
deer; and then I sort o' woke up, and jumped up, and seed all them dead
Injen wretches; and then I jest began to think as how it warn't no dream at
all, but a living truth, all 'cept my being a man and a soldier, as you com'd
up. Well, ef this arn't a queer world, resumed the good dame, catching
breath meanwhile, as Preacher Allprayer used to say, then maybe as how
I don't know nothing at all about it.
Your dream war a very nateral one, Mrs. Younker, returned Boone,
who, during the speech of the other, had been actively employed in
scattering
the burning brands, to prevent the recurrence of another sad catastrophe;
and I'm rejoiced to see that you've escaped unharmed, amid this bloody work.
Allow me to set you free; and as he spoke, he drew his scalping knife, and
severed
the thongs that bound her wrists.
Gracious on me! cried the dame, chafing the parts which had been
swollen by the tightness of the cords, how clever 'tis to get free agin, and
have the use o' one's hands and tongue, to do and say jest what a body
pleases; for d'ye know, Colonel Boone, them thar imps of Satan war awfully
afeared o' my talking to 'em, to convince 'em they war the meanest varmints
in the whole univarsal yarth o' creation, and actually put a peremshus stop
to my saying what I thought on 'em, although I told 'em as how it war a
liberty
as these blessed colonies war this moment fighting for with the hateful
red-coated Britishers. But, Lord presarve us! gracious on us! where in
marcy's sake is my dear, darling Ella! concluded Mrs. Younker, with
vehemence
and alarm, as she now missed her adopted daughter for the first
time.
She's here, mother, answered a voice close behind her; and turning
round, the dame uttered a cry of joy, sprang into the arms of her son Isaac, and
wept upon his neckoccasionally articulating, in a choked voice:
God bless you, Isaac! God bless you, son!you're a good boythe
Lord's presarved you through the whole on'tthe Lord be praised!but
your father, poor ladyour father! and with a strong burst of emotion,
she buried her face upon his breast and wept aloud.
I know it, sobbed forth Isaac, his whole frame shaken with the force of
his feelings: II know the whole on't motherElla's told me. I'd rather
he'd bin killed a thousand times; but thar's no help for it now!
No help for it! cried Ella in alarm, who, having greeted the old hunter,
with tearful eyes, now stood weeping by his side. No help for it! God of
mercy!say not so! They mustthey must be rescued! Then turning
wildly to Boone, she grasped his hand in both of hers, and exclaimed: Oh!
sir, speak! tell me they can be savedand on my knees will I bless you!
A few words now rapidly uttered by Isaac, put the old hunter in possession
of the facts, concerning the forced march of Younker and Reynolds, of
which he had previously heard nothing; and musing on the information a
few moments, he shook his head sadly, and said, with a sigh:
I'm sorry for you, EllaI'm sorry for all o' yeI'm sorry on my own
account,but I'm o' the opinion o' Isaac, that thar's no help for it now.
They're too far beyond uswe're in the Indian countryour numbers are
fewtwo or three o' the red varmints have escaped to give 'em information
o' what's been donethey'll be thirsty for revengeand nothing but a
special Providence can now alter thar prisoners' doom. I had hoped it war to
be otherwise; but we must submit to God's decrees; and raising his hand to
his eyes, the old woodsman hastily brushed away a tear, and turned aside to
conceal his emotion; while Ella, overcome by her feelings, at the thought
of having parted, perhaps for the last time, from Algernon and her uncle,
staggered forward and sunk powerless into the arms of Mrs. Younker, whose
tears now mingled with her own.
By this time the whole party had gathered silently around their noble leader,
and were observing the sad scene as much as the feeble light of the
scattered
brands would permit, their faces exhibiting a mournfulness of expression
in striking contrast to that they had so lately displayed previous to the death
of their comrade. To them Boone now turned, and running his eye slowly
over the whole, said, in a sad voice:
Well, lads, one o' our party's gone to his last account, I perceive,
and he pointed mournfully to the still body of Beecher, some three or four
paces distant; another I see is wounded, and a third's missing. I hope no
harm's befallen him, the noble Master Harry Millbanks!
Alas! he's dead, colonel! answered Isaac, covering his eyes with his
hand.
Dead! echoed Boone.
Dead! cried the others simultaneously.
Yes, rejoined Isaac, with a sigh; he and I war chasing that thar
infernal
renegade Girty, who war running away with Ella thar, and he'd jest
got up to him, and got him by the arm, when Girty shuk him off like it
warn't nothing at all, and then shot him dead on the spot. Ef he hadn't a
bin quite so quick about it, I think as how it wouldn't a happened; for the
next moment I hit him a rap on the head with the but-end o' my rifle, that sent
him a staggering off, and would ha' fetched him to the ground, ef it hadn't
first struck a limb. Howsomever, it made him let go o' Ella, and start up a
new trailjest leaving his compliments for me in the shape of a bullet, which,
ef it didn't do me no harm, it warn't 'cause he didn't intend it to. I jest
stopped to look at poor Harry, and finding he war dead, I took Ella by the
hand and come straight down here.
Who's that you said war dead, Isaac? inquired his mother, who had
partially overheard the conversation.
Harry Millbanks, mother.
Harry Millbanks! repeated the dame in astonishment. What, young
Harry?our Harry?Goodness, gracious, marcy on me! what orful mean
wretches them Injens is, to kill sech as him. Dear me! then the hull family
is gone; for I hearn from Rosetta, that her father and mother and all war
killed afore her eyes; and now she's bin taken on to be killed too, the
darling
.
Ha! yes, said Boone, as if struck with a new thought, I remember
seeing the foot-prints of a childwar they made by this unfortunate young
man's sister?
I reckon as how they war, answered Mrs. Younker; for the poor
thing war a prisoner along with us, crying whensomever she dared to, like
all nater.
Well, rejoined the old hunter, musingly, we've done all we could
I'm sorry it didn't turn out betterbut we must now leave their fates in the
hands o' Providence, and return to our homes. We must bury our dead first;
and I don't know o' any better way, than to sink thar bodies in the Ohio.
Accordingly, after some further conversation, four of the party proceeded
for the body of Millbankswith which they soon returnedwhile Boone
conducted the ladies away from the scene of horror, and down to where Ella
informed him the canoes were hidden, leaving his younger companions to
rifle and scalp the savages if they chose. In a few minutes from his arrival
at the point in question, he was joined by the others, who came slowly, in
silence, bearing the mortal remains of Millbanks and Beecher. Placing the
canoes in the water, the whole party entered them, in the same silent and
solemn manner, and pulled slowly down the Miami, into the middle of the
Ohio; then leaving the vessels to float with the current, they uncovered
their heads, and mournfully consigned the bodies of the deceased to the
watery
element.
It was a sad and impressive scenethere, on the turbid Ohio, near the
midnight hourto give to the rolling waters the last remains of those who
had been their friends and companions, and as full of life and activity as
themselves but an hour before;it was a sad, impressive, and affecting
sceneone that was looked upon with weeping eyesand one which, by
those who witnessed it, was never to be forgotten. There were no loud
bursts of griefthere were no frantic exclamations of wobut the place
the hourand withal the various events which had transpired to call them
so soon from a scene of festivity to one of mourningtogether with the
thoughts of other friends departed, or in terrible captivity,served to
render
it a most painfully solemn one,and one, as we said before, that was
destined
never to be forgotten.
For a short space after the river engulphed the bodies, all gazed upon the
waters in silence when Boone said, in a voice slightly trembling.
They did their dutiesthey have goneGod rest their souls, and give
peace to their bones! and taking up a paddle, the noble old hunter pulled
steadily for the Kentucky shore, in silence, followed by the other boats in
the same manner. There they landed, placed the canoes in safety, in case
they should again be needed, rekindled their fire, and encamped for the night.
On the following morning, they set out upon their homeward journey,
where they finally arrived, without any events occurring worthy of note.
7
CHAPTER XII.
WILD-CAT'S ENCAMPMENTTHE PRISONERS AND THEIR TREATMENT
REAPPEARANCE
OF THE RENEGADEHIS BRUTAL CONDUCTTHE TAUNTSINGULAR
ATTACHMENT
OF OSHASQUATHE PIQUA TRIBETHE GUANTLETTHE PLIGHT
THE PURSUITTHE CAPTURE.
As you ascend the Miami from its mouth at the present day, you come
almost immediately upon what are termed the Bottoms, or Bottom Lands,
which are rich and fertile tracts of country, of miles in extent, and
sometimes
miles in breadth, almost water level, with the stream in question
slowly
winding its course through them, like a deep blue ribbon carelessly
unrolled upon a dark surface. They are now mostly under culture, and
almost entirely devoted to the production of maize, which, in the autumn
of the year, presents the goodly sight of a golden harvest. At the time of
which we write, there were no such pleasant demonstrations of civilization,
but a vast unbroken forest instead, some vestiges of which still remain, in
the shape of old decaying trees, standing grim and naked,
To summer's heat and winter's blast,
like the ruins of ancient structures, to remind the beholder of former days.
On these Bottoms, about ten miles above the mouth of the Miami,
Wild-cat
and his party, with their prisoners, encamped on the evening the attack
was made upon the renegade, as shown in the preceding chapter. Possessing
caution in a great degree, and fearful of the escape of his prisoners,
Wild-cat
spared no precautions which he thought might enhance the security of
Younker and Reynolds. Accordingly, when arrived at the spot where he
intended to remain for the night, the chief ordered stakes to be driven deep
into the earth, some distance apart, to which the feet of the two in
question
after
being thrown flat upon their backs, in opposite directionswere
tightly bound, with their hands still corded to the cross-bars as before. A
rope was next fastened around the neck of each, and secured to a
neighboring
sapling, in which uncomfortable manner they were left to pass the
night; while their captors, starting a fire, threw themselves upon the earth
around it, and soon, to all appearance, were sound asleep.
To the tortures of her older companions in captivity, little Rosetta was
not subjected; for Oshasquathe fierce warrior to whom Girty had
consigned
her, in the expectation, probably, that she would long ere this have
been knocked on the head and scalpedhad, by one of those strange
mysterious
phenomena of nature, (so difficult of comprehension, and which
have been known to link the rough and bloody with the gentle and innocent,)
already began to feel towards her a sort of affection, and to treat her with
great kindness, whenever he could do so unobserved by the others. The
apparel of which he had at first divested her, to ornament his own person,
had been restored, piece by piece; and this, together with the change in his
manner, had at length been observed by the child, with feelings of
gratitude
.
Poor little thing! to whom could she look for protection now? Her
father and mother were deadhad been murdered before her own eyes
her brother was away, and she herself a captive to an almost merciless
foe;could she feel other than grateful for an act of kindness, from one at
whose hands she looked for nothing but abuse and death? Nay, more: So
strange and complex is the human heartso singular in its developments
that we see nothing to wonder at, in her feeling for the savage, under the
circumstancesloathsome and offensive as he might have been to her under
othersa sort of affection,or rather, a yearning toward him as a
protector. Such she did feel; and thus between two human beings, as much
antagonistical perhaps, in every particular, as Nature ever presented, was
already established a kind of magnetic sympathyor, in other words, a
gradual blending together of opposites. The result of all this, as may be
imagined, was highly beneficial to Rosetta, who, in consequence, fared as well
as circumstances would permit. At night she slept unbound, beside
Oshasqua
,
who secured her from escape by passing his brawny arm under her
head, which also, in a measure, served her for a pillow. So slept she on
the night in question.
With Younker and Reynolds, there was little that could be called sleep
the minds of both being too actively employed with the events which had
transpired, and with thoughts of those so dear to them, who had been left
behind, for what fate God only knew. Besides, there was little wherewithal
to court the drowsy god, in the manner of their reposeeach limb being
strained and corded in a position the most painful,and if they slept at all, it
was that feverish and fitful slumber, which, though it serve in part the
design
of nature, brings with it nothing refreshing to the individual himself.
To both, therefore, the night proved one of torture to body and mind; and
bad as was their condition after the encampment, it was destined to be worse
ere the gray dawn of morning, by the arrival of Girty and the only two
Indians
who had escaped the deadly rifles of the Kentuckians.
Up, warriors! cried the renegade, with a terrible blasphemous oath, as
he came upon the detachment. Up, warriors! and sharpen your wits to
invent the most damnable tortures that the mind of man can conceive!
and at the sound of his voice, which was loud and hoarse, each Indian
sprang to his feet, with an anxious and troubled face.
And you, ye miserable white dogs! continued Girty, turning to
Younker
and Reynolds, on whom he bestowed numerous kicks, as if by way
of enforcing the truth of his assertion; were you suffering all the
torments
of hell, you might consider yourselves in perfect bliss, compared to
what you shall yet undergo, ere death snatches you from me!
What new troubles ha' ye got, Simon Girty? asked Younker,
composedly
.
But you needn't answer; I can see what's writ on your face;
thar's bin a rescueyou've lost your prisonersfor which the Lord be
praised! I can die content now, with all your tortures.
Can you, by! cried the renegade, in a paroxism of rage; we shall seel
As he concluded, he bestowed upon Younker a kick in the face, so violent
that a stream of blood followed it. The old man uttered a slight groan, but
made no other answer, and Girty turned away to communicate to the
others
the intelligence of what had transpired since their parting; for although
they believed it to be of the utmost consequence, and tragical in all its
bearings
,
yet so far there had not been a question asked nor an event related
concerning it, on either sidesuch being the force of habit in all matters of
grave importance, and the deference to his superiors shown by the Indian
on all similar occasions.
As soon as Girty had made known the sad disaster that had befallen his
party, there was one universal yell of rage, accompanied by violent
demonstrations
of grief and angersuch as beating their bodies, stamping
fiercely on the ground, and brandishing their tomahawks over their heads
with terrific gestures. They then proceeded to dance around Younker and
Reynolds, uttering horrid yells, accompanied with kicks and blows; after
which, a consultation was held between Girty and Wild-cat, wherein it was
agreed to take them to Piqua, a Shawanoe settlement on the Miami, and
there have them put to the tortures. Accordingly, without further delay
they unbound their prisoners, with the exception of their hands, and forced
them to set forward at a fast pacetreating them, meanwhile, in the most
brutal manner. Oshasqua, however, took good care there should be no
violence done to Rosetta; for he kept her closely by his side, and
occasionally
,
when he saw her little limbs growing weary, raised and bore her
forward
,
for a considerable distance, in his arms.
It was a strange, but by no means unpleasing sight, to behold that dark,
bloodstained warriorwhose very nature was cruel and ferocious, and who
probably had never before loved or sought to protect aught bearing the
human
formnow exhibiting such tender regard for a weak, trembling
prisoner
,
placed in his hands for a speedy sacrifice. It was withal an affecting
sight, to Younker and Reynolds, who looked upon it with moistened eyes,
and felt in it the force of a revelation from Heaven, that He, who sees the
sparrow fall, was even now moving through the wilderness, and teaching
one lesson of mercy, at least, to the most obdurate heart of the savage race.
To the renegade, however, this conduct of Oshasqua was far from being
agreeable; for so much did he delight in cruelty, and so bitterly did he hate
all his raceparticularly now, after having been foiled by them so lately
that be would a thousand times rather have heard the dying groans of the
child, and seen her in the last agonies of death, than in the warriors arms.
At length he advanced to the side of the Indian, and said in the Shawanoe
dialect, with a sneer:
Is Oshasqua a squaw, that he should turn nurse?
Probably from the whole vocabulary of the Indian tongue, a phrase more
expressive of contempt, and one that would have been more severely felt
by the savage warrior, who abhors any thing of a womanly nature, could not
have been selected; and this Girty, who understood well to whom he was
speaking, knew, and was prepared to see the hellish design of his heart
meet with a ready second from Oshasqua. For a moment after he spoke,
the latter looked upon the renegade with flashing eyes, and then seizing
Rosetta roughly, he raised her aloft, as if with the intention of dashing
her brains out at his feet. She doubtless understood from his fierce
movement
the murderous intent in his breast, and uttered a heart-rending cry of
anguish. In an instant the grim features of the Indian softened, and
lowering
her again to her former position in his arms, he turned coldly to Girty,
and smiting his breast with his hand, said with dignity:
Oshasqua a warrior above suspicion. He can save and defend with his
life whom he loves!
Girty bit his lips, and uttering a deep malediction in English, turned away
to consult with Wild-cat on the matter; but finding the chief would not join
him in interfering with the rights of the other, he growled out another
dreadful oath, and let the subject drop.
Late at night the party encamped within something like a mile of Piqua,
and by daylight a warrior was despatched with information of their
approach, their prisoners, and the sad disaster they had experienced
on their journey. In the course of an hour the messenger returned,
bringing
with him a vast number of savages of both sexes and all ages, who
immediately set up the most horrid yells danced around Younker and
Algernon
like madmen, not unfrequently beating and kicking them unmercifully.
They then departed for the town, taking the prisoners with them, where their
fate was to be decided by the council.
[11]
[11]
Lest there should seem to the reader an inconsistency in one tribe yielding the fate of
their prisoners to the decision of another, we would remark here, that at the period of which
we write, the Six Nations were allied and fought for one common interest against the
Americans, on the British side, and therefore not unfrequently shared each others dangers
and partook of each others spoils.
But ere sentence should be pro
nounced, it was the unanimous voice of all, that they should have some
amusement, by forcing the prisoners to run the gauntlet. This, to the
women
and children, as well as the warriors themselves, was a most delightful
sport, and they at once made the welkin ring with yells of joy.
It's a hard task we've got to undergo new, Algernon, said Younker, in
a low voice, and God send it may be my last; for I'd much rayther die
this way, nor at the stake. I don't at all calculate on escapingbut
something
tells me you willand ef you do
Here the old man was interrupted by Girty, who forced himself between
the two and separated them. Younker being the first selected to run the
gauntlet
,
was immediately unbound, and stripped to the skin,
[12]
[12]
A practice sometimes, but not always, followed.
preparatory to the
race. The assemblage now formed themselves into two lines, facing each
other, only a few feet apart, and extending the distance of a hundred yards,
terminating near the council-house, which stood in the center of the village.
Through these lines, the old man was informed by Girty, that he must run;
while the savages on either side, armed with clubs, were at liberty to inflict
as many blows upon him as they could in passing; and therefore it would
stand him in hand to reach the other extremity as soon as possible.
I'm an old man, Simon Girty, said Younker, in reply, and can't run
as I once couldso you needn't reckon on my gitting through alive.
But, by! you must get through alive, or else not at all; for we
can't spare you quite so soon, as we want you to try the pleasures of the
stake, answered the renegade with a laugh.
God's will be donenot yourn nor mine! rejoined Younker, solemnly.
But tell me, Simon Girty, as the only favor I'll ever ask o' yewar my
wife and Ella rescued?
Why, said Girty, if it will do you any good to know it, I will tell
you they were; but I will add, for your particular benefit, that they will
again be in my power; for I will excite every tribe of the Six Nations to
the war path; and then, wo to the pioneers of Kentucky!for desolation.
rapine and blood shall mark our trail, until the race become extinct.
I have sworn, and will fulfil it. But comeall is ready.
For the first o' your information, I thank you, returned Younker;
for the last on't, I'll only say, thar's a power above ye. I'm ready
lead on!
Girty now conducted the old man to the lines, and having cautioned the
savages in a loud voice, to beware of taking his life, gave the signal for him
to start. Instantly Younker darted forward, and with such speed, that the
nearest Indians neglected to strike until he had passed them, by which
means he gained some six or eight paces, without receiving a blow; but now
they fell hard and fast upon him, accompanied with screams and yells of
the most diabolical nature; and ere he had gone thirty yards, he began to
stagger, when a heavy stroke on the head laid him senseless on the earth.
In a moment the renegade, who had kept him company outside, burst
through the lines, just in time to ward off the blow of a powerful warrior,
aimed at the skull of Younker, which, without doubt, would have been fatal.
Fool! cried Girty, fiercely, to the Indian. Did I not tell you his life
must be spared for the stake?
The savage drew himself up with dignity, and walked away without reply;
while the renegade, examining the bruises of the fallen man for a moment or
two, ordered him to be taken to the council-house, and, if possible, restored
to consciousness. He then returned to Algernon, who had been left
standing
a sad spectator of the whole proceedings, and said, in a gruff voice:
Now, by ! young man, it's your turn; and let me tell you, it will
stand you in hand to do your bestha, ha, ha! Come, let us see what sort
of a figure you will cut. As he concluded, he severed the thongs around
the hands of our hero, and unceremoniously began to strip him, in which he
was aided by a couple of old squaws.
The features of Algernon were pale, but composed, and he allowed
himself
to be handled, as one who felt an escape from his doom to be impossible,
and who had nerved himself to undergo it, with as much stoicism as he
could command. As his vestments were rent from his body, the wound in
his side was discovered to be nearly healed; and would have been entirely
so, probably, but for the irritation occasioned it of late by his long marches,
exposure and fatigue, which had served to render it at present not a little
painful. As his eye for a moment rested upon it, his mind instantly reverted
to its causerecalled, with the rapidity of thought, which is the swiftest
comparison we can make, the many and important events that had since
transpired up to the present time, wherein the gentle Ella Barnwell held no
second placeand he sighed, half aloud:
I would to God it had been mortal!how much misery had then been
spared me?
As he said this, one of the squaws, who had been observing it intently,
struck him thereon a violent blow with her fist, which started it to bleeding
afresh, and, in spite of himself, caused Algernon to utter a sharp cry of
pain, at which all laughed heartily. Thinking doubtless this species
of amusement as interesting as any, the old hag was on the point of
repeating
the blow, when Girty arrested it, by saying something to her in the
Indian
tongue, and all three turned aside, as if to consult together, leaving our
hero standing alone, unbound.
A wild thought now suddenly thrilled him. He was free, perchance
he might escape; at least he could but die in the attempt; and that, at all
events, was preferable to a lingering death of torture! He looked
hurriedly
around. Only the renegade and the squaws were close at hand, and they
engaged in conversation. The main body of the Indians were at a distance,
awaiting him to run the gauntlet. He needed no second thought to prompt
him to the trial; and wheeling about, he placed his hand upon the wound,
and bounded away with the fleetness of the deer. In a moment the yells of
an hundred savages in pursuit, sounded in his ear, and urged him onward
to the utmost of his strength. He was no mean runner at any time; now
he was flying to save his life, and every nerve did its duty. Before him was
a slope, that stretched away to the river Miami, and down this he fled with
a velocity that astonished himself, while yell after yell of the demons behind,
now in full chase, were to him only so many death cries, to stimulate to
renewed
exertions. At last he gained the river and rushed into the water.
It was not deep, and he struggled forward with all his might. On the
opposite
side was a steep hill and thicket. Could he but gain that, hope
whispered
he might elude his pursuers and escape. Again he redoubled his
exertions
;
and, joyjoy to his heart!he reached it, just as the foremost of his
adversaries, a powerful and fleet young warrior, dashed into the stream from
the opposite bank. He now for the first time began to feel weak and
fatigued
;
but his life was yet in danger, and he still pressed onward. Alas!
alas! just on the point of escape, his strength was failing him fast, the blood
was trickling too from his wound, and a sharp, severe pain afflicted him in
his side. Oh God! he thoughtwhat would he not give for the strength
and soundness of body he once possessed! The thicket he had entered was
dense and dark, so that it was impossible to move through it with much
velocity
,
or see ahead any distance; and as the thought just recorded, rushed
through his brain, he came suddenly upon a high steep rock. By this time
his nearest pursner was also entering the thicket, and in a minute or two
more he felt capture would be certain, unless he could instantly secrete
himself
till his strength should be again renewed. Fortune for once now
seemed
to stand his friend; for stooping down at the base of the rock, he
discovered
it to be shelving and projecting somewhat over the declivity; so that
by dropping upon the ground and crawling up under it, he would, owing to
the density and darkness of the thicket, as before mentioned, be wholly
concealed
from any one standing upright. To do this was the work of a
moment
,
and the next he heard his pursuing foe rush panting by, with much
the same sense of relief that one experiences on awaking from a horrible
dream, where death seemed inevitable, and finding oneself lying safely and
easily in a comfortable bed.
We say Algernon experienced much the same sense of relief as the
awakened
dreamer; but unlike the latter, his was only momentary; for yell upon
yell still sounded in his ear, and plunge after plunge into the stream, followed
quickly by a rustling of the bushes around, the tramping of many feet close
by, and the war-whoops of his enemies, warned him, that if he had escaped
one, there were hundreds yet to be eluded before he could consider himself
as safe. Wildly his heart palpitated, as now one stirred the bushes within
reach of his hand, and slightly pausing, as if to examine the spot of his
concealment
,
uttered a horrid yell, as of discovery, and then, just as he
fancied
all was lost, to his great relief darted suddenly away.
Thus one after another passed on, and their fierce yells gradually
sounding
more and more distant, renewed his hope, that he might yet escape their
vigilant eyes, and again be free to roam the earth at will. O, potent, joyful
thought!how it made his very heart leap, and the blood course swiftly
through his heated veins!and then, when some sound was heard more near,
how his heart sickened at the fear he might again be captured, and forced
to a lingering, agonizing death!how he shuddered as he thought, until his
flesh felt chill and clammy, and cold drops of perspiration, wrung forth by
mental agony, stood upon his pale features! Even death before his escape,
possessed not half the terrors for him it would have now; for then he had
nerved himself to meet it, and prepared himself for the worst; but now he
had again had a taste of freedom, and would feel the reverse in a thousand
accumulated horrors.
Thus for a few minutes he lay, in painful thought, when he became aware,
by the different sounds, that many of the savages were returning.
Presently
some two or three paused by the rock, and beat back the bushes around
it. Then, dropping upon his knees, one of the Indians actually put his head
to the ground, and peered up into the cavity. It was a horrible moment of
suspense to Algernon, as he beheld the hideous visage of the savage so near,
and evidently gazing upon him; and thinking himself discovered, he was on
the point of coming forth, when a certain vagueness in the look of the
Indian
,
led him to hope he was not yet perceived; and he lay motionless, with
his breath suspended. But, alas! his hope was soon changed to despair;
for after gazing a moment longer, the Indian suddenly started, his features
expressed satisfaction, he uttered a significant grunt, and, springing to his
feet, gave a loud, long, peculiar whoop. The next moment our hero was
roughly seized, and, ere he could exert himself at all, dragged forth by the
heels, by which means his limbs and body became not a little bruised and
lacerated.
The savages now come running towards their prisoner from all quarters,
in high glee at his recapturebeing attracted hither, probably, by the
signal
whoop of success made by the one who first discovered him. Among the
rest came Girty, who, as he approached Algernon, burst into a loud laugh,
saying, in a jocular manner:
Well, my fine bird, so you are caught again, eh? I was most infernally
afraid you had got away in earnest; I was, by ! But we'll soon fix you
now, so that you won't run away again in a hurryha, ha, ha!
Then turning to the savages around him, the renegade continued his
remarks
in the Indian tongue, occasionally laughing boisterously, in which
they not unfrequently joined. In this manner, the whole party returned in
triumph to the village, being met on their way thither, by the women and
children, who set up yells of delight, sung and danced around their prisoner,
whom they beat with their fists and with sticks, until he became sore from
head to heel.
The gauntlet was soon again made ready, and Algernon started upon the
race; but fatigued in body and mind, from the late eventsweak and faint
from the bleeding of his wound and bruiseshe scarcely reached twenty
paces down the lines, ere he sunk overpowered to the earth, from which he
was immediatly raised, and borne forward to the council-house, where,
according
to the Indian custom, the chiefs and warriors were to decide upon
his fate.
CHAPTER XIII.
THE COUNCILTHE TRIALTHE SENTENCETHE THREATTHE HORRIBLE
EXECUTION
.
The council-house in question, was a building of good size, of larger
dimensions
than its neighbors, stood on a slight elevation, and, as we
before
remarked, near the center of the village. Into this the warriors and
head men of the Piqua tribe, now speedily gathered, and proceeded at once
to business. An old chiefwhose wrinkled features and slightly tremulous
limbs, denoted extreme agewas allowed, by common consent, to act as
chairman; and taking his position near the center of the apartment, with a
knife and a small stick in his hand, the warriors and chief men of the nation
formed a circle around him.
Among these latterconspicuous above all, for his beautiful and graceful
form, his dignified manner, and look of intelligence, to whom all eyes turned
with seeming deferencewas the celebrated Shawanoe chief, Catahecassa,
(Black Hoof) whose name occupies no inferior place on the historic page of
the present day, as being at first the inveterate foe, and afterward the warm
friend of the whites. In stature he was smallbeing only about five feet
eight incheslightly made, but strongly put together, with a countenance
marked and manly, and one that would be pleasing to a friend, but dreaded
by an enemy. He was a great orator, a keen, cunning and sagacious
warrior
,
and one who held the confidence and love of his tribe. At the period
referred to, he was far past what is usually termed the middle age, though,
as subsequent events have proved, only in his noon of lifefor at his death
he numbered one hundred and ten years.
Upon the ground, within the circle, and near the old chief in the center,
were seated Algernon and Younkerthe latter having recovered
consciousness
both
haggard and bloody from their recent brutal treatment. They
were sad spectacles to behold, truly, and would have moved to pity any
hearts less obdurate than those by which they were surrounded. Their
faces bore those expressions of dejection and wan despair, which may
sometimes
be perceived in the look of a criminal, when, loth to die, he is assured
all hope of pardon is past. Not that either Younker or Reynolds felt
criminal
,
or feared death, in its ordinary way; but there were a thousand things
to harrass their minds, besides the dreadful thought of that lingering,
horrible
torture, which were enough to make the boldest quail, and which they
now had not the faintest hope of escaping. There is ever something solemn
and awful in the thought of death, let it come in the mildest form possible,
for the individual feels he is hastening to that silent bourne, whence none
have e'er returned to tell its mysteries,yet such is as nothing in compare
with the death our prisoners were now silently awaiting, away from friends
and all sympathy, in the full vigor of animal life, to be fairly worn out by
the most excruciating pains, amid the hootings and revilings of a savage foe.
It was enough to have made the stoutest heart faint, trembling and sick;
and thus our unfortunate friends felt, as they slowly gazed around, and
saw nothing but fierce, angry looks bent upon them.
Girty was the first to address the assemblage, in the Indian dialect, in an
animated and angry speech of five minutes duration, occasionally turning
his sinister visage upon the prisoners, with an expression of mortal hatred,
gesticulating the while in that vehement manner, which would have left no
doubts on their minds as to the nature of his discourse, had they not
previously
known him to be their determined foe. He narrated to the savages,
clearly and briefly, the wrongs which had been done them, as well as
himself
,
by the whites; how, as the ally and friend of the red-man, he had been
cursed, defied and treated with much contumely, by those here present; how
their friends had followed and slaughtered his braves; how the whites, their
foes, were every day becoming stronger and more aggressive; how that,
unless speedily exterminated, they would presently drive the red-men from
their hunting grounds, burn their wigwams, and murder their wives and
children,referred them, as a proof, to the sacking and burning of the
Chillicothe
and Piqua villages, on the Little Miami and Mad rivers, the year
preceding, by General Clark and his men;
[13]
[13]
In the action at Piqua here referred to, Simon Girty commanded three hundred
Mingoes
,
whom he withdrew on account of the desperation with which the whites fought.
and wound up by demanding
the death of the prisoners at the stake, and a speedy and bloody retaliation
upon the pioneers of Kentucky.
As Girty concluded his speech, which was listened to in breathless silence,
there was a great sensation in the house, and an almost unanimous grunt of
approval from the chiefs and braves there assembled. It needed but this,
to arouse their vindictive passions against the white invader to the extreme,
and they bent upon the unfortunate prisoners, eyes which seemed inflamed
with rage and revenge. Girty perceived, at a glance, that he had
succeeded
to the full of his heart's desire; and with a devilish smile of
satisfaction
on his features, he drew back among the warriors, to listen to the
harrangues
of the others.
Black Hoof was the next to follow the renegade, in a similar but more
eloquent strain, during which his countenance became greatly animated and
it was easy for the prisoners to perceivewho could not understand a word
he utteredthat he spoke with great enthusiasm. He also pressed upon his
companions the vast importance of exterminating the whites, ere they
as he expressed itbecame as the leaves of the forest, and covered the
red-man's
soil; that, for this purpose, they should prepare themselves as soon
as possible, to open a deadly, unyielding warfare upon the frontiers; but
said, withal, that he was opposed to burning the prisonersas that was a
barbarism which he feared would not be sanctioned by the Great Spirit
and urged that they should be put to death in a quicker and milder form.
[14]
[14]
This was a peculiar characteristic of this great chief, as drawn from the pages of
history
;
and the more peculiar, that he was a fierce, determined warrior, and the very last to
hold out against a peace with his white enemy. But there were some noble attributes in
the man; and when, at last, he was wrought upon to sign the treaty of Greenville, in
1795twenty-four years after the date of the foregoing eventsso keen was his sense of
honor, that no entreaty nor persuasion could thenceforth induce him to break his bond;
and he remained a firm friend of the Americans to the day of his death. He was opposed
to burning prisoners, and to polygamy, and is said to have lived forty years with one wife,
rearing a numerous family of children.
See Drake's Life of Tecumsah
.
Black Hoof's speech was warmly received, with the exception of what
referred
to the prisoners, and this rather coldly. They were excited and
madtheir passions were up for revengeand they could not bear the idea
of sending a prisoner out of the world, without first enjoying the delight of
seeing him writhe under the tortures of the stake.
Wild-cat next followed Black Hoof, in a brief speech, in which he but
echoed the sentiments of Girty throughout, and received, like his colleague,
an almost universal grunt of approbation. He was succeeded by one or
two others, to the same effecteach urging the burning of the prisoners
and on their conclusion, no other appearing to speak, the old chief in the
center at once proceeded to decide, by vote, the matter at issue. Advancing
to the warrior nearest the door, he handed him a war-club, and then
resumed
his place in the circle, to record the will of each. Those who were
in favor of burning the prisoners, struck the ground fiercely with the
weapon
in question, and then passed it to his neighbor; those who were
otherwise
disposed, passed it quietly, in silence; thus it went through the whole
assemblagethe old chief recording the vote of each, by cutting a notch on
the stick in his hand; those for mercy being placed on one side, and those
for the torture on the opposite. Some three or four only, besides Black
Hoof, passed it quietlyconsequently the sentence of death was carried by
a decided majority. Had there been any doubt in the minds of Younker
and Reynolds as to the result, it would have needed only one glance at
Girty, who was now grinning upon them like a demon, to assure them their
doom was sealed.
The question next came up as to the time and place for executing the
sentence; and after some further debate, it was decided that the old man
should be burnt forthwith, in the village, that their women and children
might have a holiday pastime; but that Algernon must be made a grand
national
example, before the assembled tribes at Upper Sandusky, when they
should be met to receive presents from the British agent.
The reader will bear in mind, that these events transpired during the American
Revolution
;
that the Indians were, at this time, allies of the British; who paid them, in
consequence
,
regular annuities, at Upper Sandusky.
This latter
decision
was mainly effected by the eloquence of Black Hoof; who, from some
cause, for which it would be impossible to accountonly as a mysterious
working of an overruling Providencehad secretly determined, if such a
thing were possible, to save the life of Algernon; and took this method, as
the only one likely to aid his purpose, by protecting him from immediate
death.
The trial concluded, the council now broke up, and Girty was authorized
to inform the prisoners of their sentence, while four young braves were
selected
to take charge of Algernon, and to set off with him, so soon as the
burning of Younker should be over, for Upper Sandusky, where he was to
be kept in durance until wanted. Advancing directly to the prisoners, the
renegade now said, with a sneer:
Well, my beauties, are you ready to die?
We don't expect any thing else, Simon Girty, answered the old man,
mildly.
Don't you, by! rejoined Girty. Perhaps it's just as well you
don'tha, ha, ha! Come, old dotard, he continued, down on your
marrow
bones, and say your prayers; for by! you will never behold the
setting of another sun.
I've said my prayers regular for thirty year, answered Younker,
and I've been ready to die whensomever the Lord should see fit to call
me, and therefore don't feel myself no more obligated to pray jest at this
perticular time, than ef I war told I war going to live twenty year more.
It's only them as hain't lived right, that the near coming o' death makes
pray, more nor at another time; and so jest allow me, Simon Girty, to
return
you your advice, which is very good, and which, ef you follow
yourself
,
you'll be likely to make a much better man nor you've ever done
afore.
Fool! muttered the renegade with an oath. Then turning to
Algernon
,
he continued: You, sirrah, are destined to live a little longerthough
by no design of mine, I can assure you. Don't flatter yourself, though, that
you are going to escape, he added, as he perceived the countenance of
Algernon
slightly brighten at his intelligence; for by! if I thought there
was a probability of such a thing happening, I would brain you where you
sit, if I died for it the next moment. No, young man, there is no escape
for you; you are condamned to be burat, as well as Younker, only at another
place; and by! I will follow you myself, to see that the sentence is
enforced with all its horrors.
For all of which, you doubtless feel yourself entitled to my thanks,
returned Algernon, bitterly. Do your worst, Simon Girty; but
understand
me, before you go further, that though life is as dear to me at the
present
moment as to another, yet so much do I abhor and loathe the very sight
of you, that, could I have it for the asking, I would not stoop to beg it of so
brutal and cowardly a thing as yourself.
By! cried Girty, in a transport of rage, the time will come,
when, if you do not sue for life, you will for death, and at my hands; and
till then will I forego my revenge for your insolence now. And let me tell
you one thing further, that you may muse upon it in my absence. I will
raise an army, ere many months are over, and march upon the frontiers of
Kentucky; and by all the powers of good and evil, I swear again to get
possession
of the girl you love, but whom I now hatehate as the arch fiend
hates Heavenand she shall theaceforth be my mistress and slave; and to
make her feel more happy, I will ever and anon whisper your name in her
ear, and tell her how you died, and the part I took in your death; and in
the still hours of night, will I picture to her your agonies and dying groans,
and repeat your prayers for death to release you. Ha! you may well
shudder
and grow pale; for again I swear, by all the elements, and by every
thing mortal and immortal, I will accomplish the deed! Then, and not till
then, will I feel my revenge complete.
The countenance of Girty, as he said this, was terrible to behold; for so
enraged was he, that he fairly foamed at the mouth, and his eyes seemed
like two balls of fire. As he concluded, he turned away abruptly, and
muttering
something in the Indian tongue, to some of the savages who were
standing around, immediately quitted the council-house.
As Girty departed, the four young warriors who were to have charge of
Algernon, immediately advanced to him, and one of them tapping him on
the shoulder, moved away, motioning him to follow. As he prepared to
obey, Younker grasped him by the hand, and with eyes full of tears, in a
trembling, pathetic voice, said:
Good-bye, lad! God bless and be with you! Something tells me we
won't never meet agin. Keep up as stout a heart as you can; and ef you
should escape, tell my (here the old man's voice faltered so that he could
scarcely articulate a syllable)tell my wife, andand children that I died
happy, a thinking o' them, and praying for 'em, toto the last. Good-bye!
good-bye! and wringing his hand again, the old man fairly sobbed aloud;
while the rough warriors stood looking on in silence, and Algernon could
only groan forth a farewell. So they partednever to meet again on earth.
Algernon was now conducted, by his guards, to a small building on the
outskirts of the village, where, after receiving food and water, and having
his clothes restored to him, he was informed by one of the Indianswho
could speak a smattering of Englishthat he might be bound and remain,
or accompany them to see the Big Knife tortured. He chose the former
without hesitation, and was immediately secured in a manner similar to
what he had been the night previously, and then left alone to the anguish of
his own thoughts. What the feelings of our hero were, as thus he lay,
suffering
from his bruises and woundhis mind recurring to the dire events
taking place in another part of the village, and his own awful doomwe
shall leave to the imagination of the reader; suffice to say, however, that
when his guards returned, some two hours later, he was found in a swooning
state, with large cold drops of perspiration standing thickly on his features.
Meantime, Younker was brought forth from the council-houseamid the
hootings, revilings, and personal abuse of the savage moband then painted
black,
[15]
[15]
This was a customary proceeding of the savages at that day, with all prisoners doomed
to death.
preparatory to undergoing the awful death-sentence. He was then
offered foodprobably with the kind intention of strengthening him, and
thus prolonging his life and torturesbut this he absolutely refused, and
was immediately conducted to the place of execution, which was on the
brow of the slope before described as reaching to the river. Here his
wrists were immediately bound behind him, and then a rope, fastened to the
ligature, was secured to a stakedriven into the earth for the purpose
and left sufficiently long for him to sit down, stand up, or walk around a
circle
of some six or eight feet in diameter.
During this proceeding, the Indians failed not to abuse him in various
wayssome by pinching, and others by pounding him with their fists, with
stones, and with clubs,all of which he seemed to bear with great patience
and resignation.
As soon as all was ready for the more diabolical tortures, Girty made
the announcement, in a brief speech to the Indians; and then taking up a
rifle, loaded with powder only, discharged it upon the prisoner's naked body.
A loud yell of satisfaction, from the excited mob, followed this inhuman
act; while several savages, rushing forward, with rifles loaded in the same
manner, now strove who should be first to imitate the renegade's example;
by which means, no less than fifty discharges were made, in quick
succession
,
until the flesh of the old man, from the neck downwards, was
completely
filled with burnt powder. Younker uttered a few groans, but bore all
with manly fortitude, and made no complaints.
This part of the hellish ceremony over, a fire was kindled of hickory
poles, placed in a circle round the stake, outside of that which his rope
allowed Younker to make, in order that he might feel all the torments of
roasting alive, without being sufficiently near to the flame to get a speedy
relief by death. To add even more torture, if possible, to this infernal
proceeding, the Indians would take up brands, and place the burning parts
against the old man's body; and then, as they saw him cringe and writhe
under the pain thus effected, would burst into horrid laughs, in which they
were ever joined by the renegade. The old squaws too, and even the
children
,
not wishing to be outdone in this refinement of cruelty, would take
slabs, and having loaded them with live coals and ashes, throw them upon
his head and body, until not only both became covered, but the ground
around him, so that there was no cool place for his feet; while at every new
infliction of pain, the crowd would break forth in strains of wild, discordant
laughter.
Thus passed some three-quarters of an hour, of tortures the most
horrible
,
during which the old man bore up under his sufferings, with a strength
and manliness, that not only astonished his tormenters, but excited for
himself
,
even in savage breasts, a feeling of respect. Girty, it maybe, was
moved to a similar feeling, for at length, advancing to his victim, he said, in
a tone of more deference than he had hitherto used:
You bear up well, old manwell. I have seen many a one die, in a
similar way, who was thought to be courageousyet none with that
firmness
you have thus far displayed.
Younker, who was slowly walking around the stake, with his face bent
toward
the earth, suddenly paused, as Girty addressed him, and turning his
eyes mildly upon the renegade, in a feeble voice replied:
My firmness is given me from above. I can bear my torments, Simon
Girty, for they're arthly, and will soon be over; but yournwho'll say
what yourn 'll be, when you come to answer afore Almighty God, for this
and other crimes! But that arn't for the like o' me to speak of now. I'm
a dying man, and trust soon to be in a better world. Ef I ever did you
wrong, Simon Girty, I don't remember it now; and I'm very sartin I never
did nothing to merit this. You came to my house, and war treated to the
best I had, and here am I in return for't. Howsomever, the reckoning's
got to come yit, atween you and your God; and so I leave youfarewell.
But say, returned Girty, who now seemed greatly moved by the manner
and tone of Younker: But say, old man, that you forgive me, and I will
own that I did you wrong.
I don't know's I've any enemies, except these round here, replied the
other, feebly, and I'd like to die at peace with all the world; but what you
ax, Simon Girty, I can't grant; it's agin my nater and conscience; I can't
say I forgive ye, for what you've done, for I don't. I may be wrongit
may not be Christian likebut ef it's a sin, it's one I've got to answer for
myself. No, Girty, I can't forgivepre'aps God willyou must look to
him:I can't, Girty, I can't; and so, farewell forever! God be merciful to
me a sinner, he added, looking upward devoutly, and ef I've done wrong,
oh! pardon me, for Christ's sake! With these words, the lips of Younker
were sealed forever.
Girty stood and gazed upon him in silence, for a few minutes, as one
whose mind is ill at ease, and then walked slowly away, in a mood of deep
abstraction. Younker continued alive some three-quarters of a hour longer
bearing his tortures with great fortitudeand then sunk down with a
groan and expired. The Indians then proceeded to scalp him; after which
they gradually dispersed, with the apparent satisfaction of wolves that have
gorged their fill on some sheep-fold.
When Algernon's guards returned, they found him in a swooning state, as
previously recorded; and fearful that his life might be lost, and another
day's sport thus spoiled, they immediately called in their great medicine
man, who at once set about bandaging his wound, and applying to it such
healing remedies as were known by him to be speedily efficacious, and for
which the Indians are proverbially remarkable. His bruises were also
rubbed
with a soothing liquid, and by noon of the day following, he had gained
sufficient strength to start upon his journey, accompanied by his guards.
On that journey we shall now leave him, and turn to other, and more
important
events; merely remarking, by the way, lost the reader should consider
the neglect an oversight, that on entering the Piqua village, Oshasqua had
taken care to render the life of little Rosetta Millbanks safe, and had secured
to her as much comfort as circumstances would permit.
CHAPTER XIV.
HISTORICAL EVENTSESTILL'S DEFEATBRYAN'S STATIONRETURN TO OUR
CHARACTERS.
From the first inroads of the whites upon what the Indians considered
their lawful possessions, although by them unoccupiednamely, the
territory
known as Kan-tuck-keeup to the year which opens our story, there
had been scarcely any cessation of hostilities, between the two races so
antagonistical
in their habits and principles. Whenever an opportunity
presented
itself favorable to their purpose, the savages would steal down from
their settlementsgenerally situated on the Bottom Lands of the principal
rivers in the present State of Ohiocross over
La Belle Reviere
into
Kentucky
,
and, having committed as many murders and other horrible acts as
were thought prudent for their safety, would return in triumph, if
successful
,
to their homes, taking along with them scalps of both sexes and all ages
from the infant to the gray-beard, and not unfrequently a few prisoners, for
the amusement of burning at the stake.
These flying visits of the savages were generally repaid by similar acts of
kindness on the part of the whites, who, on several occasions, marched with
large armies into their very midst, destroyed their crops and stores, and
burnt their towns. An expedition of this nature, was prosecuted by
General
Clark, in August of the year preceding the events we have detailed,
of which mention has been previously made. He had under his command
one thousand men, mostly from Kentucky, and marched direct upon old
Chillicothe, which the Indians deserted and burnt on his approach. He next
moved upon the Piqua towns, on Mad river, where a desperate engagement
ensued between the whites and Indians, in which the former proved
victorious
.
Having secured what plunder they could, together with the horses,
the Kentuckians destroyed the town, and cut down some two hundred acres
of standing corn. They then returned to Chillicothe on their homeward
route, where they destroyed other large fields of produce, supposed in all to
amount to something like five hundred acres.
We have mentioned this expedition, for the purpose of showing why the
year which opens our story, 1781, was less disastrous to the frontier
settlers
,
than the preceding onesthe Indians being too busily occupied in
repairing
the damage done them, and in hunting to support their families, to
have much thought for the war-path, or time to follow it; consequently the
year in question, as regards Kentucky, may be said to have passed away in
a comparatively quiet manner, with no events more worthy of note than
those we have laid before the reader.
But if the vengeance of the savage slumbered for the time being, it was
only like some pent up fire, burning in secret, until opportunity should
present
for it to burst forth in a manner most appalling, carrying destruction
and terror throughout its course; and in consequence of this, the year 1782,
was destined to be one most signally marked by bloody deeds in the annals
of Kentucky. The winter of '81 and '82 passed quietly away; but early
in the ensuing spring, hostilities were again renewed, with a zeal which
showed that neither faction had forgotten old grudges, by the intervening
quictude. Girty did all that lay in his power, to stir up the vindictive
feelings
of the Indians, and was aided in his laudable endeavors by one or two
others,
[16]
[16]
McKee and Elliot.
who wore the uniform of British officers. It was the design of the
renegade, to raise a grand army from the union of the Six Nations, lead
them quietly into the heart of Kentucky, and, by a bold move, seize some
prominent station, murder the garrison, and thus effect at once a strong
hold, from which to sally forth, spread death and desolation in every
quarter
,
and, if possible, depopulate the entire country. Long and ardently did
he labor, in stirring up the Indians by inflammatory speeches, till at last he
succeeded in uniting a grand body for his hellish purpose, which, on the very
extreme point of success, as one may say, was at last frustrated, by what
seemed a direct Providence, of which more anon and in its proper place.
Previously, however, to the event just referred to, parties of Indians,
numbering
from five to fifty, prowled about the frontiers, committing at every
opportunity, all manner of horrid deeds, and thus rousing the whites to
defence
and retaliation. One of these skirmishes has been more particularly
dwelt on, by the historians of Kentucky, than any of the others; on account
probably, of the desperate and sanguinary struggle for mastery, between the
two contending parties, and the cruel desertion, at a time of need, of a
portion
of the whites; by which means the Indians had advantage of numbers
that otherwise would have been equally opposed. We allude to what is
generally known as Estill's Defeat.
It is not our province in the present work, to detail anything not directly
connected with our story; and therefore we shall pass on, after a cursor
glance at the main facts in question. Sometime in March, a party of
Wyandots
made a descent upon Estill's station, which stood near the present site of
Richmond; and having killed and scalped a young lady, and captured a
Negro
slave, were induced, by the exaggerated account which the latter gave of
the force within, to an immediate retreat; whereby, probably, the lives of the
women and children, almost the only occupants, were savedCaptain Estill
himself, with his garrison, and several new recruits, being at the time away,
on a scarch for these very savages, who were known, by some unmistakable
signes, to be in the vicinity. Word being despatched to Estill, of what had
transpired
in his absence, he immediately sought out the trail of the retreating
foes, which he followed with his men, and toward night of the second day,
overtook them at Hinston's Fork of Licking, where a desperate engagement
immediately ensued. At the onset, there were twenty five Indians, and
exactly
the same number of whites; but the immediate desertion, in a cowardly
manner, of a certain Lieutenant Miller, with six men under his command,
left the odds greatly in favor of the Wyandots, who were all picked
warriors
.
Notwithstanding the cowardice of their companions, our little Spartan
band fought most heroically, for an hour and three-quarters, when the few
survivors, on both sides, being almost worn out, ceased hostilities as by
mutual consent. In this ever memorable action, Captain Estill, a brave and
popular man, together with nine of his gallant companions, fell to rise no
more. Four others were badly wounded, leaving only the same number of
unharmed survivors. The Indians, it was afterwards ascertained, had
seventeen
warriors killed on the field, among whom was one of their bravest
chiefs, and two others severely wounded; and there has been a tradition
since, among the Wyandots, that only one survivor ever returned to tell the
tale.
The news of the foregoing disastrous skirmish, flew like wild fire, to use
a common phrase, throughout the borders, and together with others of less
note, served to arouse the fire of vengeance in the bosoms of the settlers, and
excite a deeper hostility than ever against the savage foe. Nor was the
subsequent conduct of the Indians themselves, calculated to sooth this
bitter
feeling against them; for to use the words of a modern writer, The
woods again teemed with savages, and no one was safe from attack beyond
the walls of a station. The influence of the British, and the constant
pressure
of the Long Knives, upon the red-men, had produced a union of the
various tribes of the northwest, who seemed to be gathering again to strike
a fatal blow at the frontier settlements; and had they been led by a Phillip,
a Pontiae, or a Tecumthe, it is impossible to estimate the injury they might
have inflicted.
Whether the foregoing remarks may be deemed, by the reader, a
digression
or-otherwise, we have certainly felt ourself justified in making them;
from the fact, that our story is designed to be historical in all its bearings;
and because many months being supposed to elapse, ere our characters are
again brought upon the stage of action, it seemed expedient to give a general
view of what was taking place in the interval. Having done so, we will
now forthwith resume our narrative.
About five miles from Lexington, a little to the left of the present road
leading thence to Maysville, and on a gentle rise of the southern bank of the
Elkhorn, at the time of which we write, stood Bryan's Station, to which we
must now call the reader's attention. This station was founded in the year
1779, by William Bryan, (a brother-in-law of Daniel Boone.) who had,
prior to the events we are now about to describe, been surprised and killed
by the Indians, in the vicinity of a stream called Cane Run.
This fort, at the period in question, was one of great importance to the
early settlersstanding, as it did, on what was considered at the time of its
erection, the extreme frontier, and, by this means, extending their area of
security. The station consisted of forty cabins, placed in parallel lines,
connected by strong pallisades, forming a parallelogram of thirty rods
by twenty, and enclosing something like four acres of ground. Outside of
the cabins and pallisades, to render the fort still more secure, were planted
heavy pickets, a foot in diameter, and some twelve feet in height above
the ground; so that it was impossible for an enemy to scale them, or affect
them in the least, with any thing short of fire and cannon ball. To guard
against the former, and prevent the besiegers making a lodgement under the
walls, at each of the the four corners or angles, was erected what was
called a block-housea building which projected beyond the pickets, a few
feet above the ground, and enabled the besieged to pour a raking fire across
the advanced party of the assailants. Large folding gates, on huge wooden
hinges, in front and rear, opened into the enclosure, through which men,
wagons, horses, and domestic cattle, had admittance and exit. In the
center
,
as the reader has doubtless already divined, was a large, hollow space,
into which the doors of the cabins opened, and which served the purpose of
a regular common, where teams and cattle were oftentimes secured, and
where wrestling and other athletic sports were practiced. The cabins were
all well constructed, with puncheon floors, the roofs of which sloped inward,
to avoid as much as possible their being set on fire by burning arrows, shot
by the Indians for the purposea practice by no means uncommon during
a siege. This fort, at the period, referred to, was garrisoned by from forty to
fifty men; and though somewhat out of repair, in respect to few of its
pallisades
,
was still in a condition to resist an overwhelming force, unless taken
wholly by surprise. There was one great error, however, connected with
its designand one that seems to have been common to most of the stations
of that periodwhich was, that the spring, supplying the inmates with water,
had not been enclosed within the pickets. The reader can at once imagine
the misery that must ensue from this cause, in case they were suddenly
assaulted
by a superior enemy, and the seige protracted to any considerable
length of time.
Within this fort, on their return from captivity, Mrs. Younker, Isaac and
Ella had taken up their abode, to remain until another cabin should be
erected
,
or it should be thought safe for them to live again in a more exposed
manner. Isaac had straightway repaired to his father-in-law's, to behold
again the idol of his heart, and pour into her ear his grief for the loss of his
father and friend, and receive her sympathy for his affliction in return. The
disastrous affair, which had called him and his companions so suddenly from
a scene of festivity to one of mourningthe loss of so many valuable
neighbors
,
and the result of the expedition in pursuit of the enemycreated at the
time no little excitement throughout the frontiers, and caused some of the
more timid to resort to the nearest stations for security. But as time wore
on, and as nothing serious happened during the fall and winter, confidence
and courage gradually became restored, and the affair was almost forgotten,
save by the friends and relatives of the deceased, and those particularly
concerned
in it.
Spring, however, revived the alarm of the settlers, by the re-appearance of
the enemy in all quarters, and the outrages they committed, as before
mentioned
,
so that but very few persons ventured to remain without the walls of
a fort, and these, such of them as were fortunate enough to escape death or
captivity, were fain to seek refuge therein before the close of summer.
Immediately on the receipt of the alarming intelligence of Estill's defeat,
Isaac, his wife, and the family of his father-in-law, Wilson, repaired to
Bryan's Station, and joined Mrs. Younker and Ella, who had meantime
remained
there in security.
CHAPTER XV.
BRYAN'S STATION IN 1782OLD CHARACTERS AND NEWTHE MISTAKETHE
MESSENGERTHE DIREFUL NEWSTHE WARLIKE PREPARATIONSTHE
STRANGER
THE
JOYFUL SURPRISE.
It was toward night of a hot sultry day, in the month of August, that Ella
Barnwell was seated by the door of a cabin, within the walls of Bryan's
Station
,
gazing forth, with what seemed a vacant stare, upon a group of
individuals
,
who were standing near the center of the common before spoken o
engaged in a very animated conversation. Her features perhaps were no
8
paler than when we saw her last; but there was a tender, melancholy
expression
on her sweet countenance, of deep abiding grief, and a look of
mournfulness in her beautiful eyes, that touched involuntarily the hearts of
all who met her gaze.
Since we last beheld her, days of anxious solicitude, and sleepless nights,
had been apportioned Ella; for memoryall potent memoryhad kept
constantly
before her mind's eye the images of those who were gone, and mourned
as forever lost to the living; and her imagination had a thousand times traced
them to the awful stake, seen their terrible tortures, heard their agonizing
dying groans, and her heart had bled for them in secret, and tears of anguish,
at their untimely fate, had often dimmed her eyes. Even now, as she
apparently
gazed upon that group of individuals, whom she saw not, and whose
voices, sounding in her ear, she heard not, her mind was occupied with the
probable fate of her uncle and Algernon, the still all absorbing theme of
her soul.
While seated thus, Mrs. Younker approached Ella from behind,
unperceived
by the latter, and now stood gazing upon her, with a sorrowful
look. The countenance of the good dame had altered less, perhaps, than
Ella's, owing to her strong masculine spirit; but still there was an expression
of anxiety and sadness thereon, which, until of late, had never been visible,
not even when on her march to what, as she then believed, was her final
doomthe excitement whereof, and the many events that occurred on the
route, having been sufficient to occupy her mind in a different manner from
what it had been in brooding over the fate of her husband for months in
secret, and in a place of comparative safety. At length a remark, in a loud
voice, of one of the individuals of the group before alluded to, arrested the
attention of both Mrs. Younker and Ella.
I tell you, said the speaker, who was evidently much excited, it was
that infernal cut-throat Girty's doings, and no mistake. Heaven's curses on
him for a villain!and I don't think he'll more nor meet his just dues, to
suffer them hell fires of torment, hereafter, that he's kindled so often around
his victims on earth.
At these words, Ella started to her feet, and exclaiming wildly:
Who are theywho are Girty's victims? sprang swiftly towards the
group, followed by Mrs. Younker.
All eyes, from all quarters, were now turned upon her, as, like a spirit, she
glided noiselessly forward, her sweet countenance radiant with the flush of
excitement, her eyes dilated and sparkling, and her glossy ringlets floating in
the breeze. Curiosity could no longer remain unsatisfied; and by one
spontaneous
movement, from every point of compass, women and children now
hurried toward the center of the common, to gather the tidings.
The quiet, modest, melancholy air of Ella, had, one time with another,
since her first appearance in the Station, attracted the attention, and won the
regard of its inmates, most of whom had made inquiries concerning her,
and learned the cause of her sadness; and now, as she gained the crowd,
each gazed upon her with a look of respect; and at once moving aside to
let her pass, she presently stood the central attraction of an excited
multitude
of both sexes, all ages and sizes.
Who are they? cried she again, turning from one to the other, rapidly,
with an anxious look: who are the victims of the renegade Girty?
We were speaking, Miss Barnwell, answered a youth, of genteel
appearance
,
doffing his hat, and making at the same time a polite and respectful
bow: We were speaking of the defeat, capture, and burning of Colonel
Crawford, by the Indians, in their own country, in which the notorious
Simon Girty is said to have taken an active part
[17]
[17]
This happened in June, 1782. For particulars of Crawford's disastrous campaign, and
horrible fate
See Hoice's Ohio
, p. 542.
news whereof has just
reached us.
At the mention of the name of Crawford, so different from the one she
was expecting to hear, the momentary insanity, or delusion of Ella, vanished;
she saw her position at a glance, the hundred eyes that were upon her, and
instantly her face became suffused with blushes, while she shrunk back,
with a sense of maidenly shame and bashful timidity, almost overpowering
to herself and really painful for others to behold. She now strove to speak
to give an excuse for her singular conductbut her tongue failed her, and
she would have sunk to the earth, only for the support of Mrs. Younker,
who at this moment gained her side.
Never mind it, Miss Barnwellit don't need any excusewe understand
your feelings for lost friends, were some of the remarks from the crowd,
as the throng again made a passage for her to depart.
Goodness, gracious, marcy on me alive! what a splurge you did make
on't, darling! said Mrs. Younker to Ella, as they moved away by
themselves
.
Why you jest kind o' started up, for all the world like a skeered
deer, and afore I could get my hands on ye, you war off like an Injen's
arrow
.
Well, thar, thar, poor girlnever mind it! added the good dame,
consolingly, as Ella turned towards her a painful, imploring look; we all
knows your feelings, darling, and so never mind it. Mistakes will happen in
the best o' families, as the Rev. Mr. Allprayer used to say, when any body
accused him o' doing any thing he hadn't oughter a done.
Mother, said Ella, feebly, I feel faint; this shock, I fear, may be too
much for my nervous system.
Oh! my child, darling, don't mind it!every body knows your feelings
and nobody'll think any thing strange on't. In course you war thinking
o' your friendsas war nateral you shouldand so war I; and when I heerd
the name o' that ripscallious renegade, it jest set my hull blood to biling,
like it war hot water, and I felt orful revengeful. But the Lord's will be
done, child. He knows what's best; and let us pray to Him, that of our
friends is among the land of the living, they may be restored to us, or taken
straight away to His presence. As Mrs. Younker said this, she and Ella
entered the cottage.
Poor girl! said a voice among the crowd, as soon as Ella was out of
hearing; they do say as how she eats but little now, and scarcely takes
any rest at all lately, on account of the trouble of her mind. Poor girl!
she's not long for this world; and the speaker shook his head sadly.
But what is it?what is it, as troubles her so? inquired an old woman,
in a voice tremulous with age, who, being somewhat of a new-comer, had not
heard the oft repeated story.
I'll tell it yeI'll tell it ye, answered another gossipping crone,
standing
beside the querist, who, fearful of being forestalled, now eagerly
began
her scandalous narration.
Meantime, the male portion of the crowd had resumed their conversation,
concerning the unfortunate campaign of Crawford, during which
manifold
invectives were bestowed upon the savages, and the renegade Girty.
Some of the more reckless among them were for raising another army, as soon
as possible, to pursue the Indians, even to the death, and spare none that fell
into their hands, neither the aged, women, nor children; but these propositions
were speedily overruled by cooler and wiser heads, who stated that
Kentucky
had scarcely fighting men enough to protect one another on their own
ground, much less to march into the enemy's country, and leave their wives
and children exposed to certain destruction.
While these discussions were in progress, the attention of each was
suddenly
arrested by the cry of some person from the right hand block-house,
looking toward the south, announcing that a single horseman was approaching
with a speed which betokened evil tidings. These were times of excitement,
when news of disaster and death was borne on almost every breeze, and
consequently all now sprang rapidly to the southern pickets, where, through
loop-holes and crevices in the partially decayed pallisades, they perceived an
individual riding as if for life.
How he rides!Who is it?What can have happened? were some
of the remarks now rapidly uttered, as the horseman was seen bounding
forward on his foaming steed. Instantly the nearest gate was thrown open,
and in less than two minutes, horse and rider stood within the enclosure,
surrounded by a breathless multitude, eager for his intelligence.
Arm! cried the horseman, a good looking youth of eighteen; Arm!
all that can be sparedand on to the rescue!
What's happened, Dick Allison? asked one who had recognised the
rider.
I have it on the best authority, answered Dick, that Hoy's Station
has just been attacked, by a large body of Indians, and Captain Holder and
and his men defeated.
But whar d'ye get your news? inquired another voice, while a
look of alarm and resolute determination to avenge the fallen, could be seen
depicted on the upturned countenances of the assemblage.
I was riding in that direction, when I met a messenger on his way to
Lexington for assistance; and turning my horse, I spurred hither with all
speed.
Have the red devils got possession of the fort? inquired another.
I am not certain, for I did not wait to hear particulars; but I'm under
the impression they have not, and that Holder was defeated outside the
walls.
Well, they must have assistance, and that as soon as it can be got to
'em, rejoined a white-haired veteran, one of the head men of the garrison,
whose countenance was remarkable for its noble, benevolent expression, and
who, from love and veneration, was generally called Father Albach. It's
too late in the day, though, to muster and march thar to-night, continued
the old man; but we'll have our horses got up and put in here to-night,
and our guns cleaned, and every thing fixed for to start at daylight
to-morrow
.
Eh! my gallant ladswhat say ye? and he glanced playfully around
upon the by-standers.
Yesyesyesfather! cried a score of voices, in a breath; and the
next moment a long, loud cheer, attested the popularity of the old man's
decision.
Another cheer for Father Albach, and three more for licking the
ripscallious
varmints clean to death! cried our old acquaintance, Isaac Yonker, who,
having been otherwise occupied during the discussion concerning Crawford's
defeat, had joined the mass on the arrival of the messenger.
Good for Ike, shouted one: Hurray! and four lusty cheers followed.
All now became bustle and confusion, as each set himself to preparing for
the morrow's expedition. Guns were brought out and cleaned, locks
examined, new flints put in place of old ones, bullets cast, powder-horns
replenished, horses driven within the enclosure, saddles and bridles
overhauled
,
and, in fact, every thing requisite for the journey was made ready
as fast as possible.
Isaac, on the present occasion was by no means indolent; for having
examined his rifle, and found it in a good condition, he immediately brought
fourth an old saddle and bridle, somewhat the worse for wear, and set
himself
down to repairing them, wherever needed, by thongs of deerskin.
While engaged in this laudable occupation, a young lad came running to,
and informed him, that there was a stranger down by the gate who wished
to speak with him immediately.
A stranger! replied Isaac, looking up in surprise. Why what in the
name o' all creation can a stranger be wanting with me? Why don't he come
and see me, if he wants to see me, and not put me to all this here trouble,
jest when I'm gitting ready to go and lick some o' them red heathen like all
nater?
Don't know, sir, answered the lad, what his reasons be for not
coming
,
any more nor you; but he said to the man as opened the gate for him,
`Is Isaac Younker in the fort?' and the man said, `Yes;'and then he said to
me, `Run my little lad, and tell him to come here, and I'll gin you
something
;'
and that's all I knows about it.
Well, I 'spose I'll have to go, rejoined Isaac, rising to his feet; but I
don't think much o' the feller as puts a gentleman to all this here trouble,
jest for nothing at all, as one may say, when a fellers in a hurry too.
Howsomever
,
continued he, soliloquising, as he walked forward in the proper
direction, I 'spect it's some chap as wants to hoax me, or else he's putting
on the extras; ef so, I'll fix him, so he won't want to do it agin right
immediately
,
I reckon.
Thus muttering to himself, Isaac drew near the front gate, against which,
within the pallisades, the stranger in question was leaning, with his hat
pressed down over his forehead, as though he desired concealment. His
habilliments, after the fashion of the day, were originally of a superior
quality to those generally worn on the frontiers, but soiled and torn in
several
places, as from the wear and tear of a long fatiguing journey. His
features, what portion of them could be seen under his hat, were pale and
haggard, denoting one who had experienced many and severe vicissitudes.
As Isaac approached, he raised his eyes from the ground, turned them full
upon him, and then taking a step forward, said, in a voice tremulous with
emotion:
Thank God! Isaac Younker, I am able to behold you once again.
As a distinct view of his features fell upon the curious gaze of the latter,
and his voice sounded in his ear, Isaac paused for a moment, as one stupified
with amazement; the next, he staggered back a pace or two, dropped his
hands upon his knees, in a stooping posture, as if to peer more closely into
the face of the stranger; and then bounding from the earth, he uttered a
wild yell of delight, threw his hat upon the ground in a transport of joy, and
rushed into the extended arms of Algernon Reynolds, where he wept like a
child upon his neck, neither of them able to utter a syllable for something like
a minute.
The Lord be praised! were the first articulate words of Isaac, in a voice
choked with emotion. God bless you! Mr. Reynolds; and again the tears
of joy fell fast and long. Is it you? resumed he, again starting back and
gazing wildly upon the other, as if fearful of some mistake. Yes! yes!
it's youthere's no mistaking that thar facethe dead's come to life agin,
for sartin; and once more he sprang upon the other's neck, with all the
apparent delight of a mother meeting with a lost child.
Yes, yes, Isaac, thank God! it is myself you really beholdone who
never expected to see you again in this world, rejoined Algernon, affected
himself to tears, by the noble, heart-touching, affectionate manner of his
companion. Butbut Isaacour friends hereare theyallall well,
Isaac? This was said in a voice, which, despite of the speaker's efforts to
be calm, trembled from emotion, anxiety and apprehension.
Why, answered Isaac, in a somewhat hesitating manner, I don't know's
thar's any body exactly sickbut
But what, Isaac? interrupted Algernon, with a start.
Why, Ella, you know
Yes, yes, Isaacwhat of her? and grasping him by the arm, Algernon
gazed upon the other's features with a look of alarm.
Now don't be skeered, Mr. Reynoldsthar han't nothing happened
only I 'spect she's bin a thinking o' you, who every body thought war dead,
and she's kind o' grown thin and pale on't, and we war gitting afeared it
might end badly; but as you've come now, I know as how it'll all be right agin.
Algernon released the speaker's arm, and for some moments gazed
abstractedly
upon the ground, while over his countenance swept one of those
painful expressions of the deep workings of the soul, to which, from causes
known to the reader, he was subject. At length he said, with a sigh:
Well, Isaac, I have come to behold her once again, and then He
paused, apparently overpowered by some latent feeling.
And then! said Isaac, repeating the words, with a look of surprise: I
reckon you arn't a going to leave us agin soon, Mr. Reynolds?
There are circumstances, unknown to you, friend Isaac, which I fear
will compel me so to do.
What! cried the other, start off agin, and put your scalp into the
hands of the infernal, ripscallious, painted Injens? No, by thunder! you
shan't do it, Mr. Reynolds; for sting me with a nest o' hornets, ef I don't
hang to ye like a tick to a sheep. No, no, Mr. Reynolds; don'tdon't
think o' sech a thing. But come, go in and see Ellashe'd be crazy ef
she knew you war here.
Ay, answered Algernon, sadly, that is what I fear. I dare not meet
her suddenly, Isaacthe shock might be too much for her nerves. I have
sent for you to go first and communicate intelligence of my arrival, in a way
to surprise her as little as possible.
I'll do it, Mr. Reynolds; but(here Isaac's voice trembled, his features
grew pale as death, and his whole frame quivered with intense emotion)but
but mymy fatherwhat He could say no morehis voice had
completely failed him.
Alas! Isaac, replied Algernon, deeply affected, and turning away his
face; think the worst.
Oh God! groaned Isaac, covering his face with his hands, and
endeavoring
to master his feelings. Butbuthe's dead, Mr. Reynolds?
He is.
For a few moments Isaac sobbed grievously; then withdrawing his hands,
and raising himself to an erect posture, with a look of resignation, he said:
II can bear it nowfor I know he's in Heaven. Stay here, Mr.
Reynolds, till I come back; and he turned abruptly away.
In a few minutes Isaac returnedhis features calm, but very paleand
silently motioned the other to follow him. On their way to the cottage, they
had to cross the common, where their progress was greatly impeded by a
crowd of persons, who, having heard of Algernon's arrival, were deeply
anxious to gather what tidings he might have concerning the movements of
the Indians. In reply, he informed them of the threats made by Girty to him
while a captive; and that, having since been a prisoner of the British at
Detroit, he had learned, from reliable sources, that a grand army of the
Indians
was forming to march upon the frontiers, attack some strong hold, and,
if possible, desolate the entire country of Kentucky; and that he believed
they were already on their way.
More'n that, they're already here, cried a voice; for it's them,
I 'spect, as has attacked Hoy's Station, of which we've just got news, and
are gitting ready to march at daylight and attack them in turn. Arm,
boys, arm! Don't let us dally here, and be lagging when the time comes to
march and fight!
With this the speaker turned away, and the crowd instantly dispersed to
resume their occupations of preparing for the coming expedition, while our
hero and Isaac pressed forward to the cottage of Mrs. Younker. At the door
they were met by the good dame herself, who, with eyes wet with tears,
caught the proffered hand of Reynolds in both of hers, pressed it warmly in
silence, and led him into the house. Ella, who was seated at a short distance,
on the entrance of Algernon, rose to her feet, took a step forward, staggered
back, and the next moment her insensible form was caught in the arms of the
being she loved, but had long mourned as dead.
CHAPTER XVI.
THE NARRATIVETHE PREPARATIONS TO MARCHTHE SUDDEN ALARMTHE
DECOYSTHE DILEMMATHE STRATAGEM.
It was late at night, but still Algernon Reynolds sat beside Ella Barnwell,
relating the sad story of his many hair-breadth escapes, and almost intollerable
sufferings. A rude sort of light, on a rough table, a few feet distant, threw
its faint gleams over the homely apartment, and discovered the persons of
Isaac and his mother, his wife and her parents, together with several others,
attracted hither by curiosity, grouped around our hero, and listening to his
thrilling narrative with breathless attention.
After being sufficiently recovered from my wound and bruises, to
proceed
upon my journey, (continued Reynolds, to resume the account of his
adventures since leaving him at Piqua) Girty came to me, and inquired what
I thought of my fate, and how I felt concerning it; to which I replied, rather
briefly, that it was no worse than I had expected, since knowing into whose
hands I had fallen. `Perhaps you think to escape?' said he, sneeringly.
`I have no such hope,' I replied.
`No, and by GI you needn't have, either,' rejoined he, with a savage
grin; `for I'm determined you shall experience the torture to its fullest
extent, if for nothing else than to revenge myself on you for your insults.
I have only one thing to regret; and that is, that you didn't suffer in place
of Younker, who is the only one whose torments I would I had no hand
in. But you
you
I could see tormented forever, and laugh heartily
throughout. But I'll wreak my vengeance on you yet; I will by !' and
with these words he left me to the charge of my guards, with whom he spoke
a short time in the Indian tongueprobably giving them instructions of
caution
regarding myself.
It was about mid-day, when, with my arms tightly bound, we set off for
Upper Sandusky, where, as I had previously been informed by Girty, I was
condemned to suffer before the assembled tribes of the different nations,
which would there shortly meet, to receive their annual presents from the
British. Our march, very fatiguing to myself, was without incident worthy
of note, until one night we arrived at a small village on the Scioto river,
where one of my guards, who could speak a little English, informed me
resided the celebrated Mingo chief, Logan. A thought suddenly flashed
across my brain. I had often heard of Logan, as the great and good chief,
humane in his principles, and friendly to the whitesparticularly those who
were signally unfortunateand it occurred to me, that could I gain an
interview, I might perhaps prevail upon him to assist me in making my
escape; and accordingly I at once expressed to my informant my desire of
beholding one so celebrated. To my great delight, he replied that it was in
Logan's cabin I was to pass the nightsuch being the private orders, as
I afterwards learned, of Black Hoofwho had, it seems, from some cause
unknown to myself, formed the design of saving my life; and had sent by
the Indian in question, a verbal request to Logan, to use all his influence to
this effect.
As we entered the village, we were immediately surrounded by men
women and children, who stared hard at me, but offered no violence. In a
few minutes we gained Logan's hut, in the door of which I observed standing
an old, noble-looking warrior, with a commanding form, and mild, benevolent
countenance, who proved to be the chief himself. To him one of my
guards now addressed a few words in Indian, and uttering a grunt, and
looking
closely at me some seconds, he moved aside and we all passed in. Here
I soon had a good supper of homminy provided me, whereof I did not
partake
lightly, having been from sunrise to sunset without tasting a morsel of
food. Immediately after I had finished my repast, Logan approached me,
and in tolerable good English, said:
`White man, where from?'
I motioned toward the east, and answered, `From sunriseaway beyond
the big mountains.'
Logan shook his head sadly, and replied, with a sigh:
`Ah! so all come. Poor Indian get run overhe no place lay he head.
But how you come all tied so?'
In answer, I entered into a full explanation of all that had occurred
respecting the proceedings of Girty, from first to last. Logan listened
throughout with great attention, shook his head, and rejoined:
`Ah! Simon Girty bad man, berry. Me always tink so. Me sorry you
for. Me do all me can for you. You shall sleep here. Me promise you
nothing. Me tell you more sometimeto-morrow mebby!'
With this he rose and left the cottage, and I saw him no more that
night.
Early in the morning, however, he came to me, and said that I was to
remain at his cabin through the day; that he had laid a plan to effect my
release from death, but not from captivitythe latter not being in accordance
with his principles, nor in his power; that for this purpose he had despatched
two young braves to Upper Sandusky, to speak a word in my favor; but that
I must mot be elated with hope, as it was very doubtful how much they
might effect.
[18]
[18]
The reader, familiar with the history of the early pioneers of Kentucky, will doubtless
observe a similarity between the account given by Reynolds of his escape from captivity,
and that of Gen. Simon Kenton, as narrated by his biographer, Col. John McDonald.
Notwithstanding his caution to the contrary, my spirits
became exceedingly exhilerated, and grasping his hand in both of mine, I
pressed it to my heart in silence, while my eyes became suffused with tears,
and the old chief himself seemed not a little affected.
Late the night following, the messengers returned, and on the morning
succeeding, we resumed our journey. In parting from the noble old chief,
he shook my hand cordially, but gave me no intimation of what would
probably
be my fate.
When within sight of Upper Sandusky, crowds of warriors, women and
children came out to meet us, and, seeing me, set up many a hideous yell,
until I again became alarmed for my safety and fearful that Logan had not
succeeded in his magnanimous design. This impression was the more
strongly confirmed, shortly after, by one of my guides informing me that I
must again run the gauntlet. Accordingly every preparation being speedily
effected, I started upon the course; but possessing more strength and activity
than before, and a better knowledge of what I had to perform, I succeeded in
breaking through the lines, and reaching the council house unharmed. Here
I was safe for the present, or until, as I was informed, my fate should once
more be decided by a grand council.
The council in question was speedily convened, and on the opening
thereof, a British agent, one Captain Druyer, made his appearance, and
requested permission to address the assemblage, which was speedily granted.
He spoke rapidly, for a few minutes, with great vehemence, and though I
understood not a word he uttered, yet something whispered me it was in my
favor; for I observed that the glances directed towards me, were milder far
than those on my previous trial.
To sum up briefly, it seemes that Logan had despatched his messengers to
Druyer, urging him to exert all his influence in obtaining my reprieve; and
to effect this humane design, the latter had begun by stating to the Indians
that their great white father, of whom he was an humble representative,
was at war with the Long Knives; that nothing would please him better, than
to hear of his red children having sacrificed all their enemies; but that in
war, policy was ofttimes more effectual than personal revenge, in
accomplishing
their destruction; and that he doubted not, if the prisoner present were put in
his possession, and taken to Detroit, that the great white chiefs of his own
nation, would there be able to extort from him such valuable information as
should make the final conquest of the Long Knives comparatively easy.
To this proposition, which was received rather coldly, he had added, that
for this privilege he was willing to pay a fair recompense; and that so soon
as all the information necessary had been gleaned from the prisoner,
he should, if thought advisable, again be returned to them, to be put to
death or not, as they might see proper. To this arrangement, all having at
last consented, the gallant Captain advanced to me, shook my hand, and said
that my life was for the present safe, and that I was to accompany him to
Detroit, where I would be treated as a prisoner of war.
It is impossible to describe my feelings, on hearing this joyful intelligence;
therefore I shall leave you to imagine them, aided as you will be by your
own experience under similar circumstances. And now let me close my
long narrative, as briefly as possible, for the hour is already late, and I must
rise betimes on the morrow, to join this expedition against the savages.
Surely, Algernon, exclaimed Ella, with pale features, you are not
going to leave us again so soon?
Where duty calls, Ella, there is my place; and if I fall in
honorable
action, in defence of my country and friends, perchance the atonement
may suffice for matters whereof
you
are not ignorant.
Ella buried her face in her hands, to conceal her emotion, and Algernon,
with an effort at composure, again proceeded.
At Detroit I experienced kind treatment, as a prisoner of war; but still
it was captivity, and I longed for freedom. Many, many an hour did I
employ
in planning my escape; yet month upon month rolled on, and still I
remained in durance. At last startling rumors reached me, that the Indians
of the different tribes were banding together, to march upon the frontiers
and depopulate the country; and remembering the savage threat of Girty, I
doubted not he was the instigator, and would be leader of the expedition;
and I determined, at all hazards, if such a thing were in the province of
possibity
,
to effect my escape, and give the country warning of the impending
danger. To be brief, I succeeded, as my presence here tells for itself; but
no one knows, save myself, and he who knows all things, the misery I
suffered
from fatigue, lack of food, and the fear of again being captured by some
roving band of savagesthe which I shall detail, perhaps, should my life be
spared me, at some future period, but not at the present.
I swam the Ohio, a short distance above the Falls, and made my way, to
the best of my judgment, directly towards Boonesborough, where I arrived, a
few days since, in a state of complete exhaustion. The noble old hunter
received
me warmly, from whose lips I heard with thrilling emotion, the
particulars
of the pursuit, headed by himself, and the rescue of two of my dearest
friends, their present abode, as also many startling events that had transpired
during my absence; and in return, I communicated to him the alarming
intelligence
which I have before alluded to. So soon as I felt myself
sufficiently
strong for the journey, I left Boonesborough for Bryan's Station, and
here I am, and thus my tale.
And a mighty tough time you've had on't, Mr. Reynolds, for sartin, and
no mistake, rejoined Mrs. Younker, with a sigh, wiping her eyes. Ah!
mepoor Ben!poor Ben!I'm a widder now in arnest. Well, the Lord's
will be done. The good Book says, `The Lord giveth, the Lord taketh
away, blessed be the name of the Lord;' and them good words, my children
and friends, must be our consolation.
But little more was said, for each of the party felt oppressed with a weight
of sadness, at the thought of the many mournful events a year had brought
forth, and as the hour was late, each and all presently betook themselves to rest.
Meantime the preparations of the garrison for the morrow, had been going
forward in every part of the station; lights were moving to and fro, and all
within the cabins, and on the common, was bustle and activity. At last the
sounds gradually ceased, the lights went out one by one, and all finally
become
tranquil for the night.
About an hour before day-break, the sleepers began to rouse themselves,
and all was soon again in commotion. Horses were led forth, saddled,
returned
and fed, and every thing got in readiness to throw open the gates and
march forth, so soon as it should become sufficiently light for the purpose.
At last came the exciting moment for all. Some were standing in groups,
and weeping bitterly at the thought of parting, perhaps for the last time,
with their fathers, husbands and sons; some were running to and fro with
anxious messages; some were clasping each other to their hearts, in
agonizing
silence, and praying in secret, that the Great Ruler of all might preserve
and happily restore them again to the idols of their affections; some had
mounted their noble steeds, or were leading them forth for the purposeand
all was in Babel-like confusion.
Farewell, my friends, said Algernon, as he stood in the door of Mrs.
Younker's cottage, grasping one after another the proffered hands of its
weeping inmates, among whom was the wife and mother-in-law of Isaac.
Farewell, dearest Ella; we may never meet again on earth. Farewell
farewell
!
and pressing her hand to his lips, he rushed forth with a heaving
heart, not daring to trust himself longer in her presence. Isaac and his
father-in-law followed the example of Reynolds, moved away with weeping
eyes, and all were quickly in their saddles.
A few minutes later the roll was called, and the order given by the
commanding
officer to form in double file and throw open the eastern gate.
Scarcely were the words uttered, when their arose a series of terrific Indian
yells, accompanied by a volley of firearms, and every face became blanched
with surprise and dismay, and looked from one to the other in
astonishment
.
By heavens! cried a voice, our fighting 'll be at home, I reckon,
judging by the specimen before us.
Dismounting from their horses, the garrison, together with many of the
women and children, now rushed to the southern pickets, where, through
loop-holes and crevices, they beheld, only a few rods distant, about a
hundred
savages, running to and fro, jumping up and down, whooping, yelling,
screeching and firing at the station, accompanied with all the wild, fantastic
gestures of loosened madmen.
Thar's not more nor a hundred o' the varmints, any how, cried Isaac;
and I reckon as how we can jest lick them, and no mistake. Hurray for a
fight.
Hurray for a fight! echoed a dozen voices, as they rushed back to
remount
their horses.
Hold! cried the deep voice of Father Albach. Hold! lads, don't do
things rash! Them Indians wouldn't be dancing and sky-larking round that
way, ef thar warn't some object in it, you may depend on.
And that's my opinion too, answered another gray-headed veteran.
The fact is, they're only a decoy party, sent out thar from the main body,
jest to draw us out, so that the others can rush on and make an easy
conquest
on't. I tell you, friends, thar's no mistaking it; we're surrounded by
a tremendous body o' the red heathen, and we're likely to have warm work
on't. I've lived in the woods all my life, and I know the nater of the
painted
varmints as well as I know my own. Ef them war all thar war on'em,
we'd have seen very different proceedings, I assure you.
But what's to be done? cried several voices in consternation.
I would suggest that we send immediately to Lexington for a
reinforcement
,
spoke up Reynolds, in reply.
Who'll volunteer to go with me on the dangerous mission? cried a
young man, by the name of Bell.
I will! instantly responded another, called Tomlinson.
Brave lads! returned Father Albach. You'll be doing us and your
country a service, which we at least will ever gratefully remember. I'd
advise
your leaving by the western gate, riding round the station, and keeping
away to the right, and you'll maybe pass them without trouble. But ef you
go, now's your only chance.
As he spoke, the young men in question sprang forward to their horses,
and immediately quitted the fort, amid cheers for their gallantry and courage,
and prayers for their safety and success.
A council of the leading men was now speedily convened to deliberate
upon the best means of insuring the safety of themselves, their wives and
children.
They'll no doubt attack us on the western side, said Father Albach,
where the pallisades are somewhat out o' kilter; and it's my opinion, that
we'd better repair them as soon as possible, and station the main part of the
garrison thar, ready to receive 'em with a military salute, while we send out
a few o' our young men to fire on them as is in sight, to deceive the others; for I
believe with neighbor Nickolson, here, that thar's a large party in ambush
close by.
Ay, and doubtless led by the renegade, said Reynolds, as I presume
this Indian army is the same whose approach I have foretold. Thank God!
added he with energy and emotion, as his mind reverted to Ella, that they
came as they did; for an hour later, and they would have found the fort
defenceless
,
when all within would have been food for the tomahawk and
scalping
knife. He shuddered at the thought, and placed his hand to his eyes.
Indeed, it seems like a direct Providence in our favor, rejoined another.
But thar's one thing you've overlooked, in your proposition, Albach,
said the old veteran called Nickolson. Ef the siege be protracted, what
are we to do for water?
Each face of the company blanched, and turned toward the speaker with a
startled look. It was a question of the most grave importance, and all felt it
to be so. The spring was without the pallisades, as we have previously
mentioned, on the northwestern side of the station. The path to it was
through a rank growth of tall weeds, wherein the main body of the Indians
was supposed to be concealedso that, should the garrison venture forth in
that direction, they would in all probability be cut off, and the fort fall into
the possession of the enemy. This of course was not to be thought of. But
what was to be done? To be without water in a protracted siege, was a
dangerous and painful alternative. In this agitating dilemma, one of the
council suddenly exclaimed:
I have it!I have it! All looked at the speaker in breathless
expectation
.
I have it! continued he, joyfully. The women!the women!
The women! echoed several voices at once.
Ay! you know they're in the habit of going for waterand this the
savages
know tooand ef they venture forth by themselves, as usual, the wily
scoundrels will be deceived for once, for they won't mistrust thar hiding
place is known; and as thar object is to carry the fort by stratagem, they
won't unmask till they hear firing on t'other side.
Good!good! exclaimed several voices; and forthwith the council
proceeded to summon all the women of the station, and make known their
plan for procuring a supply of water. Not a little consternation was
expressed
in the faces of the latter, when informed of the perilous
undertaking
required of them.
What! go right straight in among the Injen warmintsthem male
critters
?
cried an old maid, holding up her hands in horror.
Do you think we're invisible, and they can't see us? said a second.
Or bullet proof? added a third.
Or that our scalps arn't worth as much as yourn, rejoined a fourth.
Or of so little account you arn't afeared to loose us? put in a fifth.
We don't think any thing o' the kind, returned the spokesman on the
part of the council; but we do think, as I before explained, that you can
go and come in safety; and that ef we don't have a supply o' water, we're
likely to perish any how, and might as well throw open the gates and be
butchered at once.
This last brief speech produced the desired effect, and a few words from
Mrs. Younker completely carried the day.
Is this here a time, she cried, with enthusiasm, her eyes flashing as she
spoke, to be hanging back, till the all important moment's gone by, and
then choke to death for want o' water? What's our lives any more'n the
men's, that we should be so orful skeered about a few ripscallious, painted
varmints, as arn't o' no account, no how? Han't I bin amongst 'em once?
and didn't the Lord presarve me?and shall I doubt His protection now, when a
hundred lives is at stake? No! no! I'm not skeered; and I'll go, too, ef I
has to go alone. Who'll follow me?
I will! cried one.
And I! said a second.
We'll all go! exclaimed several voices.
Dispersing in every direction, each flew to her own cabin, and seizing upon
a bucket, hurried to the rear gate, where, all being assembled, they were at
once given exit.
[19]
[19]
In both the foregoing and subsequent details, we have followed history to the letter.
Perhaps in the whole annals of history, a more singular proceeding than
thisof men allowing their wives and daughters to deliberately put
themselves
into the power of a ferocious, blood-thirsty enemy, and women with
nerve and courage to dare all so bravelycould not be found. But these
were times of stern necessity, when each individualman, woman or child
was called upon to dare and do that which would surprise and startle their
descendants. Still it must not be supposed that they, on either side, were
without fears, and those of the most alarming kind. Many a palpitating
heart moved over the ground to the spring, and many a pale face was
reflected
in its placid waters; while many a couragous soul within the fort
trembled
at the thought of the venture, and what might be its result, as they had
never done beforeeven with death starting them in the faceand as they
probably would never do again. Each party, however, knew the step taken
to be a serious alternative; and the women believed, that on their caution
and presence of mind, their own lives and those of their fathers, husbands,
and children were depending; and in consequence of this, they assumed an
indifference and gaiety the most foreign to their present feelings. As for
Algernon
,
we leave the task to lovers of imagining his feelings, when he saw
the lovely Ella depart with the rest. It was indeed a most anxious time for
all; but the stratagem succeeded to a charm; and, to use the words of a
historian
on the subject, Although their steps became quicker and quicker on
their return, and, when near the gate of the fort, degenerated into a rather
unmilitary celerity, attended with some little crowding in passing the
apperture
,
yet not more than one-fifth of the water was spilled, and the eyes of the
youngest had not dilated to more than double their ordinary size.
CHAPTER XVII.
THE ATTACK ON BRYAN'S STATIONTHE GALLANT DEFENCETHE
REINFORCEMENTS
THE
AMBUSCADETHE SKIRMISH OF THE CORNFIELDNARROW
ESCAPE
OF GIRTYHIS STRATAGEM AND ITS SIGNAL FAILURE.
Meantime the repairing of the pallisades had been going bravely forward,
every moment rendering the garrison more and more secure, which served
not a little to revive their spirits; and when at length the women had all
entered
,
the gate been barred, and they had seen themselves well supplied with
water, they could restrain their feelings no longer, and one grand,
simultaneous
cheer burst from their lips.
Now then, said Father Albach, let 'em come, and I reckon as how
they'll meet with a warm reception. But to draw 'em on, we must send out
a party to make a feint to fight the others.
Thirteen young men, among whom was Isaac, were accordingly selected,
to pass out by the eastern gate and commence firing rapidly, while the
remainder
,
with loaded muskets, were to range themselves along the western
pickets, and be ready to pour their deadly contents into the swarthy horde of
besiegers, in case their attack should be made in that quarter. As the young
men departed, all relapsed into a solemn silence of anxious suspense, which
was presently broken by the rapid discharge of firearms, outside the fort,
accompanied
with cheers and yells, from both the whites and Indians. Now
was the all important momentthe war sounds were gradually growing more
and more distantand every eye of the inner garrison was strained in
breathless expectation, in the direction of the spring, while every rifle was
cocked and in rest, ready for any emergency.
Suddenly the tall weedswhich a moment before had been quietly waving
in the morning breezebecame dreadfully agitated, and the next instant, as
if by magic, the ground was peopled by some five hundred hideous savages,
who, led on by the notorious renegade, now rushed forward, with wild frantic
yells, to the western pallisades, where our gallant little band stood drawn up
ready to receive them. They had advanced in a tremendous body, to within a
few feet of the fort, when the word Fire, uttered in a clear, manly voice,
resounded
above their own frightful yells, and was followed the next moment,
by a terrible volley of leaden balls, that carried death and terror into their
serried ranks. With one simultaneous yell of rage, consternation and
disappointment
,
they halted a moment in indecision, when another death-dealing
volley
,
from the gallant Kentuckians, decided their course of action, and again
yelling fearfully, they parted to the right and left, and bearing their dead
and wounded with them, rushed for the covert of a neighboring forest. At
the same moment, the party which had sallied forth upon the Lexington
road, to make a feint of attacking their decoys, entered the fort by the
eastern
gate, in high good spirits at the success of their manuvre.
The warfare was now carried on in the usual manner, after the failure of
stratagem, for several hours, with but little success on either side. The
block-houses were immediately manned by the garrison, who by this means
could command every point of compass; and whenever an Indian came in
sight, he was at once made the target for three or four keen riflemen, who
rarely missed their mark. In consequence of this the wily savage rarely
showed himself in an open manner, but would creep stealthily among the
tall weeds, or among the tall standing corn; that covered about an hundred
acres of ground on the southern side of the station, or ensconce himself
behind
some stump or trunk of a tree in the vicinity, and discharge his rifle at
any mark thought suitable, or let fly his burning arrows upon the roofs of
the cabins. To avoid, if possible, a conflagration, every boy of ten
years and upwards, was ordered upon the roofs of the houses, to throw
off these burning missiles; but notwithstanding their great vigilance, so
rapidly were they sent at one period, that two of the cabins, being in a very
combustible state, took fire, to the great consternation of all, and, before they
could be extinguished, were totally consumed. Here again the hand of an
overruling Providence was manifest; for a light wind drove the flames from
the other buildings, and thus a terrible and fatal calamity was averted.
From the attack in the morning by the main body, a sharp fire was
maintained
on both sides till towards noon, when it began to slacken considerably,
and a little past meridian ceased altogetherthe savages having withdrawn
for another purpose, as we shall show anon, leaving the garrison in suspense
as to whether they had totally abandoned the siege or not.
We have previously stated that Bryan's station stood on a gentle rise on
the southern bank of the Elkhorn, whereby it commanded a view of much of
the surrounding country. A considerable portion of the land in the
immediate
vicinity had been cleared and was under cultivation; but still, in
some places, the forest approached to a close proximity, so that it was
impossible
,
without traversing the ground, to determine whether the foe had
withdrawn altogether, or, as was more probable, now lay hidden therein,
awaiting
an unguarded moment of the besieged to renew hostilities. Where the
Maysville and Lexington road now runs, was a long narrow lane, bounded on
one side by the large cornfield before alluded to, and on the other by a heavy
wood. Through this lane the reinforcements from Lexington must
naturally
pass, to reach the station; and knowing this, and that they were expected,
(for the escape of the two courriers in the morning had not been overlooked)
the Indians, to the number of more than three hundred, had concealed
themselves
in the thicket, within pistol shot of the road, and were now quietly
waiting to cut them off.
Notwithstanding the quiet which had succeeded the sounds of warfare, the
garrison were still on the look out, fearful of being surprised. In this
manner
an hour or two passed away, without any event occurring worth being
recorded, when a voice shouted joyfully:
The Lexington reinforcements are at hand!
In a moment the whole station was in commotionmen, women and
children
,
rushing to the block-houses and pallisades nearest to and overlooking
the long lane just mentioned. The force in question numbered some sixteen
horsemen, and about twice as many foot, who not having heard any firing, nor
seen any savages thus far, were somewhat carelessly approaching the fort at a
liesure pace, thinking, as was not uncommon in those times of danger, when such
things were often exagerated, that perhaps the alarm had been unfounded, or
at the most, based only on slight grounds. They had been overtaken on the
road between Lexington and Hoy's station, for which place they had
marched
on receiving the news of Holder's defeat, and had been informed by
Tomlinson
and Bell, that Bryan's station was surrounded by a large body of
Indians
,
of whose numbers they knew nothing. On hearing this, and knowing
the unguarded condition of Lexington, they had instantly turned back, and
pressed forward at what speed they could, to the assistance of their
neighbors
,
of whom they were now in sight.
Great God! cried the voice of the look-out at this moment, in
consternation
.
See!see!they are ambushed, and will all be cut off!
As he spoke, a long rolling line of fire could be discerned, and presently
was heard the report of a tremendous volley of musketry, followed by a
cloud of dust and smoke, which for a time completely hid them from view.
In a few minutes, however, the horsemen were seen close at hand, spurring
forward with lightning speed. Some three or four individuals instantly
sprang to and threw open the eastern gate, and in less than two minutes they
reined in their panting steeds in the court of the station. At the first shot of
the savages, they had put spurs to their horses, and, as the ground was very
dry, a cloud of dust had instantly enveloped them, by which means,
fortunately
,
every one of them had escaped unharmed, although on their way they had
drawn the fire of more than three hundred Indian rifles, successively
discharged
at them while passing the lines of the ambuscade. Not thus easily, however,
escaped their companions on foot.
At the commencement of the firing, these latter were advancing toward the
station through the cornfield, and, being completely hidden from the savages
thereby, they might, had they pressed rapidly forward, have gained the fort
in safety. Not so was their conduct. They were brave, hot-blooded, noble
men. They could not think of flying and leaving their friends in danger;
and more noble and reckless than wise and prudent, they turned and rushed
to their assistance. They saw their error, but too late to retrieve it. Their
friends had fled, and were safe, but they were now placed within a few paces
of three hundred blood-thirsty warriors. On seeing them, the savages
uttered
the most hideous yells, rushed forward and cut them off from the fort,
and then sprang after them tomahawk in hand. Luckily, however, for our
little band of heroes, the Indians had just discharged their rifles, and their
own were loaded; by which means, when hard pressed, they turned and kept
their foes at baythe savage, in all cases, being too cautious to rush upon a
weapon so deadly, with only a tomahawk wherewith to defend himself.
Moreover
,
the corn was stout and tall, among which they ran and dodged with
great agility; and whenever an Indian halted to load his rifle, the fugitive for
whom its contents were designed, generally managed by renewed exertions,
to gain a safe distance before it was completed, and thus effect his escape.
Some five or six, however, were so unfortunate as to be knocked or shot
down, when they were immediately tomahawked and scalped; but the
remainder
,
in various directions and by various artifices, succeeded in making
their escape. A few reached the fort in a roundabout manner, but the main
body of them returned to Lexington, where, had the savages followed them,
they would have found an easy conquest. Fortunately for the whites,
however
,
the red men were not so inclined; and pursuing them a few hundred
yards only, the latter abandoned the chase as hopeless.
One of the most active and ferocious on the part of the Indians during this
skirmish, which lasted nearly an hour, was Simon Girty. Enraged to
madness
at the failure of his stratagem in the morning, he gnashed his teeth and
rushed after the fugitives, with all the fury depicted on his countenance of a
demon let loose from the infernal regions of Pluto. Two with his own hand
he sent to their last account, and was in hot pursuit of a thirda handsome
active youthwho, being hard pressed, turned round, and raising his rifle to
his shoulder, with a scornful smile upon his face, bitterly exclaimed, as he
discharged it:
Take that, you dd renegade, and see how it'll digest!
As he fired, Girty fell, and perceiving which, the Indians, with a yell of
despair, instantly gathered round him, while the young man effected his
escape
.
This closed the exciting contest of the cornfieldwhich had been
witnessed throughout from the station with feelings better imagined than
discribed
but,
unfortunately for humanity, did not end the career of Girty;
for the ball had taken effect in his shot pouch, instead of his body; and
though wounded, his case was in no wise critical, and he was soon able to
take his place at the council fire, to deliberate upon what further should be
done.
[20]
[20]
The foregoing is strictly authentic.
The council alluded to, lasted some two or three hours. The Indians
were disheartened at their loss in the morning, and the failure of all their
stratagems, even to cutting off the reinforcements of the enemy. They
were sufficiently convinced they could not carry the fort by storm, and they
also believed it unsafe to longer remain where they were, as the alarm of
their presence had spread far and wide, and there was no telling at what
moment
a force equal to their own might be brought against them; therefore
they were now anxious to abandon the siege and return home. Girty,
however
,
was by no means satisfied with the turn matters had taken. He had
with great difficulty and masterly persuasion succeeded in getting them to
unite and march in a body (contrary to their usual mode of warfare, which
consisted in skirmishing with small parties,) against the whites, and he now
felt that his reputation was in a manner staked on the issue; consequently
he could illy bear to leave without the trial of one more stratagem. This
he made known to the chiefs of the council, and offered, in case of failure, to
retreat with them at once.
As this last design of Girty was merely to deceive the whites, and frighten
them into capitulation, without any further risk to themselves, the Indians
agreed to it, and the council broke up.
It was nearly sundown, and every one in the station had been on the alert,
ready to repel another attack should the Indians renew hostilities, as was
not unlikely, when a voice cried out.
Hang me to the nearest cross-bar, of the red sons of Satan hav'nt sent out
a flag of truce!
This at once drew the attention of most of the garrison to a small white
flag on a temporary pole, which at no great distance was gradually nearing
them, supported in an upright position by some object crawling along on
the ground. At length the object gained a stump, and having mounted it,
was at once recognised by Reynolds as the renegadealthough Girty on this
expedition had doffed the British uniform, in which we once described him,
and now appeared in a costume not unlike his swarthy companions.
Halloo the garrison! he shouted.
Halloo yourself!what's wanted? cried a voice back again.
Respect this flag of truce, and listen! rejoined Girty; and waving it
from side to side as he spoke, he again proceeded: Courage can do much in
war, and is in all cases a noble trait, which I for one do ever respect; but
there may be circumstances where manly courage can avail nothing, and
where to practice it only becomes fool-hardy, and is sure to draw down
certain
destruction on the actor or actors. Such I hasten to assure you,
gentlemen
,
is exactly your ease in the present instance. No one admires the
heroism which you have one and all, even to your women and children, this
day displayed, more than myself; but I feel it my duty to inform you that
henceforth the utmost daring of each and all of you combined can be of no avail
whatever. Resistance on your part will henceforth be a crime rather than
a virtue. It is to save bloodshed and you all from a horrible fate, that I
have ventured hither at the risk of my life. You are surrounded by an
army of six hundred savages. To-morrow there will be a large
reinforcement
with cannon, when, unless you surrender now, your bulwark will be
demolished, and you, gentlemen, with your wives and children, will become
victims to an unrelenting, cruel foe. Death will then be the mildest of your
punishments. I would save you from this. I am one of your race, and, although
on the side of your enemy, would at this time counsel and act toward you a
friendly part. Do you not know me? I am Simon Girtyan agent of the
British. Take my advice and surrender now your fort into my hands, and I
swear to you not single hair of your heads shall be harmed. But if you hold
out until you are carried by storm, I cannot save you; for the Indians will
have become thirsty for your blood, and no commander on earth could then
restrain
them. Be not hasty in rejecting my friendly offer. It is for your good I
have spokenand so weigh the matter well. I pause for an answer.
The effect of Girty's speech upon the garrison, was to alarm them not a
little. His mention of reinforcements with cannon, caused many a stout
heart to tremble, and many a face to blanch and turn to its neighbor with an
expression of dismay. Against cannon they knew, as Girty stated,
resistance
would be of no avail; and cannon had, in 1780, advanced up the
Licking
Valley, and destroyed Riddle's and Martin's stations. If Girty told the
truth, their case was truly alarming.
9
As the renegade concluded, Reynoldswho saw the effect his words
had produced, and who, knowing him better than any of the others,
believed his whole tale to be falseat once begged leave to reply for the
garrison, which was immediately granted. Placing himself in full view of
Girty, he answered as follows, in a tone of railery:
Well done, my old worthy companion! and are you really there,
carrying
out another of your noble and humane designs? When, O when, I
humbly beg to know, will your philanthropic efforts end? I suppose not
until death has laid his claim, and the devil has got his due. You ask us if we
know you. What! not know the amiable Simon Girty, surnamed the
Renegade
?
Could you indeed for a moment suppose such a thing possible?
Know you? Why we have an untrusty, worthless cur-dog in the fort here,
that has been named Simon Girty, in compliment to youhe is so like you
in every thing that is ugly, wicked and mean. You say you expect
reinforcements
of artillery. Well, if your stay in this quarter long, I know of
no one that will be more likely to need them than yourself and the cowardly
cut-throats who call you chief. We too expect reinforcements; for the
country is roused in every direction; and if you remain here twenty-four
hours longer, the scalps of yourself and companions will be drying on our
cabins. Bring on your cannon and blaze away as soon as you please! We
shall fear you not, even then; for if you succeed in entering, along with your
naked, rascally companions, we shall set our old women to work, and have you
scourged to death with rods, of which we have on hand a goodly stock for
the purpose. And now to wind up, allow me to say I believe you to be a
liar, and
know
you to be a most depraved, inhuman, damned villain. This
knowledge of your character is not second-hand. I paid dearly for it, by a
year's captivity. I defied you when in your power: I spit at and defy you
now in behalf of the garrison! My name you may remember. It is
Algernon
Reynolds. What would you more?
[21]
[21]
This celebrated reply of Reynolds to Girty, is published, with but slight variations, in all
the historical sketches that we have seen relating to the attack on Bryan's Station; and is,
perhaps, familiar to the reader.
Would that I had you in my power again, shouted back Girty; for
by ! I would willingly forego all other vengeance on the whites, to take
my revenge on you. I regret the garrison did not choose some one to reply
who was not already doomed to death. It was my desire to save bloodshed,
but my offer has been rejected from the mouth of one I hate; and now I leave
you to your fate. To-morrow morning will see your bulwarks in ruins, and
yourselves, your wives and little ones, in the power of a foe that never
forgives
an injury nor forgets an insult. Farewell till then! I bide my time.
As Girty concluded altogether, he began to ease himself down from the
stump, when his progress was not a little accelerated by hearing a voice
from the garrison cry out:
Shoot the dd rascal!don't let him escape!
Instantly some five or six rifles were brought to bear upon him, and his
fate might then have been decided forever, had not the voice of Nickolson
warned them to beware of firing upon a flag of truce. Girty, however,
made good his retreat, and the garrison was disturbed no more that night.
Before morning the Indians, after having killed all the domestic cattle they
could find belonging to the station, began their retreat, and by daylight their
camp was deserted, though many of their fires were still burning brightly,
and several pieces of meat were found on roasting-sticks around them, all
showing a late and hasty departure.
CHAPTER XVIII.
THE COUNCILTHE MARCHBLUE LICKSTHE SECOND COUNCILRASHNESS OF
McGARYPREPARATIONS FOR BATTLE.
As Algernos had stated to Girty, the country was indeed roused to a sense
of their danger. The news of the storming of Bryan's Station, had spread
fast and far, and, early on the day succeeding the attack, reinforcements
began
to come in from all quarters, so that by noon of the fourth day, the
station
numbered over one hundred and eighty fighting men.
Colonel Daniel Boone, accompanied by his son Israel, and brother Samuel,
commanded a considerable force from BoonesboroughColonel Stephen
Trigg, a large company from Harrodsburghand Colonel John Todd, the
militia from Lexington. A large portion of these forces was composed of
commissioned officers, who, having heard of the attack on Bryan's Station by
an overwhelming body of Indians, had hurried to the scene of hostilities, and,
like brave and gallant soldiers as they were, had at once taken their places
in the ranks as privates. Most noted among those who still held
command
under the rank of Colonel, were Majors Harlan, McGary, McBride,
and Levi Todd; and Captains Bulger, Patterson and Gordon.
Of those now assembled, Colonel Todd, as senior officer, was allowed to
take commandthough, from the tumultuous council of war which was held
in the afternoon, it appears that each had a voice, and that but little order
was observed. It was well known that Colonel Benjamin Logan was then in
the act of raising a large force in Lincoln county, and at the farthest would
join them in twenty four hours, which would render them safe in pursuing
the savages; and for this purpose the more prudent, among whom was our
old friend, Colonel Boone, advised their delay; stating, as a reason, that the
Indians were known to out number them all as three to one; and that to
pursue them with a force so small, could only result, should they be
overtaken
,
in a total defeat of the whites. Besides which, Boone stated that the
scouts who had been sent out to examine the Indian trail, had reported that
it was very broad, and that the trees on either side had been marked with
their tomahawks, thereby showing a willingness on the part of the enemy
to be pursued, and a design to draw the whites into an ambuscade, the
consequences
of which must necessarily be terrible. In this view of the case,
Colonel Boone was strongly seconded by Major McGary, who, though a
hotheaded
young officer, eager on almost all occasions for a fight, now gave his
voice on the side of prudence.
But these prudent measures were combatted and overruled by Todd, who,
being an ambitious man, foresaw that in waiting for Logan, he would be
deprived
of his authority as commander in chief of the expedition, and the
glory which a successful battle would now shed upon him. By him it was
urged, in opposition to Boone and McGary, that to await the arrival of
Colonel
Logan, was only to act the part of cowards, and allow the Indians a safe
retreat; that in case they were overtaken and their numbers found to be
double their ownwhich report he believed to be falsethe ardor and
superior
skill of the Kentuckians would more than make them equal, and the
victory and glory would be their own. Whereas, should the Indians be
allowed
to escape without an effort to harass them, the Kentuckians would be
held eternally disgraced in the minds of their countrymen.
The dispute on the matter waxed warm, high words ensued, and the
discussion
was in a fair way of being drawn out to great extent, when Boone,
becoming tired and disgusted with the whole proceedings, replied:
Well, I've given my conscientous opinion about the affair, and now you
can do as you please. Of course I shall go with the majority, and my seniors
in command; and ef the decision's for a fight, why a fight we must venter,
though every man o' Kaintuck be laid on his back for the risking. Ef we
failand it's my opine we shalllet them as takes the responsibility bear
the blame. I'll give my voice though, to the last, that we'd better wait the
reinforcements o' Colonel Logan.
Sir! exclaimed Colonel Todd, turning fiercely to Boone, if you are
not a
coward
, you talk like one! Don't you know, sir, that if we wait for
Logan, he will gain all the laurels?and that if we press forward, we shall
gain all the glory?
As to my being a coward, Colonel Todd, replied Boone, mildly, with
dignity, when the word's explained so as I know the full meaning on't,
prehaps
I'll be able to decide ef I be or not. Ef it means prudence in a time o'
danger, on which the welfare o' my country and the lives o' my countrymen
depends, I'd rather be thought cowardly than rash. Ef it means a fear to
risk my own poor body in defence o' others, I reckon as how my past life 'll
speak for itself; and for the fater, wharsomever Colonel Todd dars to venter,
Daniel Boone dars to lead. As to
glory
, we'll talk about that arter the
battle's
fought.
Thus ended the discussion; and the matter being put to vote, it was
carried
by an overwhelming majority in favor of Todd's proposition, that the
Indians should be pursued without further delay. It was now about three
o'clock in the afternoon; and immediately on the final decision being made,
the council broke up, and orders were rapidly given to prepare to depart
forthwith. All the horses in or about the station were now collected together,
on which most of the officers and many of the privates were soon mounted,
and by four o'clock, the eastern gate was thrown open, the order to march
given by Colonel Todd, and the procession, composed of the flower of
Kentucky's
gallant sons, moved forth, amid sighs and tears from the opposite sex,
a great portion of them never to return again. Reynoldswho, during the
past two or three days, since the retreat of the enemy, had employed his
leisure moments in the company of the being he loved, and who was now
finely mounted on a superb charger which had been presented him by
Colonel
Booneturned upon his saddle, as he was leaving the station, and
waved another adieu to Ella, who stood in the door of her cottage, gazing
upon his noble form, with a pale cheek, tearful eye, and beating heart. She
raised her lily hand, and, with a graceful motion, returned his parting salute;
and then, to conceal her emotion, retired into the house.
The Indians, it was found, had followed the buffaloe trace; and, according
to the account given by the scouts, had made their trail obvious as possible,
by hacking the trees on either side with their tomahawks. Their camp fires,
however, were very few, comparatively speaking, which to Boone seemed
plainly evident of a desire to mask their numbers. He had lived in the
woods all his life, was the oldest settler on the borders, and had been
several
times a prisoner of the Indians, so that he was familiar with their
artifices
for decoying their enemies; and he believed, from what he saw, that it
was their desire to be followed by the whites, and that they would probably seek
to draw the latter into an ambuscade in the vicinity of the Blue Licks, where
the wild country was particularly favorable to their purpose. In
immagination
he already saw the disastrous result that was destined to follow this
hasty expedition; but his counsel to the contrary had been disregarded, and
it was not a time now to dampen the ardor of the soldiers, on which alone
success could depend, by expressing his fears and laying himself liable to further
reproach and contumely. He had said and done all that was consistent in
his situation to prevent the present step, and he now saw proper to keep his
fears of the result to himself; the more so, as a retreat was out of the
question
.
About dark the party came to a halt, and encamped in the woods for the
night. Early on the ensuing morning they resumed their march, and a
little
before noon reached the southern bluffs of Licking river, opposite the
Lower Blue Lick, distant from Bryan's station some thirty-six miles, and the
place where, according to the opinion of Boone, the savages would be likely
to lie in wait to give them battle.
The scenery in the vicinity of the Licks, even at the present day, is
peculiarly
wild and romantic; but at the period in question, it was relieved by
nothing in the shape of civilization. The Licks themselves had for ages
been the resort of buffaloe and other wild animals, which had come there to
lick the saline rocks, and had cropped the surrounding hills of every green
thing, thereby giving them a barren, desolate, gloomy appearance. On the
northern bankthe one opposite our little armyarose a tremendous bluff,
entirely destitute of vegetation, the brow of which was trodden hard by the
immense herds of buffaloe which had passed over it from time immemorial,
on their way to and from the salt springs at its base. To add to its dismal
appearance, the rains of centuries had ploughed deep gullies in its side, and
washed the earth from the rocks around its base, which, being bluckened in the
sun, now rose grim and bare, frowning in their majesty like fettered monsters
of the infernal regions. As you ascended this ridge, a hard level trace or
road led back for something like a milefree from tree, stump or bush
when you came to a point where two ravines, one on either hand, met at the
top, and, thickly wooded, ran in opposite directions down to the river, which,
beginning on the right, went sweeping round a large circuit, in the form of an
iron magnet, and made a sort of inland peninsula of the bluff in question.
Back from this buffaloe trace, on the southern bank of the Licking, dark
heavy woods extended for miles in every direction, and made the whole
scene impressive with a kind of gloomy grandeur.
As our gallant band of Kentuclians gained the river, they descried some
three or four savages leisurely ascending the stony ridge on the opposite
side. On perceiving the troops, the Indians paused, gazed at them a few
moments in silence, and then quietly continuing their ascent, disappeared
on the other side. A halt was now ordered by Colonel Todd, and a council
of war called to deliberate on what was best to be done. The wild gloomy
country around them, their distance from any post of succor, and the
startling
idea that perchance they were in the presence of a body of savages of
double or treble their own numbers, was not without its effect upon Todd
and those who had seconded his hasty movements, and served much toward
cooling their ardor, and inspiring each with a secret awe.
Immediately on the halt of the troops, some twenty officers assembled in
front of the lines for consultation, when, turning to them, Colonel Todd said:
Gentlemen, for ought I know to the contrary, we are now in the
presence
of a superior enemysuperior at least in point of numbersand I
desire
to know your minds as to what course we had best pursue. And
particularly
,
Colonel Boone, continued Todd, politely bowing to the veteran
woodsman, would I solicit your views on the matter, believing as I do,
notwithstanding
any hasty words I may have uttered in the heat of excitement
to the contrary, that you are a brave soldier, cool under all circumstances,
amply experienced in Indian stratagem, and consequently capable of
rendering
much valuable advice in the present instance.
Boone was not a revengeful man under any circumstances; and though he
had felt more stung and nettled at the implication of Todd the day before than he
cared to let others see, yet now that the other had made the apology due him,
he showed nothing like haughtiness or triumph in his mild, benevolent
countenance
,
but bowing slightly, as in token of a compliment, with his
characteristic
frankness replied:
As you say, Colonel Todd, I've had some little experience with the
varmints
at different times, not excepting my capter at these same Licks in
1778; and, besides, I've traversed this here country in every direction, and
know every secret hiding-place round about, as well as the rest o' ye know
the ground we've jest travelled; and it's on account o' this knowledge partly,
and partly on account o' the lazy movements o' them red heathen we've jest
seen go over the hill yonder, and the wide trail, and marked trees behind us,
that I'm led to opine that's a tremendous body o' the naked rascals hid in a
couple o' ravines, that run down to the river on either side of that ridge,
about a mile ahead, who are waiting to take us by surprise. Now I think
we'd better do one of two things. Either wait for the reinforcement o'
Colonel
Logan, who's no doubt on his march by this time to join us, or else
divide
our party, and let half on 'em go up stream and cross at the rapids and
so get round behind the ravines, ready to attack the savages in the rear,
while the rest cross the ford here, and keep straight on along the ridge to
attack
'em in frontby which manuvre we may prehaps be able to beat
them. But ef you don't see proper, gentlemen, to take up with either o'
these proposals, don't, for Heaven's sake! I beg o' ye, venter forward,
without
first sending on scouts to reconnoitre, else we're likely to be in an
ambuscade
afore we know it, and prehaps all be cut off.
Well, all things considered, answered Colonel Todd, who now
becoming
aware of the fearful responsibility resting upon him as commander, felt
little inclined to press rashly forward, I think it advisable to wait the
reinforcements
of Logan before proceeding further. It can delay us but a day
or two, and then we shall be sure of a victory; whereas, if we press forward
now and run into an ambuscade, of which Colonel Boone feels certain, we
shall doubtless rue the day by a total defeat.
I'm of the same opinion, rejoined Major Levi Todd.
And I, said Captain Patterson.
And I, rejoined several other voices.
But I'm opposed to waiting for Logan, said Colonel Trigg; as delays
on the point of a battle are rarely ever beneficial. I think we had better
take up with Colonel Boone's second proposition, divide our forces and
proceed
at once to action; though for the matter of prudence, it may be
advisable
to send a couple of scouts ahead, before deciding upon any thing
positive
.
Majors Harlan and McBride, with two or three others of inferior rank,
took sides with Trigg, and the discussion seemed likely to be protracted for
some considerable time, when Major Hugh McGary, who had been listening
to the proceedings with the utmost impatience, suddenly startled and broke
up the council by a loud whoop, resembling that of an Indian; and spurring
his high mettled charger forward, he waved his hat over his head and shouted,
in a voice that reached the whole length of the lines, these ever memorable
words:
Those among you who are not dd cowards, follow me! I'll soon show,
you where the Indians are! As he spoke, he rushed his fiery steed into the
river, with all the rash impetuosity of a desperate soldier charging at the
cannon's mouth.
The effect of McGary's words and actions were electrical. The troops on
horse and foot, officers and privates, suddenly became animated with a wild
enthusiasm. Whooping and yelling like Indians, more than a hundred of
them now sprang forward, and in a tumultuous body rushed into the stream
and struggled for the opposite shore. A few lingered around Boone, Todd,
and Trigg, to await their orders. But the pause of these commanders was
only momentary. They saw their ranks in confusion, and more than
twothirds
of their soldiers in the water, struggling after the hot headed McGary,
and most of the other officers. The mischief was already done. To delay
was but to doom their enthusiastic comrades to certain destruction; and
shouting to those who yet remained to follow, Todd put spurs to his horse, and,
together with Trigg and Boone, dashed after the main body. It was a wild
scene of excitement. Horsemen and footmen, officers and privates, all mixed
in together in confusion, and pushing forward in one rolling and irregular
mass.
By violent threats and repeated exertions, with their swords drawn and
flashing in the sunlight, Colonels Todd, Trigg and Boone at length
succeeded
,
after reaching the opposite bank, in restoring something like order to the
half-crazed troops. On gaining the brow of the buffaloe ridge, Todd
commanded
a halt; then drawing a pistol from the holster of his saddle, he rode
to the front of the lines, and, with eyes flashing fire, exclaimed:
Men, we must have order! Without order we are lost. I command a
halt; and the first man that moves from the ranks, officer or private, until
so commanded, by heavens, I'll scatter his brains on the land he disgraces!
His speech produced the desired effect; not a man ventured, by
disobeying
,
to put his threat to the test; and after gazing on them sternly a few
moments in silence, he turned to McGary, who was sitting his horse a few
paces distant, and said:
Sir! you have acted unbecoming, both as an officer and a
gentlemanand
if we two live through an engagement which I fear is near at hand, and
which your rashness will have brought about, I will have you put under
arrest
and tried by court-martial.
As you please, Colonel Todd, replied McGary, with a fierce look.
But you will bear in mind, sir, that at the council yesterday, you scouted
at the proposition advanced by Colonel Boone, and seconded by myself and
others, of waiting for the reinforcements of Colonel Logan, and insinuated
that we were cowards. As
you
, sir, were so
very
brave, and so eager for a
fight when at a distance, I swore that if we came where a fight could be had,
I would either draw you into action, or forever damn you as a coward in the
eyes of your soldiers. If I have succeeded, I rest satisfied to let you do
your worst.
Resume your place, sir! and break an order this day at your peril!
cried Todd, sharply, his face flushed with indignation.
As McGary slowly obeyed, Todd called to Boone, Trigg, and one or two
others, with whom he held a short consultation as to the propriety of sending
forward scouts before advancing with the main army. This being decided in
the affirmative, Isaac Younker and another individual were selected from the
ranks, and appointed to go on the dangerous mission, with orders to follow
the buffaloe trace and examine it carefully on both sides, particularly round
about the ravines, and if they saw any traces of Indians, to hasten back with
all speed; but if not, to continue their examination for a half mile further
on, where the great trace gradually became lost in lesser paths, branching
off in every direction.
Immediately on the departure of these two scouts, the troops were drawn
up in a long line, ready for action at a moment's notice. Colonel Trigg
commanded the Harrodsburgh forces on the right, Colonel Boone the
Boonesborough
soldiers on the left, and Colonel Todd, assisted by Majors McGary
and McBride, the Lexington militia in the center. Major Harlan led the
van, and Major Levi Todd brought up the rear. This was the order in
which they went into battle.
CHAPTER XIX.
THE BATTLE OF BLUE LICKSTERRIBLE SLAUGHTERRETREAT OF THE
WHITESINCIDENTS OF REYNOLDS AND BOONEAWFUL SPECTACLE OF THE
BATTLE GROUND NEXT DAYSUBSEQUENT PURSUIT OF THE ENEMY.
In less than an hour, Isaac and his companion returned, and reported that
that they had seen no signs of Indians whatever. On the receipt of this
intelligence
,
the order to march was immediately given, and the whole body of
soldie s, under the scorching rays of an August sun, moved rapidly forward.
Nothing occurred to interrupt their progress, until the van had reached
within
a few yards of the ravines before mentioned, when the appalling truth of a
tremendous ambuscade of the savages suddenly became known, by the
pouring
therefrom, into their ranks, a terrible volley, which carried with it death,
terror and confusion. Never were soldiers taken more by surprise, and at
greater disadvantage to themselves, both as to numbers and position. They
had relied upon the report of the scouts, who had themselves been deceived
by the quiet of every thing about the ravines, and now here they were, less
than two hundred in number, on an open spot, exposed to the deadly
rifles of more than five hundred Indian warriors, who were lying concealed
among the dark cedars of the ravines.
The first fire was severely destructive, particularly on the right, where
the gallant Colonel Trigg fell mortally wounded, and was soon after
tomahawked
and scalped. With him went down several officers of inferior grade,
and a large portion of the Harrodsburgh troops; but, undaunted, his little
band of survivors returned the fire of the Indians, and, assisted by those in
the rear, pressed forward like heroes to the support of the center and van,
where the work of death and caruage was now becoming terrible.
Onward! shouted Colonel Todd, as he rode to and fro, animating his
men by his voice and gestures: Onward, my noble soldiers, and strike for
your country and firesides! Oh God! exclaimed he the next moment, as
a ball pierced his breast, I am mortally wounded; but strike! press on,
and mind me not! As he spoke, he reeled in his saddle, the rein
slipped from his grasp, and his fiery steed rushed away, bearing him to the
enemy and his untimely doom.
Fight, my lads, and falter not! cried Major Harlan in the van; and the
next moment his horse went down, some five or six balls lodged in his body,
and he fell to rise no more. But his men remembered their orders, and
fought without faltering until but three remained alive to tell the fate of
their companions.
At 'em, lads!don't spare the varmints! said Boone, as he urged the
left wing into action; and the immediate report of more than fifty rifles in
that quarter, told him he was obeyed. In this wing fought Algernon, Isaac,
the brother and son of Boone, with a heroic desperation worthy of Spartans;
and at every fire an Indian went down before each of their deadly rifles.
But what could avail heroism here on that ill-fated day? Our brave little
band of Kentuckians was opposed by a foe of treble their number, who, on
their first terrible fire being expended, rushed forth from their covert, with
horrible yells, tomahawk in hand, and, gradually extending their lines down
the buffaloe trace, on either side, so as to cut off the retreat of the whites,
closed in upon them in overwhelming numbers, and the slaughter became
immense. Major McGary rushed his horse to and fro among the enemy,
and shouted and fought with all the desperate impetuosity of his nature.
Major Todd did his best to press on the rear, and Colonel Boone still urged
his men to the fight with all the backwoods eloquence in his power. But,
alas! of what avail was coolness, impetuosity, or desperation now? The
Indians were closing in thicker and thicker. Officers and privates, horsemen
and footmen, were falling before the destructive fire of their rifles, or
sinking
beneath their bloody tomahawks, amid yells and screeches the most
diabolical
.
Cries, groans, and curses, resounded on every hand, from the living,
the wounded and dying. But few now remained in command. Colonels
Todd and Trigg, Majors Harlan and McBride, Captains Bulger and Gordon,
with a host of other gallant officers, were now no more. Already had the
Indians enclosed them as in a net, hemmed them in on all sides, and they
were falling as grass before the scythe of the mower. Retreat was almost cut
offin a few minutes it would be entirely. They could hope for nothing
against such odds, but a certain and bloody death. There was a possibility
of escape. A few minutes and it would be too late. They hesitatedthey
waveredthey turned and fled;and now it was that a horrible sight
presented
itself.
The space between the head of the ravines and the ford of the river, a
distance
of more than a mile, suddenly became the scene of a hard and bloody
race. As the whites fled, the Indians sprang after them, with whoops and
yells that more resembled those of infuriated demons than human beings;
and whenever an unfortunate Kentuckian was overtaken, he instantly fell a
victim to the tomahawk and scalping knife. Those who were mounted
generally
escaped; but the foot suffered dreadfully; and the whole distance
presented
an appalling sight of bloody, mangled corses, strewing the ground in
every direction. Girty, the renegade, was now at the height of his hellish
enjoyment. With oaths and curses, and horrid laughter, his hands and
weapons reeking with blood of the slain, he rushed on after new victims,
braining and scalping all that came within his reach.
At the river the carnage was in no wise abated. Horsemen and footmen,
Indians and whites, victors and vanquished, rushed down the slope, pellmell,
and plunged into the streamsome striving for life and liberty, some for
death and vengeanceand the dark rolling waters went sweeping on, colored
with the blood of the slaughtered.
An act of heroic gallantry and presence of mind here occurred, which has
often been mentioned in history, tending as it did to check somewhat the
blood-thirsty savages, and give many of the fugitives time to escape. Some
twelve or fifteen horsemen had already passed the ford in safety, and were
in the act of spurring forward, regardless of the fate of their unfortunate
companions on foot, when one of their number, a man by the name of
Netherland
,
who had previously been accused of cowardice, suddenly shouted, as if
giving the word of command:
Halt! Fire on the Indians, and protect the men in the river!
The order was obeyed, in the same spirit it was given; and the sudden
discharge
of more than a dozen rifles, made the infuriated savages recoil in
dismay, and thereby saved many a poor fellow's life.The reaction,
however
,
speedily followed. Many of the savages now swam the river above
and below the ford, and gave chase to the fugitives for fifteen and even
twenty miles, though with but little success after crossing the streamas
the latter generally planged into the neighboring thickets, and so eluded the
vigilance of the former.
Such were the general features of the disastrous battle of Blue Licksa
battle of dreadful import to the pioneers of Kentuckywhich threw the land
into mourning, and made a most solemn and startling impression upon the
minds of its inhabitants. Had we space to chronicle individual heroism, we
might fill page after page with brave and noble achievements; but as it is, we
shall confine ourself to those connected with our most prominent characters.
We have stated previously, that Algernon Reynolds fought in the left wing,
under the command of Boone; where, for the few minutes which the action
lasted, he sustained himself with great gallantry; and, by his undaunted
courage, inspired those immediately around him with like ardor. On the
retreat of the whites, he found himself cut off from the river by a large body
of Indians, headed by his old foe, Simon Girty, who, having recognised him,
was now pressing forward with several stalwart warriors, to again make him
prisoner. For the first time since the commencement of the battle, he felt
his heart sink. To be taken alive was a thousand times worse than death,
and escape seemed impossible. However, there was no time for
consideration
;
another moment might be fatal; his foes were upon him; it was now
or never. Luckily he was mounted on a fiery steedwhich had thus far
escaped
a scratchand had one undischarged pistol in his holster. This he
drew forth as his last hope, and, tightening the rein, wheeled his horse and
spurred down upon his enemies with tremendous velocity.
I have you now by ! cried the renegade. As he spoke he sprang
forward to grasp the bridle of Algernon's horse, but stumbled and fell, and
the beast passed over him, unfortunately though without doing him any
injury
.
But Algernon had not yet got clear of his enemies; for on the fall of Girty,
he found himself surrounded by a host of savageswhooping and yelling
frightfullyand his direct course to the river cut off by a body of more than
a hundred. There was only one point, and that a few yards to his left,
where there appeared a possibility of his breaking through their lines. In
the twinkling of an eye, and while his horse was yet under full headway, his
decision was made. Rushing his steed hard to the right, in order to deceive
his foes, he suddenly wheeled him again to the left, and the side of the beast
striking against some three or four of the Indians, who were on the point of
seizing his rein, staggered them back upon their companions, creating no
little confusion. Taking advantage of this, our hero, with the speed of a
flying arrow, bore down upon the weakest point, where, after shooting down a
powerful savage, who had succeeded in grasping his bridle and was on the
point of tomahawking his horse, he passed their lines, amid a volley of rifle
balls, which cut his clothes in several places, but left himself and steed
unharmed
.
The worst of the danger now seemed over; but still his road ahead was
beset with Indians, who were killing and scalping all that fell in their power,
and behind him were the infuriated renegade and his party now in hot
pursuit
.
His steed, however, was strong and fleet, and he put him to his wind;
by which means he not only distanced those behind him, but passed one or
two parties in front unharmed. About half way between the ravines and the
river, he overtook Major McGary, and some five or six other horsemen, who
were dashing forward at a fast gallop, and checking his fiery beast somewhat,
he silently joined them. A little further on, Reynolds observed an officer
on foot, who, exhausted by his recent exertions and lame from former
wounds, had fallen behind his companions. On coming up, he recognised in
the crippled soldier the brave Captain Patterson; and with a magnanimity
and self-sacrifice worthy of all imitation, he instantly reined in his horse and
dismounted, while the others kept upon their course.
Sir! cried he to Patterson, you are, I perceive, fatigued and weak.
Your life is in great danger. Mount, sirmount! I am fresh and will take
my chance on foot.
God bless you, sir!God bless you for this noble act! exclaimed
Patterson
,
as Reynolds assisted him into the saddle. If I escape
Enough! said Reynolds, hurriedly, interrupting him. Fly, sirfly!
God be with you! Adieu! And turning away as he spoke, he sprang down
the side of the ridge, and running along the edge of the river some little
distance
,
plunged into the water and swam to the opposite shore.
Unfortunately
for our hero, he had changed his garments at Bryan's Station, and now
wore a pair of buckskin breeches, which, in swimming the stream, had
become
so soaked and heavy that he was obliged to remove them in order to
display his usual agility. While seated upon the bank and occupied in this
manner, he was startled by a hand being placed upon his shoulder, and the
familiar grunt of an Indian sounding in his ear. On looking up he at once
recognised the grim features of Wild-cat, and saw himself in the power of
some half dozen savages.
Me wanty you, said Wild-cat, quietly. Kitchokema give much for
Long-Knife. Come!
There was no alternative now; and Algernon rose to his feet and suffered
his weapons to be taken from him, with what feelings we leave the reader to
imagine. Taking him along, the savages set forward on the alert for other
game; and presently three of them darted away in chase of a party of whites;
and directly after, two others, leaving our hero alone with Wild-cat. Hope
now revived that he might yet escape; nor was he this time disappointed;
for after advancing a short distance, Wild-cat stooped down to tie his
moccasin
,
when Reynolds immediately sprang upon him, knocked him down with
his fist, seized his rifle, tomahawk and knife, fled into the thicket, and
reacked
Bryan's Station during the night succeeding, unscathed.
[22]
[22]
It may perhaps add interest to the story, for the reader to know that the foregoing
account
,
concerning Reynolds and Captain Patterson, is historically true; as is also the one
which follows with regard to Boone and his son.
Throughout the short but severe action at the ravines, Boone maintained
his ground with great coolness and courage, animating his soldiers by word
and deed, until the rout became general, when he found it necessary, to
prevent
falling into the hands of the enemy, to have recourse to immediate
flight. As he cast his eyes around him for this purpose, he saw himself cut
off from the ford by the large body of Indians, through whose lines our hero
was even then struggling. At this moment he heard a groan which
attracted
his attention, and looking down, he perceived his son Israel lying on the
ground scarcely five paces distant, weltering in his blood. With all a father's
feelings of affection and alarm, he instantly sprang from his horse, and,
raising
the youth in his arms, darted into the nearest ravine and made with all
speed for the river. A few of the Indians were herein concealed, who
discharged
their rifles at him as he passed, without injury, and then joined in
pursuit. One, a powerful warrior, having outstripped his companions, was
rushing upon the old woodsman with his tomahawk, when the latter, with
backwoods celerity, instantly raised his rifle and shot him through the body.
Finding himself hard pressed, and that his son was already in the agonies of
death, the old hunter strained him for the last time to his heart, with
choking
emotion, pressed his lips to those already growing cold, and then, with a
groan of agony, left him to his fate and the scalping knife of the savage,
while he barely made his own escape by swimming the river below the lower
bend. To him this was a mournful daynever to be forgottenand one that,
even long, long years after, could never be mentioned but with tears.
In this action the brother of Boone was wounded; but in company with
Isaac Younker, and some three or four others, he succeeded in making his
escape.
On the day of the battle, Colonel Logan arrived at Bryan's Station
with a command of four hundred and fifty soldiers. On learning that the
garrison with their reinforcements had gone the day preceding in pursuit of
the Indians, and fearful of some disaster, he resolved on a forced march to
give them assistance as soon as possible. For this purpose he immediately
set forward on their trail, but had gone only a few miles, when he met a
party of the fugitives returning from the scene of slaughter. They were
alarmed and excited, and of course their account of the battle was greatly
exaggerated, believing as they did that they were the only escaped survivors.
Their report, to say the least, was very startling, allowing that only the half
were true; and in consequence, Logan decided on retracing his steps to the
station, until he should be able to collect more definite news concerning the
fight. Gradually one party after another came dropping in; and by nine
o'clock nearly or quite all of the survivors were assembled in the fortress;
when it was ascertained that a little over one-third of the party, or between
sixty and seventy of those engaged in the battle, were missing. It was a sad
night of wailing and lementation, and dreadful excitement in the station; for
scarcely a family there, but was mourning the loss of some friend or relation.
Algernon and Isaac had returned, to the great joy of those most interested in
their welfare; but the father-in-law of the latter came not, and there was
mourning in consequence.
A consultation between Colonels Logan and Boone, resulted in the decision
to march forthwith to the battle-ground. Accordingly every thing being got
in readiness, Colonel Logan set out with his command, at a late hour the
same night, accompanied by Boone, and a few of the survivors of the
ill-fated
engagement. Towards morning a halt of three hours was ordered for
rest and refreshment, when the line of march was again taken up, and by
noon of the day succeeding the battle, the forces arrived upon the ground,
where a most horribly repulsive scene met their view.
The Indians had departed on their homeward route, bearing their killed
and wounded away from the field of carnage; but the dead and mutilated
bodies of the whites still remained where they had fallen, presenting a
spectacle
the most hideous and revolting possibly to be conceived. In the edge
of the stream, on the banks, up the ridge, and along the buffaloe trace to
the ravines, were lying the bloody and mangled corses of the gallant heroes
who, the day before, full of ardor and life, had rushed on to the battle and
an untimely and inglorious death,now swollen, putrid, and in the first
stage of decomposition, from the action of the scorching rays of an August
sunsurrounded by vultures and crows, and all species of carrion fowl,
many of which, having gorged themselves on the horrid repast, were either
sweeping overhead in large flocks, and screeching their funeral dirge, or
wiping
their bloody bills on the neighboring trees. Some of the bodies in the
stream had been gnawed by fishesothers by wolvesand all had been so
disfigured, by one means and another, that but very few could be recognised
by their friends.
Oh, God of Heaven! what a sight! exclaimed Colonel Logan, as he ran
his eye over the scene.
A dark and terrible day for Kaintuck, answered Boone, who was
standing
by his side; and as he spoke, the old hunter turned away his head to
conceal
his emotion; for his mind reverted to the death of his noble son.
Orders were now given by Colonel Logan, to have the bodies collected,
and interred in a manner as decent as circumstances would permit. This
being accomplished, he returned with his men to Bryan's Station, and there
dismissed themit not being thought advisable to pursue the enemy further.
In this ever memorable battle of Blue Licks, the Kentuckians had sixty
killed, twelve wounded, and seven taken prisoners, most of whom were
afterwards
put to the tortures. As we said before, it was a sad day for
Kentucky
,
and threw the land into mourning and gloom. Colonels Todd and
Trigg, and Majors Harlan and McBride, were men beloved and respected in
life, and bitterly lamented in death by a long list of true-hearted friends.
The great trace where the battle was fought, is now green with low
branching
cedars; and a solitary monument near by, informs the curious spectator
of the sad disaster of by gone times. The Blue Lick Springs are much
resorted
to in the summer season by invalids and others, for whose convenience
a magnificent hotel stands upon the banks of the lovely and romantic
Licking
.
A few words more and our general history will be closed. On receiving
the intelligence of the battle of Blue Licks, General Clarkwho then
occupied
a fort at the Falls of the Ohio, on the present site of Louisville
resolved
upon another expedition to the enemy's country; for which purpose it
was proposed to raise an army of one thousand men, who, under their
respective
commanders, should congregate opposite the mouth of the Licking, on
the present site of Cincinnati. The interior and upper country were to
rendezvous
at Bryan's Station, under the command of Colonels Logan and Floyd;
and the lower settlements at the Falls of Ohio, under General Clark; who,
on all parties arriving at the grand rendezvous, was to be
commander-inchief
of the expedition. One thousand mounted riflemen were raised
without
a draft, who marched upon the enemy in their own country,
destroyed
their villages, provisions, and cornfields, took several prisoners, and
carried
with them so much terror and desolation, that the Indians never
sufficiently
recovered from the shock to renew hostilities in a formidable body;
and the Kentuckians henceforth, save in individual cases, were left
unmolested
.
On their march they came upon the rear of Girty's party, returning from
their successful battle: but an Indian scout gave the renegade and his
companions
warning in time for them to escape the whites by flight. In this
expedition
,
Colonel Boone volunteered and served as a private; being the last
in which the noble old hunter was ever engaged in defence of the settlements
of Kentucky. Algernon Reynolds and Isaac Younker were his companions
in arms, who, on the dismissal of the troops, returned again to Bryan's
Station.
CHAPTER XX.
BRYAN'S STATIONTHE MESSENGERJOYFUL SURPRISETHE LOVERSTHE
WEDDING
REJOICINGTHE
FINALE.
Month upon month rolled away, quiet succeeded to the alarm and
commotion
of war, hostilities between Great Britain and America ceased, and the
country both east and west now began to look up from the depression and
gloom which had pervaded it during its long and sanguinary struggle for
independence
.
In Kentucky the effect was really invigorating; and the
settlers
,
who for a year past had been driven from their homes in terror and
dismaywho had quitted their peaceable farming implements for the
destructive
weapons of strife and bloodshednow ventured to return to their
desolate firesides, and renew their honest occupations of tilling the soil.
Some, however, more predisposed to financeering than their neighbors,
sought only speculation; in consequence whereof the Land Offices of the
Virginia Commissionerswhich opened in November, after the return of the
troops under Clarkwere daily thronged with applicants for the best
locations
;
whereby was laid the first grand corner-stone of subsequent litigation,
disaffection, and civil discord among the pioneers. But with these, further
than to mention the facts as connected with the history of the time, we have
nothing to do; and shall now forthwith pass on to the finale of our story.
Month upon month, as we said before, had rolled away, spring had come, and
with it had departed many of those who had occupied Bryan's Station during
the siege of August; but still, besides the regular garrison and their families, a
few of the individuals who had sought refuge therein, yet remained; among
whom we may mention Mrs. Younker, Ella, Isaac and his wife, and so forth.
Algernon, tooby the entreaty of his friends, and contrary to his previous
calculations, and what he considered his dutyhad been induced to defer
his departure until the opening of spring. Possibly there might have been a
secret power, stronger than the mere entreaties of others, which had
prevailed
over his resolution to depart; but further the records say not. Be that as
it may, the extreme limit of time which he had set for remaining, was now
nearly expired; and he was, at the moment when we again present him to the
reader, engaged in conversation with Ella on the painful subject.
Suddenly
he was startled by the information that a stranger in the court desired to
speak with him.
A stranger! exclaimed Algernon, in surprise; and as he spoke, his face
became very pale, his lips quivered, and his hands trembled. Turning upon
Ella a look of agony, which seemed to say, I am an arrested fellon, he
wheeled upon his heel, and followed the messenger in silence; while she,
knowing the cause of his agitation, and fearful of the worst, sank almost
lifeless upon a seat.
As Algernon passed out of the cottage, he beheld in the center of the
common
,
a well-dressed, good-looking individual, who was standing on the ground
and holding by the bridle a horse, which, as well as the rider himself,
appeared
both travel-stained and weary. Approaching the stranger with a firm
step, but with a pale countenance and throbbing heart, he said:
I understand, sir, you have business with me.
Your name, then, returned the other, quietly, I presume to be
Algernon
Reynolds.
The same.
You are, too, I infer, a native of  Connecticut, and son to Albert
Reynolds of that place.
Again right, answered Algernon, in a voice which, despite of himself,
was a little tremulous.
Then, sir, rejoined the stranger, with a satisfied air, I may say that I
have business with you, and of vast importance. A long chase you have led
me, i' faith; and weeks of travel have you cost me; so you may rest assured
that I am happy in finding you at last.
Proceed! said Algernon, compressing his lips, as one whose mind is
made up for the worst. Proceed, sir. I know your mission.
The deuce you do! replied the other, in astonishment; then you
must have a very remarkable faculty for divining secrets. I rather guess
you are mistaken though, he added, as he drew forth a couple of letters
from a side pocket; but these will inform you whether you are or not.
Seizing the proffered letters with trembling eagerness, Algernon hastily
glanced at their superscription; then, breaking the seals, he devoured their
contents with the utmost avidity; while the stranger stood noting the
varying
expressions of his handsome countenance, with a quiet smile. At first
his pale features seemed flushed with surprisethen became radiant with
joyand then gradually saddened with sorrow; yet a certain cheerfulness
prevailed over allsuch as he had not exhibited for many a long month.
As he finished a hasty perusal of the epistles, he turned to the stranger,
grasped his hand, and, shaking it heartily, while tears of joy filled his eyes,
exclaimed:
I
was
mistaken, sirGod be thanked! God bless you too, sir! for being
the messenger of peace between myself and conscience. Excuse me. Tarry
a moment, sir, and I will send some one to take charge of your weary beast,
and show yourself a place of rest and refreshment.
As he spoke, Algernon darted away toward the cottage. Observing Isaac,
he ran to and caught him by the hand.
Isaac, he said, in a gay tone, while his eyes sparkled with delight, wish
me joy! I have good news. Ibut stay; I forgot; you know nothing of the
matter. Oblige me, though, by showing yonder gentleman and his beast due
hospitality, and wringing his hand, he sprang into the apartment where Ella
was sitting alone, leaving Isaac staring after him with open mouth, and
wondering
whether he were in his right senses or not.
Ella! he exclaimed, wildly, as he suddenly appeared before her with a
flushed countenance: Ella, God bless you! Listen. II am free! I am
no longer a criminal, thank God! These, Ellathese! and he held aloft
the letters with one hand, and tapped them nervously with the other. The
next moment his features grew pale, his whole frame quivered, and he sank
upon a seat, completely overcome by the nervous excitement produced by
the sudden transition from despair to hope and freedom.
Ella was alarmed; and springing to him, she exclaimed:
For God's sake! Algernon, what is the matter?what has happened?
are you in your senses? Speak!speak!
Read, answered he, faintly, placing the letters in her hand: Read,
Ellaread!
Ella hesitated a moment on the propriety of complying with his request,
but a moment only; and the next she turned to one of the epistles. It was
from the father of Algernon, and ran as follows:
Dear Son
:If in the land of the living, return as speedily as possible
to your afflicted and anxious parents, who are even now mourning you as dead.
You can return in safety; for your cousin, whom you supposed you had
fatally wounded, recovered therefrom, and publicly exonerated you from all
blame in the matter. He is now, however, no morehaving died of late
with the scarlet fever. Elvira, his wife, is also dead. She died insane. As
a partial restitution for the injury done you, your cousin has made you heir
by will, to all his property, real estate and personal, amounting, it is said, to
over twenty thousand dollars. Your mother is in feeble health, caused by
anxiety on your account. For further information, inquire of the
messenger
who will bear you this.
Your affectionate father,
Albert Reynolds.
Nov. 12th, 1782.
The other epistle was from a lawyer, informing Reynolds of his acquisition
to a large amount of property, by a will of his late cousin; and that he, the
said lawyer, being executor thereof, required the presence of him, the said
Reynolds, or his proxy forthwith.
I knew it: I felt that all would yet be well: I told you to hope for the
best! cried Ella, as she concluded the letter, her eyes moist with tears, and
her face beaming like the sun through a summer shower.
God bless you, dearest Ellayou did indeed! exclaimed Reynolds,
suddenly, bounding from his seat and clasping her in his arms. You did
indeed tell me to hopeand you told me truly; and he pressed kiss after
kiss, again and again, upon her sweet lips, with all the wild, trembling,
rapturous
feelings of a lover in his first ecstacy of bliss, when he has
surmounted
all obstacles and gained the heart of the being he loves.
Now, dearest Ella, continued Algernon, when the excitement of the
moment had been succeeded by a calmer, though not less blissful mood: Now,
dearest Ella, I am freemy sacred oath binds me no longerand now can
I say, with propriety, that I deeply, solemnly, and devotedly love you, and
you alone. I am not rich; but I have enough of this world's goods to live
in ease, if not in splendor. Will you share with me, and be partner of my
lot, be it for good or ill, through life? My heart you have had longmy
hand I now offer you. Say, dearest, will you be mine?
Ella did not speakshe could not; but she looked up into his face, with a
sweet, modest, affectionate smile; and her dark, soft, beautiful eyes, suffused
with tears, wherein a soul of love lay mirrored, gave answer, with a
heartfelt
eloquence surpassing words.
I understand you, Ella, said Algernon, with emotion. You are mine
mine forever! and he strained her trembling form to his heart in
silence
a
deep, joyful and holy silencethat had in it more of Heaven than
earth.
It was a mild, lovely day in the spring of 1783. Earth had donned her
green mantle, and decorated it with flowers of every hue and variety. The
trees were in leaf and in bloom, among whose soft, waving branches, gay
birds from the sunny south sang most sweetly, and nature seemed every
where to rejoice. In the court of Bryan's Station was a large concourse of
peoplemany of whom were from a distanceand all assembled there to
witness the solemn ceremony which was to unite Algernon Reynolds and
Ella Barnwell forever; for who shall say the holy marriage rite is not
eternally
binding in the great Hereafter. There were congregated both sexes
and all ages, from the infant to the hoary headed veteran of eighty winters.
There were assembled youth and manhood, whose names have since graced
the historic page, and whose deeds have stamped them benefactors of their
race and nation. All were in order, and silent, and the scene was most
solemnly impressive. On the right and left of the bride and groom and their
attendants, stood, promiscuously, the general spectators of both sexes. In
front was drawn up the garrison, in three platoons, under arms, in
compliment
to the noble bravery of our here at the battle of Blue Licks.
Never did Algernon appear more noble than nownever did Ella look
more beautiful; as, pale and trembling, she seemed to cling to his arm for
support. The ceremony was at length begun and ended, amid a deep and
breathless silence. As the last solemn words,
I pronounce you man and
wife
, died away upon the air, the first platoon advanced a pace and fired a
volleythe second and third followedand then arose a soft bewitching
strain of music, during which the friends of the newly married pair came
forward to offer their congratulations, and wishes for their long life and
happiness.
Among the party present was Colonel Boone; and approaching Algernon
and Ellawho were now sealed where the solemn rite had taken placehe
took the hand of each, and said, in a voice of some emotion:
My childrenfor ye seem to me as suchmay you both live long and
be happy. You've both o' ye had a deal o' trouble since I first saw yeand
that's but a little while agobut I hope it's now over. Don't think I want
to flatter, sir, when I say I think you're a brave and honorable young man,
and that you've got a wife every way worthy of yeand she a husband
worthy o' herand that's saying much. God bless ye both! and of you
eveneed
a friend, call on Daniel Boone. With this he shook their hands
heartily, and strode away.
The next who advanced to them was Captain Pattersonthe officer, it will
be remembered, whose life Algernon so generously saved at the risk of his
own. After the usual congratulations, he took our hero by the hand, and
said, with deep feeling:
Sir! I feel that to you, for risking your own life to save mine, I owe a
debt I can never cancel; and an attempt to express to you in words my
sense of obligation for the noble act, would be worse than vain: therefore
accept this, as a slight testimonial of the gratitude of one who will ever
remember
you in his prayers, and wear your image in his heart. As he
concluded, Captain Patterson placed in the hands of Algernon a sealed packet,
and moved away.
[23]
[23]
This was found to contain a deed of two hundred acres of the best land in Kentucky
A historical fact.
Well, it's all over, said Mrs. Younker, coming up in turn to wish the
young couple joy. I al'ays 'spected as how it 'ud come to this here.
Goodness, gracious, marsy on me alive! what a flustration they has made
about yesure enough, for sartinhan't they? I never seed the like on't
afore in all my born days. Why it's like you war governor's folks, sure
enough. And my own Ella, too; and the stranger as com'd to my house all
bleeding to death like! My! my!what strange doings Providence does!
Well, it's to be hoped you'll al'ays git bread enough to keep from starving,
and that you won't fight nor quarrel more nor is necessitousas the Reverend
Preacher All prayer said, when he married me and Ben together. Ah! poor
Ben!poor Ben!I'm a lone widder now. Well, the Lord's will be done!
And the good dame moved sadly away, to make room for others, and console
herself by recounting her afflictions to some patient listener, together with
the virtues of her deceased and living friends.
I don't 'spect it's o' much account my telling you I wish ye joy, said
Isaac, when every body's doing the same thing; but it comes from the
heart and I can't help it. Well, you'll be happy I know; for thar's nothing
like married life; and I speak from experience. I'm sorry you've got to
leave us so soon; but you won't git far from me, for I've got you both
here; and placing his hand upon his heart, he bowed, smiled, and passed
on.
As soon as the congratulations were over, Algernon and Ella were
escorted
into the cottage occupied by Mrs. Younker, where a sumptuous dinner
was already prepared for them, their relatives, and a few select friends, among
whom was Colonel Boone and Captain Patterson. For the remainder, long
tables were ranged around the common, where the greatest conviviality
prevailed
;
and toasts were drank; and songs were sung, and all were merry.
After dinner there were music and dancing, on the common and in the cabins;
and the coming night shut in a scene of festivity, such as was but seldom
witnessed even in those early times; and which was remembered and spoken of
long, long years after, when many of those who were then actors in the scene
had sunk beneath the clods of the valley.
Years have rolled away to the dark and unapproachable past, since the
transpiring of those events which we have chronicled, and vast mutations
have marked the steps of all conquering time. Our beloved country, which
then weak and oppressed was struggling for her independence against the
most powerful nation on the globe, has since nobly won a name and place
among the mighty ones of earth, and planted her stars and stripes from the
Atlantic to the Pacific, and built cities and towns amid dark and mighty
forests, where then roved in freedom the wild, untutored aboriginees of
America.
Kentucky, too, has since become a rich, populous, and powerful state;
and her noble sons, by their courage and generosity, have well maintained
that name and fame which was won for them by their fathers, and which
shall go down to future ages all green and unfading. Bryan's Stationthe
theatre of many a scene of gay frolic and sanguinary strifeof festivity and
mourninghas long since sunk to ruin and dust; and on its site now stands
the private dwelling of a gentleman of fortune. But where are they who
once inhabited it? Those hoary headed veteransthose middle aged men
or those fiery and impetuous youth, ever ready for either love or war?
Where are they now? Gone! Passed away like moving shadows that
leave no trace behind. Gone out, one by one, as lights in the late deserted hall
of revelry, or stars at the dawn of day. But very fewand those mere
striplings thennow remain to tell the tale; of whom it may with truth be
said, The places which know them now shall soon know them no more
forever.
Reader, a word or two more and we have done; and in your hands we
leave the decision, as to whether our task has been faithfully fulfilled or
not.
Shortly after their marriage, Algernon and Ella bid farewell to their
friends in the west, and returned to the east, where a long and happy career
awaited them; and where they lived to recount to their children and
grandchildren
the thrilling narratives of their captivity, and their wild and romantic
adventures while pioneers on the borders of Kentucky.
Isaac returned to the farm of his fatherrebuilt the cottage destroyed by
the Indiansand there, with his dear Peggy, lived happily to a green old
age, beloved and respected by all who knew him; and there his posterity
still continue to multiply the name of Younker. With him the good dame,
his mother, sojourned for several years, as industrious and talkative as ever;
and at last passed quietly from among the living, even while in the act of
making a sublime quotation on the subject of dying, from her favorite, the
immortal
Preacher Allprayer.
Boone continued a resident of Kentucky, until he fancied it too populous
for his comfort, when he removed with his family to Missouri, where he
spent much of his time in fishing and hunting, and where he finally died
at an advanced age. From thence his remains were conveyed to Frankfort,
the capital of Kentucky, where they now repose; and where a rough slab,
with a few half intelligible characters thereon, points out to the curious
stranger the last earthly resting place of the noblest, the most daring and
famous hunter and pioneer the world has ever produced.
The fate of little Rosetta Millbanks, the captive, we
may
perchance detail
in a subsequent work, should such a one be called for.
Girty, notwithstanding his outrageous crimes against humanity, continued
to live among the Indians for a great number of years, the inveterate and
barbarous foe of his race. In the celebrated battle of the Thames, a
desperate
white man led on a band of savages, who fought with great fury, but
were at length overpowered and their leader cut to pieces by Colonel
Johnson's
mounted men. The mangled corse of this leader was afterwards
recognized
as the notorious and once dreaded Simon Girty
The Renegade
.
THE END.Dear Son
:If in the land of the living, return as speedily as possible
to your afflicted and anxious parents, who are even now mourning you as dead.
You can return in safety; for your cousin, whom you supposed you had
fatally wounded, recovered therefrom, and publicly exonerated you from all
blame in the matter. He is now, however, no morehaving died of late
with the scarlet fever. Elvira, his wife, is also dead. She died insane. As
a partial restitution for the injury done you, your cousin has made you heir
by will, to all his property, real estate and personal, amounting, it is said, to
over twenty thousand dollars. Your mother is in feeble health, caused by
anxiety on your account. For further information, inquire of the
messenger
who will bear you this.
Your affectionate father,
Albert Reynolds.
Nov. 12th, 1782.